***
My wife caught me cheating
My wife, Lorraine, has just found out that I have been cheating on her with Clara next door. Last night, she packed her things and was off on her way. 

I can see Clara now, Lorraine has gone.
***
Beethoven hyping the crowd.
Beethoven: YOU WANNA HEAR A SYMPHONY?

*crowd cheers*

Beethoven: I CAN'T HEAR YOU!
***
AMA: I am a submarine naval commander discharged for friendly fire in an underwater sea battle
Oops, wrong sub. 
***
What's the difference between a rooster and a prostitute?
Rooster goes CockaDOODLEDOOO!!

Prostitute goes AnyCOCKLEDOOO!!


(Such an old joke maybe some of these young redditors have never heard it ;)
***
Post Tortoise Politician
While stitching a cut on the hand of a 75 year old farmer, the doctor struck up a conversation with the old man. 

Eventually the topic got around to politicians and their role as our leaders. 


 

The old farmer said, " Well, as I see it, most politicians are 'Post Tortoises'.''



Not being familiar with the term, the doctor asked him what a 'post tortoise' was.

The old farmer said,



" When you're driving down a country road and you come across a fence post with

a tortoise balanced on top, that's a post tortoise."

The old farmer saw the puzzled look on the doctor's face so he continued to explain.

"You know he didn't get up there by himself,

he doesn't belong up there,

he doesn't know what to do while he's up there,

he's elevated beyond his ability to function,

and you just wonder what kind of dumb arse put him up there to begin with."

***
The woman who injected her 8-year old daughter with Botox for beauty pageants has lost custody.
The child didn't look surprised.
***
The teacher asked the class to stand
...one by one and compose a simple sentence using appropriate be verbs. 

"She is beautiful", said Kate. 

"My dogs are fat", shouted Mark. 

"I is...", stuttered Joe when the teacher interrupted. 

"You always say 'I am'. Never say 'I is'", said she. 

As fast as he could, Joe uttered, 

"I am the ninth letter of the alphabet." 

***
How do you tell the difference between a plumber and a chemist?
Ask him/her to pronounce unionized


Edit: Gets 3000+ upvotes, Karma remains at 20...
***
A Golden Oldie Blonde joke...
A blonde called her boyfriend and said, “Please come over here and help me… I have a killer jigsaw puzzle, and I can’t figure out how to get it started.”

Her boyfriend asked, “What is it supposed to be when it’s finished?”

The blonde said, “According to the picture on the box, it’s a tiger.”

Her boyfriend decided to go over and help with the puzzle. She let him in and showed him where she had the puzzle spread all over the table. He studied the pieces for a moment, then looked at the box, then turned to her and said, “First of all, no matter what we do, we’re not going to be able to assemble these pieces into anything resembling a tiger.”

He took her hand and said, “Second, I’d want you to relax… Let’s have a nice cup of hot chocolate, and then…”

He sighed, “let’s put all these Frosted Flakes back in the box.”

***
Do you know the one step to avoiding clickbait?
Obviously not.

gg y'all, inbox = rekt
***
A man walks into a bank
and walks up to a pretty, young clerk. 

"I want to open a fucking bank account," he says.

The clerk looks up, mildly shocked, sure she's misheard. "Excuse me?"

"You heard me," says the man. "I want to open a fucking bank account."

The clerk puts down her pen. "Sir, I'm going to have to ask you to refrain from using profanity in this building."

The man rolls his eyes. "What's so fucking hard about opening a fucking bank account? Let me talk to your manager."

The clerk goes into the back room, and comes out with an older gentleman in a suit. "This is the guy," she says.

"I hear there's a problem, sir," says the manager, and steps forward. "Is there something I can help you with? Keep in mind that I personally hired all of these clerks and I will not tolerate any abuse towards them."

"Yes," says the man. "I want to open a fucking bank account and deposit two million dollars into it."

"I see," says the manager. "Was this bitch giving you any trouble?"
***
Husband knocks it out of the park!
A wife was making fried eggs in breakfast for her husband. Suddenly, her husband burst into the kitchen.
"Careful ... CAREFUL!" he yelled. "Put in some more butter! Oh my GOD! You're cooking too many at once. TOO MANY! Turn them! TURN THEM NOW! They need more butter. Oh my GOD! WHERE are we going to get MORE BUTTER? They're going to STICK! Careful ... CAREFUL! I said be CAREFUL! You NEVER listen to me when you're cooking! Never! Turn them! Hurry up! Are you CRAZY? Have you LOST your mind? Don't forget to salt them. You know you always forget to salt them. Use the salt. USE THE SALT! THE SALT!"
The wife stared at him. "What the hell is wrong with you?" she asked. "You think I don't know how to fry a couple of eggs after all these years?"
The husband calmly replied, "I just wanted to show you what it feels like when I'm driving with you in the car."
***
An infinite number of people walk into a bar...
...the first one orders a beer.
The second one orders half a beer.
The third one orders a quarter of a beer.
The bartender stops them and pours two full beers.
The infinite hoard is outraged and demands more, to which the bartender responds "C'mon, guys. Know your limits".
***
"I'm Bill Gates, today I'll teach you how to count to 10"
1, 2, 3, NT, 95, 98, 2000, Me, XP, Vista, 7, 8, 10
***
Which program do Jedi use to open PDF-files?
Adobe Wan Kenobi
***
Dear President Obama, I've got a joke for you...
I texted it to Angela Merkel. Did you... *get it*?

***
A woman has to go to Italy for a conference, so her husband drives her to the airport
A woman has to go to Italy for a conference, so her husband drives her to the airport.

"Thank you, honey", she says.

"What would you like me to bring back for you?"

He laughs and says, "An Italian girl!"

When the conference is over, he meets her at the airport and asks, "So, honey, how was the trip?"

"Very good," she replies.

"And what happened to my present?"

"Which present?" she asks.

"The one I asked for- an Italian girl!"

"Oh, that," she says. "Well, I did what I could. Now we have to wait nine months to see if it's a girl."
***
So the iPhone 7 gets arrested...
He puts on his earpods and smugly declares "sorry, you can't charge me while I'm using my headphones".
***
A man entered a restaurant and sat at the only open table.
As he sat down, he knocked the spoon off the table with his elbow. A nearby waiter reached into his shirt pocket, pulled out a clean spoon, and set it on the table. The diner was impressed. "Do all the waiters here carry spoons in their pockets?"

The waiter replied, "Yes. Ever since an efficiency consultant visited our restaurant... He determined that 17.8% of our diners knock the spoon off the table. By carrying clean spoons with us, we save trips to the kitchen."

The diner ate his meal. As he was paying the waiter, he commented, "Forgive the intrusion, but do you know that you have a string hanging from your fly?"

The waiter replied, "Yes, we all do. Seems that the same consultant determined that we spend to much time washing our hands after using the men's room. So, the other end of that string is tied to my penis. When I need to go, I simply pull the string, do my thing, and then return to work. Having never touched myself, there really is no need to wash my hands. Saves a lot of time."

"Wait a minute," said the diner, "how do you get your penis back in your pants?"

"Well, I don't know about the other guys, but I use the spoon."
***
A young man...
...moved out from home and into a new apartment, all of his own,
he went proudly down to the lobby to put his name on his mailbox.

While there, a stunning young lady came out of the apartment next to the mailboxes, wearing only a robe.
The boy smiled at the young woman and she started up a conversation with him.
As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious that she had nothing else on.
The poor kid broke into a sweat trying to maintain eye contact.
After a few minutes, she placed her hand on his arm and said, 'Let's go to my apartment, I hear someone coming.'

He followed her into her apartment; she closed the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off completely.
Now nude, she purred at him, 'What would you say is my best feature?'
Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, 'It's got to be your ears.'

Astounded, and a little hurt she asked, 'My ears? Look at these breasts; they are a full 38 inches and 100% natural.
I work out every day and my ass is firm and solid. I have a 28 inch waist. Look at my skin - not a blemish anywhere.
How can you think that the best part of my body is my ears?'

Clearing his throat, he stammered... 'Outside, when you said you heard someone coming... that was me.'
***
Four students plan to arrive late to their final exam so they can take it the next day
By the time they arrive the exam is almost over, so they head over to the professor to ask if they can take it the next day. They tell him they tried their best to come on time, but their tire blew out and it took too long to replace it.

The professor tells them, "Don't worry about it. You can take it today and, since there's almost no time left, you only have to answer one question. If you get it right, I'll give you an A on the test." The students, thinking this is even better than they thought, excitedly take their seats and look at the question:

Which tire blew out?
***
Jehovah's Witnesses don't celebrate Halloween.
I guess they don't appreciate random people knocking at their doors all the time.
***
Two immigrants from Africa arrive in the United States...
Two immigrants from Africa arrive in the United States and are discussing the difference between their country and the U.S. 

One of them mentions he's heard that people in the U.S. eat dogs, and if they're going to fit in, they better eat dogs as well. 

So they head to the nearest hot dog stand and order two 'dogs.' 

The first guy unwraps his, looks at it, and nervously looks at his friend. 

"Which part did you get?"


***
My blonde girlfriend froze
In the middle of love making so I gave her an interrogative facial expression. " oh..I saw this on youporn" she said," they call it bufferring".
***
My grandfather once told me, "Your generation is too reliant on technology."
My grandfather once told me, "Your generation is too reliant on technology."

So I replied, "No, *your* generation is too reliant on technology!"

Then I disconnected his life support.
***
A Mexican Magician...
...told his audience he'd disappear on the count of three.

He began counting "Uno, dos..."

And he disappeared without a tres.
***
My manly password
My wife and I were trying to set up a new password for our computer. 

Trying to be clever, I put "Mypenis" and my wife fell to the ground laughing hysterically because on the screen it said:

**"Error. Not long enough."**
***
Protesting dirty jokes
Annoyed by the professor of anatomy who liked to tell "naughty" stories during class, a group of female students decided that the next time he started to tell one, they would all rise and leave the room in protest. The professor, however, got wind of their scheme just before class the following day, so he bided his time. Then, halfway through the lecture, he began. "They say there is quite a shortage of prostitutes in France." The girls looked at one another, arose and started for the door. "Young ladies," said the professor with a broad smile, "the next plane doesn't leave till tomorrow afternoon."
***
A black man, a Muslim, and a Communist walk into a bar...
The bartender says, "Hello, Mr. President!"

Courtesy of my Fox News-watching mom...
***
So there's a girl on the beach with no arms and no legs...
So there's a girl on the beach with no arms and no legs. A good looking guy walks by and she says "Hey can you hug me I've never been hugged before." so the guy hugs her. She then says "Hey could you kiss me I've never been kissed before." so the guy gives her a kiss. Seeing an opportunity she says "Hey can you fuck me I've never been fucked before." The guy picks her up throws her in the ocean and yells "HEY WELL I GUESS YOU'RE FUCKED NOW!"
***
A woman playing golf
A woman playing Golf hit a man nearby. He put his hands together between his legs. Fell on the ground & rolled around in pain. She rushed to him & offered to relieve his pain as she was a Doctor.
Reluctantly he agreed.
She gently took his hands away. Unzipped his pants & put her hands inside.
She massaged him  tenderly for a few minutes & asked: "How does it feel?"
He replied: "Feels great but I still think my thumb is broken" 😜😜
***
True Story,
When I was a kid, my parents would always say "Excuse my French" just after a swear word. I'll never forget that first day at school when my teacher asked if any of us knew any French.

***
Isn't this whole Ashley Madison hack exactly what their users wanted?
To get fucked by a third party?
***
A man had 3 daughters.
A man had 3 daughters. 

The first daughter walks up to her dad and says "Daddy, why is my name Rose?"

"Because a rose petal fell on you when you were a baby." Replied the father. The first daughter smiles and skips off to play with her dolls.

The second daughter walks up to her dad and says "Daddy, why is my name Tulip?"
"Because a Tulip petal fell on you when you were a baby." Replied the father. The second daughter smiles and skips off to play with her dolls.

The third daughter walks up to her dad and says "Hhhhhnnngngngnggggddddddrrrrruhuuhuhhuhhuhdadgh!"

"...Go to your room cinderblock." Replied the father.


***
There are hundreds of features on a brand-new BMW; heated seats, bluetooth audio, laser-headlights, etc... Which among them goes completely ignored?
The turn signals.
***
My girlfriend said that if this get 1000 upvotes, we will try anal!
Please don't upvote, her strap-on is huge!
***
In Pokemon, I never understood why bug types were supereffective against dark types.
But then I thought about malaria in Africa and it all made sense.
***
I bought shoes from a drug dealer. I don't know what he laced them with but I've been tripping all day.

***
Parking Tickets

So the other day I went to the supermarket, and I was there for literally 5 minutes. When I came out there was a motorcycle cop writing a parking ticket. So I went up to him and said, "Come on, buddy, how about giving a guy a break?"

He ignored me and continued writing the ticket. So I called him a pencil-necked Nazi lover. He glared at me and started writing another ticket for worn tires!

So I then asked him if his psychiatrist makes him lie face down on the couch cause he's so ugly. He finished the second ticket and put it on the windshield with the first. Then he started writing a third ticket!

This went on for about 20 minutes... the more I insulted him, the more tickets he wrote. I didn't care. My car was parked around the corner.
***
A 2nd grade teacher decides to teach sex ed. to her class...
She starts out by drawing a penis on the chalk board and asks the class, "Does anyone know what this is?"

And little Johnny says, "Yes, my dad has 2 of them!"

And the teacher says, "Are you sure about that?"

And little Johnny says, "Yes, he uses a small skinny one to go to the bathroom, and a big long one to brush the babysitter's teeth."

***
Three Russians are sitting together in the train that takes them to the Gulag.
So one of them asks the two others: "So what did you do?"

The first one answers: "Well, I arrived late at the factory, and so they accused me of slowing down the Revolution and the victory of the Proletariat."

The second one answers: "Well, I arrived early at the factory, and so they accused me of wanting to be favored and promoted over my fellow workers."

Then they turn to the one who asked the question: "How about you, then?"

"Well, I arrived at the factory right on time, and so they accused me of having a watch from the West."
***
Anyone need a job?
I hear Malaysia Airlines is looking for people.






^im ^so ^sorry
***
How many Hilary Clinton supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
None- they prefer to be kept in the dark
***
A student goes to the principal
A student visits the principal's office. The principal asks: 
"What is your name, son?"
The student replies:
"D-d-d-dav-dav-david, sir."
Then the principal asks:
"Oh, do you have a stutter?"
Student answers:
"No sir, my dad has a stutter but the guy who registered my name was an asshole."

Edit: Shitty format because mobile.
***
I almost got busted for shoplifting candy today...
But I got out of it. I've got a couple of twix up my sleeve.
***
Jesus drove a Honda, but nobody knew about it.
For I did not speak of my own accord. - John 12:49
***
I asked my friend about his time in prison.
"I have mixed feelings. On one hand I was surrounded by the worst society had to offer. I shared cells with thieves, murderers, and rapists. On the other hand the prison library was filled with the best collection of literature that I've ever seen. I don't know. It has its prose and cons."
***
Hipsters
I had the joy of meeting a couple of hipsters today, and they yelled at me for making fun of them. Apparently the politically correct term is "conjoined twins".
***
So this guy goes to the Dr.
And the Dr says "You have to stop masturbating."

the guy says "Why?"

And the Dr says "Because I'm trying to examine you."
***
A translated Norwegian joke
Two guys meets in the middle of nowhere, trying to find their wives.
They decide to help each other out, by describing their wives.

The first man goes on: "My  wife is tall, well fit, blonde, got big firm breasts, thight bouncy ass, a massive lust for sex and a face of a model. How about yours"?

The second man replies: "She can go F**k herself, lets search for yours instead!"
***
Donald Duck wanted a divorce for Daisy
His lawyer tells Donald, "I am sorry, but you can't divorce Daisy just because she is insane."

Donald replies, "I never said she was insane. I said that she was fucking Goofy."
***
Arnold Schwarzenegger was asked if he wanted to upgrade to Windows 7..
His response was "I still love Vista, baby!"
***
The cashier at the local grocery store asked me if i wanted to donate 2$ to end world hunger, i was like HELL YEAH!
I had no idea we were this close! I'm gonna be a god damn hero!

Joke by Matt Donaher
***
Knock, Knock
Who's there? 

Dave. 

Dave who? 

Dave proceeds to burst into tears as his grandmothers Alzheimer's has progressed to the point where she can no longer recognize him.  
***
A little boy and his grandfather are raking leaves in the yard...
The little boy sees an earthworm trying to get back into its hole. He says, "Grandpa, I bet I can put that worm back in that hole." The grandfather replies, "I'll bet you five dollars you can't. It's too wiggly and limp to put back in that tiny hole." The little boy runs into the house and comes back out with a can of hair spray. He sprays the worm until it is straight and stiff as a board. The boy then proceeds to slip the dying worm back into the hole. The grandfather hands the little boy five dollars, grabs the hair spray and runs into the house. Thirty minutes later the grandfather comes back out and hands the boy another five dollars. The little boy says, "Grandpa, you already gave me five dollars." The grandfather replies, "I know. That's from Grandma."

***
Female hormones in beer
Yesterday, government scientists suggested that men should take a look at their beer consumption, considering the results of a recent analysis that revealed the presence of female hormones in beer. The theory is that drinking beer makes men turn into women. To test the finding, 100 men were fed 6 pints of beer each. It was then observed that 100% of the men gained weight, talked excessively without making sense, became overly emotional, couldn't drive, failed to think rationally, argued over nothing, and refused to apologize when wrong. No further testing is planned.
***
Donald Trump and Hillary Clinton are in a plane crash. Who survives?
America.
***
Old Soviet joke
People are waiting in a long line like to buy vodka. Finally one alcoholic snaps and screams - 'I can't take it, I'll go kill Gorbachev!' And leaves the store. 10 minutes later he come back and says. 'The line to kill Gorbachev is even longer.'
***
A Woman walks into a sex shop to buy a dildo
"I want that one.." She points to a massive display of dildos on the wall.


The manager picks up one of the best sellers: "This is one of our popular models. It feels very real."


She points back to the wall & says.."No. I want that one..." So, the manager picks up another one:
"Ah..this model just arrived. Comes with multiple vibration settings & textures but quite pricey.."

The woman's eyes light up when she finally sees a big, bright red shiny one at the corner of the wall display.



"That one! I want that. How much is it?"



The manager says: "Oh sorry. That's not for sale. That's the Fire Extinguisher".
***
Osama Bin Laden's son comes home from school crying...
He asks him: "What's wrong son, what happened?"

"The teacher asked the class what the tallest building in New York is, and I got the answer wrong."

"Why, what did you answer?"

"The Empire State Building."

"Don't worry son, daddy will take care of it."
***
A guy says to a librarian "I'd like a Big Mac, French Fries and a Coke"
The librarian says "I'm sorry sir but this is a library".

The guy says *whispering* "Oh, sorry, I'd like a Big Mac, French Fries and a Coke"
***
I met an older woman in a bar last night...
She looked pretty good for a 60-year-old. In fact, she wasn't too bad at all, and I found myself thinking she probably had a really hot daughter. We drank a couple of beers, and she asked if I'd ever had a Sportsman's Double? 'What's that? I asked. 'It's a mother and daughter threesome,' she said. As my mind began to embrace the idea, and I wondered what her daughter might look like. I said, 'No, I haven't.' We drank a bit more, then she said with a wink, 'tonight's your lucky night'. We went back to her place. We walked in. She put on the hall light and shouted upstairs: 'Mom...you still awake?'
***
A man buys a pet parrot and brings him home.
But the parrot starts insulting him and gets really nasty, so the man picks up the parrot and tosses him into the freezer to teach him a lesson. 

 He hears the bird squawking for a few minutes, but all of a sudden the parrot is quiet.  The man opens the freezer door, the parrot walks out, looks up at him and says, “I apologize for offending you, and I humbly ask your forgiveness.” The man says, “Well, thank you. I forgive you.”

 The parrot then says, “If you don’t mind my asking, what did the chicken do?”
***
I hoped that one day I would have a girlfriend with big tits
When I was 13, I hoped that one day I would have a girlfriend with big tits.

When I was 16, I got a girlfriend with big tits, but there was no passion, so I decided I needed a passionate girl with zest for life.
In college I dated a passionate girl, but she was too emotional.
Everything was an emergency; she was a drama queen, cried all the time and threatened suicide.

So I decided I needed a girl with stability.
When I was 25, I found a very stable girl but she was boring.
She was totally predictable and never got excited about anything. 
Life became so dull that I decided that I needed a girl with some excitement.

When I was 28, I found an exciting girl, but I couldn’t keep up with her. She rushed from one thing to another, never settling on anything. She did mad impetuous things and made me miserable as often as happy. She was great fun initially and very energetic, but directionless.

So I decided to find a girl with some real ambition. When I turned 30, I found a smart ambitious girl with her feet planted firmly on the ground, so I married her. She was so ambitious that she divorced me and took everything I owned.

I am older and wiser now, and I am looking for a girl with big tits.
***
A man goes to a brain store...
He asks the owner how much an accountant's brain sells for.

The owner tells him, "We sell that for $6 per pound of brain."

He then asks how much a doctor's brain sells for.

The owner tells him, "We sell that for $11 per pound of brain."

Finally, the man asks how much a politician's brain sells for.

The owner tells him, "We sell that for $1,000 per 4 oz of brain."

The man is astonished and asks why so much.

The owner tells him. "Do you know how many politicians we need to kill to find 1 oz of brain?"
***
The United States ruined Hiroshima. Which American city did Japan ruin?
Detroit
***
A man with a stutter is visiting the doctor....
A man with a stutter is visiting the doctor. 

"How's the stutter?", asks the doctor. 

"It's g-getting better. My mate calls me D-Donkey," replies the man.

"Any idea why?" The doctor asks.

"No, but he aw he aw he aw he always calls me that."
***
A senior citizen called her husband during his drive home.
"Herman, I just heard on the news that there's a car going the wrong way on Interstate 90, Please be careful!"

Herman said, "It's not just one car. There’s hundreds of them!"
***
Donald Trump has done so much good for American education.
Now instead of citing my sources on an English paper, I can just write down, "I know it, you know it, everybody knows it."
***
Wife has hearing problems
A old man thinks his wife is losing her hearing. He calls the doctor about it and the doctor says he can do a little experiment to determine the severity, "Ask her a question from the next room in a normal tone of voice, and keep asking while coming closer until she can hear you. That way you know the range of her hearing."
That night, he's sitting on his easy chair in the living room while his wife is in the kitchen cooking dinner. He estimates he's about 30 feet away. In a normal tone of voice, he says, "What's for dinner?"
She doesn't respond, so he gets up and walks to the kitchen doorway, about 20 feet away, and asks, "What's for dinner?"
She still doesn't respond so he walks 10 feet closer and asks, "What's for dinner?"
She still doesn't say anything, so he gets right up beside her and asks, "What's for dinner?"
She says, "For the fourth damn time we're having chicken!"
***
I was telling this girl about my ability to guess what day a woman was born just by feeling her boobs...
"Really?" she said, "Go on then...try." After about thirty seconds of fondling she lost patience and demanded "Come on, what day was I born?"

“Yesterday." I replied.
  
Edit: Obligatory "omg, cool, i guess. i got upvotes. yay. bye."
***
Three fourth grade boys get into a dick measuring contest...
The boys are white, black and Asian. They all three pull out their dongs and measure up. The winner ends up being the black dude by a long shot.

When the black boy goes home he goes up to his mom and says "mom! today I got into a contest with the boys where we measured our dicks and I won! Is it because I'm black??

She said "no Tyrone its because you're 18"

Edit: I need to go back to elementary for my yours...
***
Did you hear about the Italian chef that died?
He pasta way.
We cannoli do so much.
His legacy will be a pizza history.




Edit: Thank you for getting this on the front page!
***
Stats joke..
Three professors (a physicist, a chemist, and a statistician) are called in to see their dean. Just as they arrive the dean is called out of his office, leaving the three professors there. The professors see with alarm that there is a fire in the wastebasket.

The physicist says, "I know what to do! We must cool down the materials until their temperature is lower than the ignition temperature and then the fire will go out."

The chemist says, "No! No! I know what to do! We must cut off the supply of oxygen so that the fire will go out due to lack of one of the reactants."

While the physicist and chemist debate what course to take, they both are alarmed to see the statistician running around the room starting other fires. They both scream, "What are you doing?"

To which the statistician replies, "Trying to get an adequate sample size.

EDIT: this was a joke my stats prof told our class
***
Ruin a quote by attributing it to the wrong person
"Don't cry because it is over. Smile because it happened." -Adolf Hitler, 1945
***
A beautiful woman goes to see her doctor
After describing her symptoms, the doctor diagnoses her and recommends a suppository to treat her illness. The woman is uneasy about this and doctor offers to help her with it.

The next day the woman asks her husband for help with her suppository. She bends over, he places one hand on her shoulder and inserts the suppository into her.

"SHIT!" the woman screams. "Fuck!"

"I'm so sorry, honey. Did I hurt you?" the husband is frantic with worry.

"No." the woman replies. "I just realized that when the doctor did it he had both hands on my shoulders"
***
Forgot to bring my protein powder to the gym today
Guess I should've prepared whey in advance
***
A man was in bed with his Thai girlfriend...
A man was in bed with his Thai girlfriend. 


After having great sex, she spent the next hour just stroking his 
penis, something she had lovingly done on many occasions.


Rather enjoying it, he turns and asked her, "Why do you love doing that?"


She replied: "Because I really miss mine".
***
An insolent teenager stomps off to her room...
Teenager:  "And another thing - JIM MORRISON SUCKS!"

Dad:  "Hey! There'll be no slamming of the Doors in this house!"
***
No matter who wins the presidential election, it will be historic.
We'll either have the first female president, the first Jewish president, the first Canadian president, or the last president.﻿
***
Son: "Mom, Dad, I'm gay."
Mom: *Stares at Dad*

Dad: *Clenches fist*

Mom: "Don't!"

Dad: *Sweats Profusely*

Mom: "..."

Dad: "HI GAY, I'M DAD"


Edit: Yay top of r/jokes, #lifegoals Also formatting
***
A black guy, a white guy, and a Mexican guy were eying a hot chick from across a bar.
She notices them looking at her, so she walks up to them.She says, " I want a man that"s smart. Use the words LIVER and CHEESE in one sentence. "The black guy goes " I love to eat liver and cheese. "The white guy goes " I like to cook liver and cheese. "The Mexican guy goes up to the girl and tells the guys " Liver alone, cheese mine!!"
***
Sixty-nine (NSFW)
One day an old man decided to update his bedroom skills and surprise the wife, so he went to see a prostitute and asked her to teach him something new.

Prostitute: How about I teach you "69"?
Old man: What's that?
Prostitute: Just lay back and let me show you.

After getting into position, the man is really enjoying the new position when the prostitute accidentally farts.

Old man: What was that?
Prostitute: That was nogthing. Just keep going.

So they carry on a little longer until she lets another one really rip. This time the old man gets her off him and wants out.

Prostitute: What's wrong? Weren't you enjoying it?
Old man: I don't think I can handle another 67 of those.
***
All of the organs are deciding who should be in charge...
"I should be in charge," said the brain, "I run all the body's systems, without me nothing would happen."

"I should be in charge," said the heart, "I circulate oxygen and nutrients all over."

"No! I should be in charge," said the stomach, "I process the food that gives us energy."

"I should be in charge," said the legs, "without me the body couldn't go anywhere."

"I should be in charge," said the eyes, "I allow the body to see where it goes." 

"I should be in charge," said the anus, "I am responsible for waste removal."

All of the other body parts laughed at the anus and insulted him. So he shut down. Within a few days, the brain had a terrible headache, the stomach was bloated, the legs got wobbly, the eyes got watery, and the heart pumped toxic blood. They all decided that the anus should be the boss.

What is the moral of the story? Even though everybody else does all of the work, the ass hole is usually in charge. 

***
What do liquid Draino and a Dutch stripper have in common?
They both slowly remove clogs.

I'll see myself out... Hey, at least it was original.
Thanks for the gold !
***
Elderly Woman and Her Cat
An elderly woman sitting on her porch, petting her beloved cat. A genie walks up her sidewalk. "Ma'am, you have lived a happy and simple life, I wish to grant you three wishes." 

The woman smiles, "Oh, I have to think, well, I would like to be 18 again." The genie nods his head and she transforms into her 18 years old self. "I would like lots of money!" she wishes. He nods again and piles of gold and coins pile all beside her. The woman stops, "My cat here has been loyal and sweet, could you turn him into a young, handsome man?" The genie nods his head a third time and disappears. Turning around she sees a young man, fit, gorgeous and perfect. 

"Why hello" she says coyly. He looks at her, "Don't look at me, you had me neutered."
***
Father: When Abe Lincoln was your age he walked 9 miles to school and did homework by candlelight.
Son: When Lincoln was your age he was President.
***
France and Italy go to war. Who wins?
Neither. France surrenders and Italy switches sides
***
Have you heard of the turkish version of sudoku?
It's called a pseudo-coup.
***
I won $3 million on the Lottery this weekend. I decided to donate a quarter of it to Charity.
Now I have $2,999,999.75 and she has $.25

***
Just another blonde sex joke...
A blonde, brunette and redhead are sat in their local clinic, waiting to see the midwife, excitedly talking about the babies they are due to have.  
"I haven't checked, but I think mine will be a boy." Says the redhead. "I was on top."  
"In that case" starts the brunette, "I must be having a girl, because he went on top."  
The blonde suddenly starts crying, hysterically, and it takes her new friends a good five minutes to calm her down. Between sobs she mutters "I think I'm having puppies..."
***
Why does Wally (Waldo) always wear stripes?
Because he doesn't want to be spotted!

I'll let myself out.
***
I hate all the political correctness in recent years.
I can't even say "black paint" anymore, I have to say "hey Jamal, would you please go paint that fence over there?"
***
A man is in bed with his Thai girlfriend.
A man is in bed with his Thai girlfriend.
After having great sex, she spends the next hour just stroking his penis, something she had lovingly done on many occasions.
Rather enjoying it, he turns and asks her, 'Why do you love doing that?'
She replies: 'Because I really miss mine'
***
In 1940 Goebbels made a speech...
Proclaiming that the Swastika was an example of the Golden Ratio.

Turns out it was a fibbin' Nazi...
***
Why don't Italians do bondage?
Because they can't say the safeword while they're wearing handcuffs.
***
What's the difference between Santa Claus and the Jews?
Santa goes *down* the chimney. 
***
A Portuguese, a Greek, and a Spaniard go into a brothel. Who pays?
Germany. 
***
I am friends with 25 letters from the alphabet
I don't know y  
  
  
EDIT: Credits to Chris Turner.
***
What do you call a group of confused Spanish speaking racists?
The ¿Qué Qué Qué?
***
Prostate Exam
After my recent Prostate Exam - one of the most thorough examinations I've ever had –
the Doctor left the room and the nurse came in.
After she shut the door, she asked me a question I didn't want to hear....

She said...."Who was that guy?"  
***
Jack and Jill went up the hill
So Jack could lick Jill's fanny.
Jack got a shock
and a mouthful of cock
'cause Jill's a goddam tranny! 
***
Two friends are out at the lake..
One of the guys pulls out this really, really long lighter. And his friend says, "Hey, that's a cool lighter. Where'd you get it?" 
He says, "Oh, I've got this magic genie in a lamp. You know, rub the lamp, get a wish." 
Friend goes, "Well shit, man! Don't hold out! I want a wish!" 
"Okay, man, but I have to warn you.. This genie is *really* old.."
"All right, whatever, just give me a wish."

So he rubs the lamp, the genie comes out, and grants him a wish. He says, "I want a million bucks!" 
"Your wish is granted," says the genie, he disappears into the lamp, and suddenly a million *ducks* descend upon this lake. The guy is baffled and says, "Hey, what's the deal? I asked for a million *bucks*, not a million *ducks*.." 

His friend replies, "Dude, you think I asked for a 12-inch *Bic*?"
***
My son was so upset when he didn't get a gaming pc for his birthday
luckily, this playstation was able to..........console him
***
Bill Clinton steps off of a helicopter onto the White House lawn
He's carrying a pig under each arm. A marine who's there to greet him says, "Nice pigs, sir!" Clinton responds, "Thank you! I got one for Hillary and one for Chelsea." The marine replies, "Nice trade, sir!"
***
Three Pregnant Women Are Sitting On A Bench
And each of them is knitting a sweater for their unborn child. The first mother digs into her purse pops a pill and says, “That was some Vitamin A, and my child will grow up to be big and strong!” The second woman also reaches into her purse – swallows a pill and exclaims, “That was Vitamin C, and my child will grow up to be incredibly smart!” The third woman pops her pill and says, “That was Thalidomide, I can’t the get arms right on this fucking sweater.” 
***
You don't need a parachute to go skydiving.
You need a parachute to go skydiving twice.
***
A string of jokes I heard a while ago
How do you get four elephants in a mini cooper?

Two in the front, two in the back.


How do you get four giraffes in a mini cooper?

You can't because of all the elephants.


How do you get two whales in a mini cooper?

Same way you get to Wales in any other car, down the M4, over the Severn Bridge.


How can you tell if there's an elephant in your fridge?

Footprints in the butter.


How can you tell if there are two elephants in your fridge?

You can hear them giggle when the lights go out.


How can you tell if there are three elephants in your fridge?

You can't *quite* get the door closed.


How can you tell if there are four elephants in your fridge?

There's a mini cooper parked outside.
***
Why wasn't Jesus born in Ireland?
They couldn't find 3 wise men and a virgin. 
***
Waking up on a Monday morning...
On a Monday morning, a mother went in to wake up her son.  
"Wake up son. It's time to got to school!"  
"But mom, I don't want to go."  
"Give me two reasons why."  
"Well, the kids hate me, and the teachers hate me too!"  
"That's no reason. Come now get ready."  
"Give me two reasons why I should go?"  
"Well for one you are 52 years old. And for another, you're the principal!".
***
An eccentric philosophy professor gave a one question final exam after a semester dealing with a broad array of topics.
The class was already seated and ready to go when the professor picked up his chair, plopped it on his desk and wrote on the board: "Using everything we have learned this semester, prove that this chair does not exist."   

Fingers flew, erasers erased, notebooks were filled in furious fashion. Some students wrote over 30 pages in one hour attempting to refute the existence of the chair. One member of the class however, was up and finished in less than a minute.   

Weeks later when the grades were posted, the rest of the group wondered how he could have gotten an A when he had barely written anything at all. His answer consisted of two words:   

"What chair?"


***
A little boy is dragging a dead frog on a leash and goes to a whore house...
He walks in and asks the head mistress specifically for a whore with an std. The mistress confused asks the little boy why. The little boy says, "well when I go home my parents will go out and leave me with a babysitter and she will have sex with me and get it, then when my parents get home my dad will take the babysitter home, bang her on the way and get it, then he will get home and give it to my mom, then when my dad goes to work tomorrow she will have sex with the mailman and give it to him and that's the asshole that ran over my pet frog.
***
What do women put on their ears to look more attractive?...
Their knees.

(Not sure if this one translates well to english)



EDIT: Wow guys I didn't think you would like this joke that much. This was something I read on a book like 6 years ago. Thanks! 
***
Swearing for the first time
A 5 yr old was in his room with his 3 yr old brother. He says "Charlie, I think we should start swearing.. If everyone else can do it, so can we". So they go downstairs to breakfast, where their mother is waiting for them. She asks what they would like for breakfast. The 5 yr old says "Coco pops, bitch". The mother screams at him and sends him up to his room, crying, without any breakfast. The mother turns to the younger child and asks "Well, what do you want?"

"I dunno, but it won't be fucking coco pops"
***
So a Black guy walks into a bar with a beautiful parrot on his shoulder...
The bartender says "Wow, that's something real special you've got there! Where'd you get it?"

"Africa!", says the parrot. 
***
Effective immediately, the navy is only conscripting non-swimmers.
They defend the ships much more eagerly. 

Edit: an adverb. 
***
"Mom? Don't freak out, but I'm in the hospital..."
"Peter, you've been a doctor for over 8 years now, please stop starting every phone conversation we have with that."
***
Burglars are getting very clever these days..
Last night, my wife woke me up..

*Darling! Darling! There's a burglar downstairs!!*

So I go down, check every room and don't find anyone.

Then I realised I don't have a wife and when I went back upstairs my bed and tv were gone.
***
What is the most sensitive part of a mans anatomy while he's masturbating?
His ears.

Oooo! I get to say it! "Front page?! Wow! Thanks y'all!" Oh yea, and "RIP my inbox"
Good times!  

***
Little Johnny asked god a question.
Johnny: Is it true that a billion years for us is just a second for you?

God: Why, yes it's absolutely true!

Johnny: Is it also true that a billion dollars for us is just a penny for you?

God: You're absolutely right!

Johnny: Well in that case, may I have a penny?

God: Absolutely! Just give me a second.
***
What did the Scottish epileptic boy get for Christmas?
A Wii fit
***
An Amish joke.

An Amish boy and his father were visiting a mall. They were amazed by almost everything they saw, but especially by two shiny, silver walls that could move apart and back together again. 
The boy asked his father, "What is this father?" The father (never having seen an elevator) responded, "Son, I have never seen anything like this in my life, I don't know what it is." 
While the boy and his father were watching wide-eyed, an old lady limping slightly with a cane slowly walks up to the moving walls and pressed a button. The walls opened and the lady walks between them and into a small room. The walls closed and the boy and his father watched, small circles of light with numbers above the wall light up. 
They continued to watch the circles light up in the reverse direction. 
The walls opened up again and a beautiful 24-year-old woman stepped out. 
The father said to his son, "Go get your Mother."
***
A joke told by an old man.
I was speaking to an old man at the grocery store yesterday when he told me something interesting about the olden days of america. 

Old man: Son, back in the day my mother could give me a dollar and I could run to the store and get myself a candy bar and a soda pop, and still have money left over to buy the milk my mom asked me to get. 

Me: Sucks you can not do that today!

Oldman: Yeah, I know son! Now a days, there is just way to much security . . .
***
A couple take their son to the circus....
After a while the father gets up to get some popcorn. While he is away the little boy notices something hanging down between the elephants legs. "Mommy, what is that hanging down on the elephant?", the boy asks. The embarrassed mother says "Oh, that's nothing honey", and is relieved when the father returns with the popcorn. Not satisfied with the mother's answer the little boy waits until his mother leaves to use the bathroom and asks his father "Dad, what is that hanging down between the elephant's legs?". Dad answers, " That's the elephant's penis". The little boy says, "Well how come when I asked mom she said that it was nothing?". Dad leans back and says "Son, I've spoiled that woman....."
***
So I was in bed with this woman and she said, "Not in the ass."
I said, "Hey, it’s my thumb, it’s my ass. If you don’t like it, go in the other room."

— Garry Shandling 
***
I recently came out as pansexual.
But I'm only attracted to cast iron.

I've tried dating teflon, but it never sticks.

I guess it's true what they say:

"Once you go black, you never go back"
***
The police just released a statement that someone is going around pickpocketing midgets.
I'm surprised someone could stoop so low.﻿
***
How do you know that Darth Vader isn't a black man underneath the mask?
He claims to be your father.

Edit: it's just a joke, not a dick. Don't take it so hard.
***
The kindness of strangers
An old lady on a bus offers the driver some peanuts. The driver, being polite, accepts and munches them.

Every 5 minutes she gives him a handful more peanuts.

Driver : Why don't you eat them yourself ?

Old lady : I can't chew them. Look, I have no teeth.

Driver : Then why do you buy them ?

Old lady : Oh, I just love the chocolates around them.
***
A knight and his men return to their castle...
...after a long hard day of fighting.

"How are we faring?" asks the king.

"Sire," replies the knight, "I have been robbing and pillaging on your behalf all day, burning the towns of your enemies in the west."

"What?!" shrieks the king. "I don't have any enemies to the west!"

"Oh," says the knight. "Well, you do now."
***
Worst joke I've ever heard
What is the difference between Hitler and the Boston Bombers?

One of them actually ended a race.

***
Dramatic Arts
Little Charlie has had his dreams set on becoming an actor, and, finally, he lands a part in the school play.  He runs home after school to tell his dad.  "That's fantastic!" his father replies.  "Who do you play?" he asks.  "Dad, I play a guy who's been married for twenty years!"  His dad plants a hand on Charlie's shoulder, smiling sweetly, and says, "Maybe next time you'll get a speaking part."
***
What an answer
A pilot is flying a small single engine plane with a lot of really important execs on board into Seattle airport. There is fog so thick that visibility is 10m, and his instruments are out. He circles looking for a landmark and after an hour, he is low on fuel and his passengers are very nervous. 

At last, through a small opening in the fog he sees a tall building with one guy working alone on the fifth floor. 

Circling, the pilot banks and shouts through his open window: Hi, where am I?" 

The solitary office worker replies: "You're in an airplane." 

The pilot executes a swift 275 degree turn and executes a perfect blind landing on the runway five miles away. Just as the plane stops, the engines cough and die from lack of fuel. The stunned passengers asked the pilot how he did it. 

"Simple," replies the pilot, "I asked the guy in that building a simple question. The answer he gave me was 100 percent correct but absolutely useless; therefore, that must be Microsoft's support office, and from there, the airport is just 5 miles away on a bearing of 87 degrees!"
***
The shop assistant
The bakery owner hires a young female shop assistant who liked to wear very short skirts and thong panties.One day a young man enters the store, glances at the shop assistant & at the loaves of bread behind the counter.Noticing her short skirt and the location of the raisin bread, he has a brilliant idea. "I'd like some raisin bread please," the man says.The shop assistant nods & climbs up a ladder to reach the raisin bread located on the very top shelf.The man standing almost directly beneath her is provided with an excellent view, just as he thought.When she descends the ladder, he decides that he had better get two loaves.As the shop assistant retrieves the second loaf of bread, one of the other male customers notices what's going on and requests his own loaf of raisin bread.After many trips she is tired & irritated & begins to wonder, "Why the unusual interest in the raisin bread?"Atop the ladder one more time, she looks down & glares at the men standing below. Then, she notices an elderly man standing amongst the crowd.Thinking that she can save herself another trip, she yells at the elderly man, "Is it raisin for you too?""No," he stammers, "But it's quiverin' a little!!!"
***
A Irishman, Mick goes to the doctor complaining of stomach pain...
Doctor: "Well I cant find anything wrong with you , it must be the drinking"
Mick : "Ill come back when you're sober Doctor"
***
So I recently went to Australia...
I want to Australia for holiday.  
I was at the airport and one of security people asks me: "Do you have a criminal record?"  
I responded: "Oh. I didn't realise that was still a requirement."
***
WHY I AM SO TIRED
For a couple years I've been blaming it on iron poor blood, lack of vitamins, dieting and a dozen other maladies.
Now I found out the real reason. I'm tired because I'm overworked.
The population of this country is 237 million.
104 million are retired. That leaves 133 million to do the work.
There are 85 million in school, which leave 48 million to do the work.
Of this, there are 29 million employed by the federal government.
This leaves 19 million to do the work.
Four million are in the Armed Forces, which leaves 15 million to do the work.
Take from the total the 14,800,000 people who work for State and City Government and that leaves 200,000 to do the work.
There are 188,000 in hospitals, so that leaves 12,000 to do the work.
Now, there are 11,998 people in Prisons. That leaves just two people to do the work.
You and me . . . and you're sitting there reading jokes.
***
I went to a job interview at EA
The interviewer, after reading my CV, said:

"I see that this CV was clearly printed on two pages, but I only have one. Where's the other one?"

"Page two is 19.99$"
***
What's the difference in a dirty bus station and a lobster with breast implants?
Ones a crusty bus station, the others a busty crustacean. 
***
I want to repaint my room a shade of white...
...but I can't decide between "eggshell", "beige", or "2016 Oscars".
***
What do you call a group of men in a flying car having unsatisfying sexual intercourse with a single woman because they feel sorry for her?
A shitty pity gangbang. 
***
I went to a new doctor the other day and found the doctor to be a young, drop-dead gorgeous female!
I was embarrassed, but she said, "Don't worry, I'm a professional - I've seen it all before, Just tell me what's wrong and I'll help you in any way I can." I said, "I think my penis tastes funny..."
***
TIL that Rick Astley will let you borrow any movie from his Pixar collection, except one.
He's never gonna give you Up 
***
A man sees an attractive girl sitting alone
At a restaurant, a man sees an attractive girl sitting alone at the next table.

Suddenly, she sneezes, and a glass eye comes flying out of her eye socket. It hurls by the man, and he snatches it from the air and hands it back to her.

"This is so embarrassing," the girl says, and she pops her eye back in place. 

"I'm sorry to have disturbed you. Let me buy a drink to make it up to you. May I join you?" 

He agrees.

The girls is good at keeping conversation, stunningly pretty, and the man finds they have a lot in common. 

He asks her phone number and then he compliments her: 

"You are the most charming girl I've ever encountered. Are you this nice to every guy you meet?"

"No", she replies. "You just happened to catch my eye."
***
An airline employee makes the final boarding call for a flight.
After she finished the announcement, she spots a man running down the concourse towards the gate.  He runs through the boarding area, hurdles a row of empty chairs, and stops at the podium, almost out of breath.  

"You just made it!" she says. "Do you have your boarding pass?"

"Oh, this isn't my flight," the man says.  "I just wanted to tell you that I'm vegan."
***
Bought some shoes from my drug dealer.
idk what he laced them with but I've been tripping all day 
***
A guy realizes it's been a while and he has a little money, so he goes to the whorehouse and asks for whatever he can get for it...
The madam tells him to wait in room 102 and he will be taken care of.

He is waiting for a while, when a chicken starts pecking at the window. 

It keeps pecking so he lets it in and the chicken flutters in, struts over to the bed, hops up, and turns its head to look back at him.

He's really confused but really horny so he thinks maybe this is what he could afford. 

He decides to fuck the chicken. 

It was no easy task and he wound up with some bites and scratches, but it was worth it. 

A girl walks in as he is doing up his pants. 

She asks if he is leaving and he tells her "Yes, I'm a satisfied customer."

The next week he has even less money, but hopes the whorehouse can provide something. 

The madam says the best he can get for that price is room 202.

He enters the dark empty room where a bunch of guys are laying face down on the floor. 

He realizes that they are looking through holes, watching people have sex in the room below. 

He picks a spot to watch and gets very aroused seeing a girl get railed from behind while she sucks another guy off. 

He turns to the older man next to him and says "Wow, this is crazy."

The old guy replies "This is nothing, last week some maniac was fucking a chicken."
***
I took a taxi the other night
A couple of nights ago, I was out for a few drinks with some friends and had a few too many beers and then topped it off with a margarita. Not a good idea.

Knowing full well I was at least slightly over the limit, I did something I've never done before: I took a taxi home

Sure enough i pass a police road block but because it was a taxi they waved it past. 

I arrived home safely without incident, which was a real surprise.

I have never driven a taxi before, am not sure where i got it.
***
An 85 year old man had to go to the doctor for a sperm count.
The doctor gave the man a jar and said, "Take this jar home and bring back a semen sample tomorrow." The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor's office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day. The doctor asked, what happened and the man explained. "Well, doc, it's like this--first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin' it between her knees, but still nothing." The doctor was shocked! "You asked your neighbor?" The old man replied, "Yep, none of us could get the jar open.
***
An 85-year-old man was requested by his Doctor to have a sperm count as part of his physical exam.
The doctor gave the man a jar and said, 'Take this jar home and bring back a semen sample tomorrow.' 

The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor's office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day.

The doctor asked what happened and the man explained, 'Well, doc, it's like this --- first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. 

Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. 

We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin' it between her knees, but still nothing.'

The doctor was shocked and said, “asked your neighbor?”

The old man replied, 'Yep, none of us could get the jar open.

***
What's the difference between a genealogist and a gynecologist?
A genealogist looks up the family tree, a gynecologist looks up the family bush. (Credit to my uncle)
***
Physics Joke
A photon walks into a hotel and the bellman says "can I help you with your bags?" And the photon replies, "no it's ok, I'm traveling light."
***
Two nuns are biking back to their convent
after a long day out nunning about in the community.  

They take a different route than normal, and after a while, one says to the other: "You know, I've never come this way before."

The other replies: "Yes, it must be the cobblestones"
***
A teacher asks her class to use 'contagious' in a sentence
A teacher asks her class to use the word 'contagious' in a sentence. Sally, the class genius, raises her hand and says, "Last year I got the mumps, and my mom said it was contagious."

"Very good," says the teacher. "Would anyone else like to try?"

Little Johnny raises his hand and stands to give his answer.

"Our mean next door neighbor was painting her house by hand, and my dad said it would take the contagious.
***
A wife gives her husband a cheating test.
A man's wife wanted to know how her husband would react if she was to just up and leave one day so she came up with a  way to trick her husband into thinking she had left. She wrote a note saying how she was tired of living with him and doesn't want to put up with him anymore. She left the note on the kitchen counter and hid under the bed and waited for her husband to come home. 

Her husband soon came home, saw the note and wrote something on it. Immediately he started dancing and singing while changing into another pair of clothes. He than proceeds to dial someone and says: Hey babe the idiot finally had enough of me,  I was so stupid to marry her wish I found you first,  I'll be over in 10 minutes! He than rushes out the door and drives off in his car. 

The wife comes out from under the bed,  tears in her eyes goes to read what her husband had wrote on the note,  it said; " I can see your feet sticking out from under the bed idiot,  I have gone to buy some beer."
***
An 85-year-old man had to take a sperm count for his physical exam
The doctor gave the man a jar and said, "Take this jar home and bring back a semen sample tomorrow." The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor's office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day. The doctor asked, what happened and the man explained. "Well, doc, it's like this--first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin' it between her knees, but still nothing." The doctor was shocked! "You asked your neighbor?" The old man replied, "Yep, none of us could get the jar open.
***
I took the batteries out of my carbon monoxide detector today
The loud beeping was giving me a headache and making me feel sick and dizzy.
***
What do you call it when a banana eats another banana?
Canabananalism

EDIT: Thanks for all the support, only my second reddit post and I'm surprised this got as many upvote a as it did!
***
I Was Sitting On A Train Next To A Hot Thai Girl
I Thought To Myself, 'Please don't get an erection, Please don't get an erection'. But She Did. 
***
Police stop old man.
Ron Chestna 89 years of age was stopped by the police around 2 a.m. and was asked where he was going at that time of night .

Ron replied, "I'm on my way to a lecture about alcohol abuse and the effects it has on the human body, as well as smoking and staying out late."
 
The officer asked, "Really? Who's giving that lecture at this time of night?"
 
Ron replied, "That would be my wife."
***
I was walking into Best Buy...
When I saw a dwarf walking out carrying a flat screen TV. I asked him, "Are you going to be able to carry that TV by yourself?" He screams back, " Fuck you! It's an iPad!"
***
I followed Dwayne Johnson for an hour and when he wasn't looking I slapped his arse. He turned around and punched me in the face.
That's what happens when you hit rock bottom. 
***
I went to the doctor’s office the other day and found out that my new doctor is a young female and drop dead gorgeous.
I was embarrassed, but she said, “Don't worry, I am a professional.  I've seen it all before.  Just tell me what’s wrong and I'll check it out."
 
I said, “My wife thinks that my dick tastes funny”.
***
Sitting on a park bench
One day a kid was sitting on a park bench eating one candy bar after another. 

An older man walks up and notices the young boy and says, "you shouldn't be eating all those candy bars, they aren't good for you."

The young boy looks at the man and replies, "did you know my grandad lived to be a 108 years old?"

The man replies, "well did he eat candy bars every day?"

And the kid replied, "no, he minded his own fucking business."
***
Hunter goes bear hunting.
A hunter goes to the forest. He sees a bear and fires at it, but misses. The bear is nowhere to be seen. 

Suddenly the bear taps him on his shoulder and says, "You tried to kill me, either I'll kill you or pull down your trousers and let me fuck you". The man chose life. 

He goes home embarrassed, buys a bigger gun and goes back to hunt the bear. He sees it at a distance, fires, misses, the bear disappears in the thick brush only to pop up behind him a little later. The bear recognizes the hunter and says, "You know the choices." 

The hunter, after being fucked again, brings a bazooka to get over his humiliation. He finds the bear, fires and falls back due to recoil. The smoke clears and the bear is standing over him, rubbing it's chin. "You don't come here for hunting, do you?" 
***
What's the difference between a bad golfer and a bad skydiver?
One goes \*whack* "Fuck."

The other goes "Fuck." \*whack*
***
An 85-year-old man had to take a sperm count for his physical exam
An 85-year-old man had to take a sperm count for his physical exam. The doctor gave the man a jar and said, “Take this jar home and bring back a sample tomorrow.”

The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor’s office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day.

The doctor asked, what happened and the man explained.

“Well, doc, it’s like this–first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin’ it between her knees, but still nothing.”

The doctor was shocked! “You asked your neighbor?”

The old man replied, “Yep, none of us could get the jar open.”
***
Who led the Jews across a semi-permeable membrane?
osMoses
***
What do you call three Irish lumberjacks?
Tree fellers
Edit: Wooo gold!
***
How does Stephen Hawking have sex?
Enter, backspace, enter, backspace, enter, backspace...
***
You know how sometimes...
You know how sometimes even when you're not hungry you'll get tempted to eat something just because it's in front of you?﻿ ﻿   
  
Well, that's how I lost my job as a gynecologist.
***
My 5 year olds painful twist on a knock knock joke.
I was telling my son the "knock knock who's there banana joke", and he laughed and told me to tell it to him again. As I said knock knock he then backhanded my face and said "you shouldn't stand so close to the door"
***
A 10 year old Irish boy
stands crying at the side of the road. A man passing by asks 'What’s wrong, lad?' The boy says 'Me ma died this morning.' 'Oh bejaysus,' The man says. 'Do you want me to call Father O'Riley for you?' The boy replies, 'No tanks mister, sex is the last ting on my mind at the moment.'
***
A linguistics professor says during a lecture....
A linguistics professor says during a lecture that 'In English, a double negative forms a positive.

But in some languages, such as Russian, a double negative is still a negative.
 
However, in no language in the world can a double positive form a negative.'

But then a voice from the back of the room piped up, 'Yeah, right.
***
My wife said she would leave me if I didn't stop making Pokémon references...
'You need to make a choice' she said 'It's either me or the stupid pokémon references!'

'I understand', I replied, holding back tears. 'Sandra, I choose you!!!'




***
A group of accountants and a group of engineers take a trip together on a train
The 3 accountants each buy tickets, but the 3 engineers only buy one ticket to share. "How do you think that's going to work?" asks one of the accountants. "You'll see.", an engineer responds.

As the train leaves the station, all 3 of the engineers pile into a bathroom and when the conductor knocks on the door, one arm comes out through a narrow crack in the door to give him the ticket.

The accountants all agree that this is a great way to save money, so on the return trip, the accountants only buy one ticket, but the engineers don't buy any tickets. "How do you think that's going to work?" asks an accountant. "You'll see." responds an engineer.

As the train leaves the station, all three accountants pile into one bathroom and an engineer knocks on the door and says "Ticket, please.".

***
A woman arrived at a party
A woman arrived at a party & while scanning the guests she spotted an attractive man standing alone. She approached him smiled and said, "Hello. My name is Carmen." 

"That's a beautiful name," he replied. "Is it a family name?" 

"No," she replied. "As a matter of fact I gave it to myself. It represents the things that I enjoy the most - cars and men. Therefore I chose Carmen."
"What's your name?" she asked. 

He answered "B.J. Titsengolf."

***
Cheap Parrot
Cheap Parrot

A woman went to a pet shop & immediately spotted a large, beautiful parrot. There was a sign on the cage that said $50.00, which seemed awfully cheap. 

"Why so little," she asked the pet store owner. 

The owner looked at her seriously and said, "Look, I should tell you first that this bird used to live in a house of Prostitution and sometimes it says some pretty vulgar stuff." 

The woman thought about this, but decided she had to have the bird anyway. She took it home and hung the bird's cage up in her living room and waited for it to say something. The bird looked around the room, then at her, and said, "New house, new madam." 

The woman was a bit shocked at the implication, but then found it kind of amusing. 

When her 2 teenage daughters returned from school, the bird saw them enter and said, "New house, new madam, new girls." 

The girls and the woman were a bit offended but then began to laugh about the situation considering how and where the parrot had been raised. 

Moments later, the woman's husband came home from work. 

The bird looked at him and said, "Hi, Bob!" 
***
my 14 year old came back with this after his biology class
Q. who was the Jewish prophet that led the water molecules across the partially permeable membrane?
A. osmoses
***
(NSFW) A 90-year old man walks into a church confessional...
'Father,' he says, 'I'm 90 years old...been married for 70 years. Yesterday two college girls picked me up at the store. We drove to a motel and I fucked them both!'
'And are you remorseful?' asks the priest.
'Hell no.'
'So then what do you think of these sins?' the priest asks.
'What sins?' asks the man.
After a slight pause the priest says, 'my son, what kind of Catholic are you?'
'I'm not, I'm an Atheist.'
Confused, the priest finally asks, 'so why are you telling me this?'
'Are you kidding?' replies the man. 'I'm 90 years old and I fucked two young girls at once. I'm telling EVERYBODY!'

Edit: proper paragraphing an such
***
So a naked woman walks into a bar and asks for a beer...
The bartender stares at her body from head to toe then serves her a beer. She drinks it and asks for another beer. The bartender stares at her for longer and serves her a second beer. The woman again drinks it and asks for a third beer.

Then the bartender starts to look at her with an amused expression, until the woman says:

-- What, have you never seen a naked woman before?

-- That I have, miss. I'm wondering where you're keeping the money to pay for the beers.
***
I've just discovered the quickest way to call a family meeting.
I turned off the WiFi router and simply waited in the room where it's located.

***
Went out with a bang...
A tough old cowboy with grizzled hair, chiseled featured, and hands tougher than the sharpest barbs on new wire told his grandson that the secret to living a long life was to sprinkle a pinch of gun powder on his oatmeal every morning.

 With absolute faith, the grandson did as Grandpap instructed. Every morning for the rest of his life, he added a pinch of gun powder to his oatmeal. 

 He grew up, lived happily, enjoyed perfect health, and died at the ripe old age of 107.

 According to the story in the newspaper, he left behind 14 children, 30 grandchildren, 45 great-grandchildren, 25 great-great-grandchildren, and a 15-foot crater where the crematorium used to be.
***
An ancient Greek walks into a tailors with a torn pair of pants:
"Euripides?" Asks the tailor.

"Yeah, Eumenides?" Replies the man.
***
Knock knock.. (feat. My 9yo brother)
Knock knock..  

\*sigh..\* Who's there?  

Interrupting doctor  

Interrupting doct--  

You have cancer.
***
In Flint, Michigan, students have no difficulty learning A — G and P — Z.

The problem’s H to O.
***
What does a Russian woman say to stop her husband from abusing her?
Vladislov, baby don't hurt me, don't hurt me, no more...


I'm sorry..
***
I met this girl the other day and she
took me back to her house where things got hot and heavy very quickly. 

 I bent her over the kitchen table and started going at it when suddenly we heard the front door open. 

“Oh shit , it’s my boyfriend ! ” she exclaimed “Quick, use the backdoor” . 

Now it’s at about this time I probably should have left..... 
 ......but you just don’t get an offer like that every day. 

***
Three boys are in the schoolyard bragging of how great their fathers are.
The first one says, "Well, my father runs the fastest. He can fire an arrow, and start to run, I tell you, he gets there before the arrow."

The second boy says, "Ha! You think that's fast! My father is a hunter. He can shoot his gun and be there before the bullet!"

The third one listens to the other two and shakes his head. He then says, "You two know nothing about speed. My father works in the Govt department. He stops working at 5:00 and he is home by 3:45!!"
***
Why did the Broncos wear white jerseys in Super Bowl 50?
Because it's hard to catch a white bronco in California.
***
What does Donald Trump tell Barack Obama supporters?
Orange Is The New Black
***
An old guy walks into a church...
"- Father, I'm 92 years old, am married to a 70 year old wife and have 3 children, 7 grandchildren and 6 great-grandchildren. Yesterday, I gave a ride to 2 young college girls; they were beautiful, nice, modern, you know? After a little chit chat we stop by a motel. I had sex with each one of them 3 times."

The priest remains silent for a few moments, but seeing that the old guy doesn't have anything else to say, he asks:

"- Are you regretful of your sins?"

"- What sins?"

"- What kind of catholic are you?!"

"- Catholic? Me? I'm an atheist."

"- Then why come here and tell me that story?"

"- I'm telling everybody."
***
Yesterday while working I saw a gigantic funeral precession...
There were two hearses, followed by a man walking a dog, followed by hundreds of men.

I take a break from work and say to the man walking the dog " excuse me sir, I don't mean to be rude but do you mind telling me what happened?"

The man replies:
"A couple of weeks ago I bought this dog for my wife. Last week it turned on her and killed her. During the attack my mother in law tried to pull the dog off of her daughter and ended up dying as well"

I say : " sir can I borrow you dog?"

He replies : "Get in line "
***
How is an American teen girl different from an Arab teen girl.
An American teen girl gets stoned *before* she has sex. 
***
In honor of 3/14... TIL the man who discovered Pi had his wife, Edith, leave him over his obsession with math.
Which just goes to show you, you can't have your Pi and Edith too.
***
What do you call a bodybuilding Mexican who's run out of protein?
No whey Jose.
***
Iran bans Americans from traveling there.
Won't beheading there anymore
***
First day of school
On the first day of college, the dean addressed the students, pointing out some of the rules: "The female dormitory will be out-of-bounds for all male students, and the male dormitory will be off limits to the female students. Anybody caught breaking this rule will be fined $20 the first time. Anybody caught breaking this rule the second time will be fined $60. Being caught a third time will cost you $180. Are there any questions?"
One student raised his hand and asked, "How much for a season pass?"
***
Hey did you hear about the chameleon that couldn't change color?
It had a reptile dysfunction
***
Deaf sex...

Two deaf people get married and during the first week of marriage they find that they are unable to communicate in the bedroom with the lights out since they can't see each other signing, or read lips. After several nights of fumbling around and many misunderstandings, the wife figures out a solution.
She writes a note to her husband: 'Honey, Why don't we agree on some simple signals? For instance, at night, if you want to have sex with me, reach over and squeeze my left breast one time. If you don't want to have sex, reach over and squeeze my right breast two times.
The husband thinks this is a great idea. He writes back to his wife That if she wants to have sex with him, reach over and pull on his penis one time. If she doesn't want to have sex, pull on his penis two hundred and fifty times.


***
A Greek and a Italian are having a beer.
The Greek Says
"You know, we invented sex."
Then the Italian turn's and looks at him.
"Well we brought women into it."
***
I knew that sexual fetishes could get more and more perverse over time, but...
...it wasn't till I spanked a statue that I knew I'd hit rock bottom.
***
The Cheesiest Joke I Know
What did the cracker say to the slice of cheddar?

"Say, you're looking mighty sharp today!"

To which the cheddar replied,

"Fuck you, white boy."
***
The first time I introduced a girlfriend to my grandpa.
"What's your name again?"

"Claudia."

"Oh *Claudia*. I'm sorry my dear, I won't forget it again. Claudia may I ask you something?"

"Sure."

"Do you know the difference between sex and breakfast?"

"...Um, no.?"

"Would you like to have breakfast sometime?"
***
My mom told me that I objectify women.
When she asked me why I broke up with my last girlfriend I said "it didn't work out." She said "be more specific." I said "I just told you she didn't exercise."
***
A woman gets on a bus with her baby. The bus driver says: ''Ugh, that's the ugliest baby I've ever seen!''
The woman walks to the rear of the bus and sits down, fuming. She says to a man next to her: ''The driver just insulted me!'' 

The man says: ''You go up there and tell him off. Go on, I'll hold your monkey for you.''
***
TIL that in 1940 a German U-Boat captain found himself aboard a British vessel.
Whoops, wrong sub.
***
Grammer Nazi
"Sir we are mining too many useless minerals" (hitler scratches his chin in contemplation) “Mine less then.” (grammar nazi barges in) “mine FEWER” (hitler turns to the man) “Yes? What do you need?”
***
True Friendship
A man brings his best buddy home for dinner unannounced at 5:30 after work. His wife begins screaming at him and his friend just sits and listens.

"My hair & makeup are not done; the house is a mess, the dishes are not done, I'm still in my pajamas and I can't be bothered with cooking tonight! What the hell did you bring him home for?"


"Because he's thinking of getting married." 
***
Two hunters are in a forest.
They come across a very deep hole and one hunter says to the other "How deep is that?" They both find a rusty anvil and throw it in. The anvil falls so far that the hunters don't hear it hit the bottom but then they see a goat sprinting past them and jump into the hole. They stand by the hole thinking about what just happened until a farmer comes along. The farmer says "Have you seen my goat Becky?" The hunters reply, "Yeah, it ran passed us and jumped into that hole." The farmer says, "That's impossible. She couldn't have done that, she was chained to an anvil." 
***
Every N.W.A song
Verse 1: Sellin' crack rocks and shootin' muthafuckas!

Verse 2: Police pull me over just 'cause I'm brown.
***
What's the difference between a Pakistani middle school and an Al Qaeda training ground?
I dunno, I just fly the drone.
***
A gorgeous student walks into her professor's office...
She says "Professor I'm really struggling in your class."

He say's "Ok it's good you're here then, what can I help you with?"  

"Well I don't quite understand the material but honestly, I would do anything to pass."

"Anything?" He asks.

She leans in close and softly says "Anything."

He leans in closer, almost whispering as he asks:

"Would you, study?"
***
Jesus drove a Honda but didn’t talk about it.
*“For I did not speak of my own Accord”*  (John 12:49)
***
What's the difference between Tim Howard and Jesus?
Jesus had 11 guys he could depend on.
***
I told Leonardo DiCaprio a joke about the Oscars...
He didn't get it.
***
Walter White decided to buy a pizza for his son
Walter: Hey son I bought you a pizza so you can share it with your friends.

Flynn: Thanks dad, how much do I owe you?

Walter: It's on the house.
***
Weight Loss Program
Weight Loss Program

A guy calls a company and orders their 5-day, 5lbs weight loss program.

The next day, there's a knock on the door and there stands before him a voluptuous, athletic, 19 year old babe dressed in nothing but a pair of Nike running shoes and a sign around her neck..

She introduces herself as a representative of the weight loss company. The sign reads, "If you can catch me, you can have me."

Without a second thought, he takes off after her. A few miles later puffing and puffing, he finally gives up. The same girl shows up for the next four days and the same thing happens. On the fifth day, he weighs himself and is delighted to find he has lost 5lbs as promised.

He calls the company and orders their 5-day/10lbs program. The next day there's a knock at the door and there stands the most stunning, beautiful, sexy woman he has ever seen in his life. She is wearing nothing but Reebok running shoes and a sign around her neck that reads, "If you catch me you can have me".

Well, he's out the door after her like a shot. This girl is in excellent shape and he does his best, but no such luck. So for the next four days, the same routine happens with him gradually getting in better and better shape.

Much to his delight on the fifth day when he weighs himself, he discovers that he has lost another 10lbs as promised. He decides to go for broke and calls the company to order the 7-day/25 lbs program.

"Are you sure?" asks the representative on the phone. "This is our most rigorous program." "Absolutely," he replies, "I haven't felt this good in years."

The next day there's a knock at the door; and when he opens it he finds a huge muscular guy standing there wearing nothing but pink running shoes and a sign around his neck that reads, "If I catch you, you are mine."

He lost 33 lbs that week..
***
How's Donald Trump going to get rid of all the Mexicans?
Juan by Juan.
***
Gawker must have been playing The Oregon Trail
'cause they just died of dissin' Terry.
***
Nurse - are my testicles black?
A male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen
mask over his mouth and nose. A young student nurse appears and
gives him a partial sponge bath.

"Nurse,"' he mumbles from behind the mask, "are my testicles black?"

Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, "I don't know, Sir. I'm only
here to wash your upper body and feet."

He struggles to ask again, "Nurse, please check for me. Are my
testicles black?"

Concerned that he might elevate his blood pressure and heart rate
from worrying about his testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment
and pulls back the covers.
She raises his gown, holds his manhood in one hand and his testicles
gently in the other.

She looks very closely and says, "There's nothing wrong with them,
Sir. They look fine."

The man slowly pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her, and says
very slowly, "Thank you very much. That was wonderful. Now listen
very, very closely:

Are - my - test - results - back?"

***
A fifteen year old Amish boy and his father were in a mall
They were amazed by almost everything they saw, but especially by two shiny, silver walls that could move apart and then slide back together again.

The boy asked, 'What is this, Father?'
The father (never having seen an elevator) responded, 'Son, I have never seen anything like this in my life, I don't know what it is.'

While the boy and his father were watching with amazement, a fat old lady in a wheel chair moved up to the moving walls and pressed a button.

The walls opened, and the lady rolled between them into a small room. The walls closed and the boy and his father watched the small numbers above the walls light up sequentially.  They continued to watch until it reached the last number. and then the numbers began to light in the reverse order. 

Finally the walls opened up again and a gorgeous 24-year-old blond stepped out. The father, not taking his eyes off the young woman, said quietly to his son.....

'Go get your Mother.'
***
Tifu by walking in on my roommate masturbating
He looked at me wide eyed and yelled "WHY THE HELL ARE YOU MASTURBATING?!?"

Edit: FrontPage thanks and all. But for those comments saying go knuckle deep, I'm a guy.
***
Angry Dad
A father buys a lie detector robot that slaps people when they lie.

He decides to test it out at dinner one night. The father asks his son what he did that afternoon.

The son says, "I did some schoolwork."

The robot slaps the son.

The son says, "Ok, Ok. I was at a friend's house watching movies."

Dad asks, "What movie did you watch?"

Son says, "Toy Story."

The robot slaps the son.

Son says, "Ok, Ok, we were watching porn."

Dad says, "What? At your age I didn't even know what porn was."

The robot slaps the father.

Mom laughs and says, "Well, he certainly is your son."

The robot slaps the mother.




Robot for sale.

***
Sex doll
Guy goes in an adult store and asks for an inflatable doll.
Guy behind the counter says , 'Male or female?'
Customer says , 'Female.'
Counter guy asks , 'Black or white?
Customer says , 'White.'  
Counter guy asks , 'Christian or Muslim?' 
Customer says , 'What the hell does religion have to do with it?'
Counter guy says , 'The Muslim one blows itself up.'
***
Why don't Jedi Knights use the Kelvin scale?
Only a Sith deals in absolutes.
***
I saw my dwarf neighbor at a bus stop
"Jump in, I'll give you a lift home" I said.
"Fuck off" he shouted back.
"What an ungrateful little cunt" I thought as I zipped up my backpack and continued my walk.
***
On a first date:
Her - So what do you do?

Me - I am currently working on eliminating all cancers.

Her - Wow, that's impressive!

Me - Then I'll move onto Capricons.
***
A blonde woman was speeding...
A blonde woman was speeding down the road in her little red sports car and was pulled over by a female police officer, who was also a blonde.
The officer asked to see the lady's driver's license.
She dug through her purse and was getting progressively more agitated.
"What does it look like?" she finally asked.
The policewoman replied, "It's square and it has your picture on it."
The driver finally found a mirror in her purse, looked at it and handed it to the policewoman.
"Here it is," she said.
The officer looked at the mirror, then handed it back saying, "Okay, you can go. I didn't realize you were a cop."
***
A man walks into a bar with a gun.
"Alright, who the fuck slept with my wife?"

A voice from the back called out, "You don't have enough bullets, mate!"

EDIT: Holy crap! My crosspost on /r/drunkjokes made it to the front page! I feel so famous!
***
2 engineers on a bike
two engineers were biking across a university campus when one said,"where did you get such a great bike?" the second engineer replied, "well, i was walking along yesterday, minding my own business, when a beautiful woman rode up on this bike, threw it to the ground, took off all her clothes and said, "take what you want."" the first engineer nodded approvingly and said, "good choice; the clothes probably wouldn't have fit you anyway."
***
A young couple finish their first date...
...and are heading back to their hotel room. As the man is about to open the door, the woman halts him and says, "Look, I can tell how you make love just by the way you open that door."

She continued, "For instance, my last date thrust the key into the lock and barged the door open. That showed to me that he was rough when making love, and I don't like that."

She paused for a second to recollect her thoughts and then continued, "and the date before spent ten minutes poking around trying to find the lock, and that showed to me that he had no experience, and I don't like that either."

She then fixed her eyes onto the man and asked, "So how do you open the door?"

"Well," the man replied, "first I *lick the lock*!"
***
A Mother, her daughter, and a bowl of olives...
The mother takes an olive, puts it in her mouth, goes, "mmmmm...", the daughter tries one for the first time, goes "ewww...", mother eats another, again, goes "mmmm...", her daughter tries yet another, then begins to cry. Her mother asks, "why are you crying", her daughter says "you're getting all the good ones"

***
Jehova
This morning someone was ringing the doorbell, so I opened the door and there was a young man standing there. "Hello sir" he said, "I'm a Jehova's Witness". I invited him in, offered him something to drink and we sat down in the living room. "So, what would you like to talk about?" I asked. He looked up from his cup of tea and said "To be honest sir, I havn't got the faintest idea, I never made it this far..."
***
What do Ethiopians and Yoko Ono have in common?
They are both living off of dead beatles.
***
I just received an email titled $50 TO SEE JUSTIN BIEBER LIVE
I'm really the wrong person to email for these kind of ransoms.
***
So you like limericks, huh?
On the Breast of a woman named Gale

was tattooed the price of her tail

and on her behind

for the sake of the blind

was the same information in braile.
***
How do you know a homeless woman is menstruating?
If she's only wearing one sock.

(This joke brought to you courtesy the homeless guy outside my local 7-11.)

Edit: tweaked the punchline.
***
So I took this babe back to my place. . .
. . . for a solid three and a half minutes of shagging.  We're lying there afterwards and she asks, "Why don't you have a clock in your bedroom?"

"I do have a clock - a wall clock."

"What's a wall clock?"

So I bang on the wall.  From next door a voice, "Hey asshole!  Don't you know it's 3 in the morning?!"
***
"For every action there is an equal and opposite reaction.." - Newton's Law
"Shredded cabbage and carrot make a great salad." - Cole's Law
***
So, I was sitting on a train across from a beautiful Thai girl.
And all I could think was "Don't get a boner. Don't get a boner." And then she did.
***
Why doesn't George R. R. Martin use Twitter?
He killed all 140 characters.
***
A panda walks into a bar...
A panda walks into a bar. 

He asks the bartender how he can get a little action for the night. 

The bartender motions to a young woman. 

She talks to the panda, and they go back to her place. 

After having sex, the panda abruptly leaves.

The next night, the woman goes to the panda's house.

"You owe me money," she says. 

"For what?" 

The woman rolls her eyes and explains, "I'm a prostitute." 

The panda pulls out a dictionary and looks it up: "Prostitute: Has sex for money." 

The panda says, "I don't have to pay you. I'm a panda. Look it up." 

She is about to protest when the panda hands her the dictionary. 

The woman looks up "panda" in the dictionary, and it reads, "Panda: Eats bush and leaves."
***
Why does my porn website have a share to google+ button?
...I dont want people to know I use google+
***
Two engineers are meeting for lunch
Two engineers are meeting for lunch. The second arrives on a bicycle that the first doesn't recognize.

"Where did you get the bike? " the first asks.

The second explained, "It was the weirdest thing. I was walking over here when a beautiful woman rode up on the bike, hopped off, tore off all her clothes and said 'take what you want!' So I took the bike."

"Good call," mused the first, "the clothes probably wouldn't have fit."
***
Would you remarry if I die?
A husband and wife are sitting quietly in bed reading when the wife looks over at him and asks the question....

WIFE: "What would you do if I died? Would you get married again?"

HUSBAND: "Definitely not!"

WIFE: "Why not? Don't you like being married?"

HUSBAND: "Of course I do.."

WIFE: "Then why wouldn't you remarry? "

HUSBAND: "Okay, okay, I'd get married again."

WIFE: "You would?" (with a hurt look)

HUSBAND: (makes audible groan)

WIFE: "Would you live in our house?"

HUSBAND: "Sure, it's a great house."

WIFE: "Would you sleep with her in our bed?"

HUSBAND: "Where else would we sleep?"

WIFE: "Would you let her drive my car?"

HUSBAND: "Probably, it is almost new."

WIFE: "Would you replace my pictures with hers?"

HUSBAND: "That would seem like the proper thing to do."

WIFE: "Would you give her my jewellery?"

HUSBAND: "No, I'm sure she'd want her own."

WIFE: "Would you take her golfing with you?

HUSBAND: "Yes, those are always good times."

WIFE: "Would she use my clubs?

HUSBAND: "No, she's left-handed."

WIFE: -- silence --

HUSBAND: "Shit."

***
A 3 months pregnant woman falls into a coma...
6 months later she awakes and she asks her doctor about her babies. And he replies
"Oh you had happy healthy twins. One boy, and one girl. Luckily your brother was here to name then" 
"Oh god no" says the woman "my brothers an idiot. What are their names" 
"The girls name is denise" says the doctor
"Oh thats not to bad, and the boy?"
"Denephew"

***
Nude Beach
A mother and father take their 6-year old son to a family nude beach. As the boy walks along the sand, he notices that many of the women have boobs bigger than his mother's, so he goes back to ask her why. She tells her son, 'The bigger they are, the sillier the lady is.'

The boy, pleased with the answer, goes to play in the ocean but returns to tell his mother that many of the men have larger things than his dad does. She replies, 'The bigger they are, the dumber the man is'

Again satisfied with her answer, the boy goes back to the ocean to play Shortly thereafter, the boy returns and promptly tells his mother: "Daddy is talking to the  silliest lady on the beach, and the longer he talks, the dumber he gets."
***
Awful pun I came up with whilst drunk last night.
Who is the Australian Frankesntein's favourite singer?  
  
Rihanna, mate. 
***
My daughter asked me what "fap fap fap" means...
I think I should stop commenting on her Facebook pictures.
***
A man was caught by a cop with drugs in the bathroom
The man says, "I swear, it's not mine! I found it here and tried to flush it down the toilet, but every time I flush the drugs down it magically reappears in my hand!"

"I don't believe you," says the cop. "Show me."

The man tosses the bag of drugs into the toilet, then flushes it. The bag swishes down. The cop then stares at the man's empty hand as the bag is flushed down.

"Well," says the cop, "where are the drugs now?"

"What drugs?"

***
A guy walking into a bar
 sees an old man fishing in a puddle off the sidewalk.

“Poor Old fool,”  he thought. So he invited the old man inside for a drink. As they sipped their whiskeys, the gentleman thought he’d humor the old man and asked, “So how many have you caught today?”

The old man replied, “You’re the eighth.”
***
Why do Redditors get excited when a tornado rips down miles of fences?
Because there is a lot of reposting to do.

Edit: Moving up the front page of jokes. Thanks everyone!

Edit2: Wow!!! Thanks for making this my most successful post. Guess you could say it had a good footing.
***
LPT: Laminate your index cards when studying. Not only does it prevent smearing, but the teardrops actually roll right off.

***
A Woman Is Cooking Eggs In The Kitchen When Her Husband Comes Running In
A woman is cooking eggs in the kitchen when her husband comes running in. Immediately, he sees the eggs and gasps in horror.

"Be careful! CAREFUL! Put in some more butter! Oh, my GOSH!"

The wife, startled at her husband's violent reaction, dashes to the fridge to get some butter.

"You're cooking too many at once. TOO MANY! Turn them! TURN THEM NOW!"

The wife, concerned by the status of her husband's mental state,forgets about the butter and goes running to the eggs.

"WE NEED BUTTER! Are you CRAZY??? Where are we going to get the butter? They're going to stick! HURRY!"

The wife runs to the fri-

"CAREFUL about the eggs! CAREFUL. You NEVER listen to me when you're cooking! Never! Turn them quickly! Oh not that quickly, don't you know how to cook? Are you insane? Turn the EGGS!"

At this point, the wife starts crying, since she has no idea what to do.

She gasps, "What is WRONG with you? I know how to cook eggs."

The husband simply smiles and replies, "I just wanted to show you what it feels like while I'm driving with you in the car," and leaves.
***
*burst into doctor's office*
ME: I'm no longer canstopetid

DOCTOR: You mean constipated

ME: No I've had a vowel movement

DOCTOR: Get out
***
Why did the CIA torture the Russian wasp?
Because he was a cagey bee agent.
***
I accidentally clicked on a "You've won an iPhone"-popup.
Luckliy it was only a virus.
***
How many lightbulbs does it take to change a lightbulb?
Depends on how clumsy you are.

*There, I've killed it. Move on /r/jokes, move on.*
***
Jesus take the wheel
Carlos you take the stereo
I'll take lookout 
***
A pilot was welcoming the passengers on the plane shortly after take-off...
"Thank you for flying with us this morning.

The weather is....."

Then suddenly he starts screaming while he is still on the mic, "OH MY GOD! OH MY GOD! IT'S BURNING!!!"

A ghostly silence reigned.

He gets back on the microphone and says, "I sincerely apologize for the incident, but I just dropped a very hot cup of coffee on my lap.. you should see my pants!"

One passenger shouts back, "WHY DON'T YOU COME HERE AND SEE OURS!!!"
***
What did one German wheat farmer say to the other German wheat farmer?
Gluten tag
***
My Bathroom
I've decided to call my bathroom the Jim instead of the John. 
 
It sounds better when I tell folks I go to the Jim every morning.

***
Two little boys stole a big bag of oranges from a neighbor...
They decided to go to a quiet place to share the lot equally.

 One of them suggested the nearby cemetery.

 As they were jumping over the gate to enter the cemetery, two oranges fell out of the big bag but they didn't bother to pick them since they had enough in the bag.

 Few minutes later, a drunkard on his way from a bar, passed near the cemetery gate & heard a voice saying: "One for me, one for you. One for me, one for you. One for me, one for you."

 He immediately sobered up & ran as fast as he could to a church nearby, for the priest

 "Father, please come with me . Come & witness God & Satan sharing corpses at the cemetery"

 They both ran back to the cemetery gate & the voice continued: "One for me, one for you. One for me, one for you. One for me, one for you."

 Suddenly, the voice stopped counting & said:
 "What about the two at the gate?"
***
A hispanic magician was performing a magic trick
The magician said that he could make himself disappear within 3 seconds! So, he waves his cape in front of his face and says "uno, dos!" and just like that, he disappeared without a tres!
***
A Mexican magician tells the crowd he will disappear on the count of 3...
He says "uno... dos..." *poof*! and disappears without a tres.
***
A bra and a pair of jumper cables walk into a bar...
As soon as they walk in, the bartender tells them to get out immediately.

"Why?" Says the bra.

"Because you're off your tits, and your friend looks like he's about to start something."
***
My favourite penguin joke
A vacationing penguin is driving his car through Arizona when he notices that the oil pressure light is on. He gets out to look and sees oil dripping out of the motor. He drives to the nearest town and stops at the first gas station.

After dropping the car off, the penguin goes for a walk around town. He sees an ice-cream shop and, being a penguin in Arizona, decides that something cold would really hit the spot. He gets a big dish of ice cream and sits down to eat. Having no hands he makes a real mess trying to eat with his flippers. After finishing his ice cream, he goes back to the gas station and asks the mechanic if he's found the problem. The mechanic looks up and says "It looks like you blew a seal."

"No no," the penguin replies, "it's just ice cream."
***
Boy walks in on his parents going at it...
Father turns around, smiles, and winks.

Few minutes later, a horrible noise arises from down the hall.  Father dismounts, runs down the hall, only to find the boy with Grandmother bent over the bed.

"What the hell do you think you're doing?" says Father.

Boy smiles, winks, and says "not so funny when it's your mom, is it?"
***
4-year-old's joke: What is a duck's favorite snack? Peanut butter (context in comments)
We told my four-year-old a joke: What is a duck's favorite snack?  Quackers!  HA!  

He asked, "Quackers?" *confused* "Like, peanut butter and crackers?"  "Sure, like peanut butter and crackers."

*runs into other room, calling his grandfather* "Pop Pop!  What is a duck's favorite snack?"  "Peanut butter"  *falls over laughing at his own joke*
***
Classic dad joke, but in bad taste
So we were having a family dinner for the first time in a while.
My mum was saying how terrible the situation in Nepal is, when my Dad says "it's nepalling isn't it?"
I had a good laugh, feeling guilty after :(
***
My sexual fetishes
my sexual fetishes have been getting more and more perverse ever so slowly. But it wasn't until I spanked a statue that I realized I had hit rock bottom.
***
Husband send a text to his wife
Husband's text:
>Honey, I got hit by a car outside the office.
Paula brought me to the Hospital.
Doctors presently doing tests and taking X-rays.
Severe blow to my head but not likely to have any lasting effects. Wound required 19 stitches.
I have three broken ribs, a broken arm and compound fracture in the left leg. Amputation of my right foot is a possibility.
Love you.

Wife's response:
>Who's Paula?
***
Homosexuality is found in over 450 species. Homophobia is only found in two.
Help us get rid of the Ecuadorian fag-hating spider :(
***
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
One's a crusty bus station the others a busty crustacean
***
A mans hurt real bad.
A man is lying in bed in the hospital with an oxygen mask over his mouth. A young nurse appears to sponge his hands and feet.

"Nurse," he mumbles from behind the mask, "Are my testicles black?" Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, "I don't know, I'm only here to wash your hands and feet".

He struggles again to ask, "Nurse, are my testicles black?" Finally, she pulls back the covers, raises his gown, holds his penis in one hand and his testicles in her other hand and takes a close look, and   says "There is nothing wrong with them!"

Finally, the man pulls off his oxygen mask and replies, "That was very  nice but, are... my... test... results... back?
***
Why are Jewish Men Circumcised?
Because Jewish women don't touch anything unless it's 20% off!
***
A guy walks into a bar...
...and sees a gorgeous woman nursing a drink. Walking up behind her he says: "Hi there, good lookin'. How's it going?"
Having already downed a few power drinks, she turns around, faces him, looks him straight in the eye and says: "Listen up, buddy. I screw anybody, anytime, anywhere, your place, my place, in the car, front door,back door, on the ground, standing up, sitting down, naked or with clothes on,dirty, clean... It just doesn't matter to me. I've been doing it ever since I got out of college and I just flat-ass love it."
Eyes now wide with interest, he responds: "No kidding. I'm a lawyer too. What firm are you with?"
***
2020 Olympic high jump results
Gold - Mexico

Silver - Mexico

Bronze - Mexico

***
A Man Walks Into A Bar...
And orders 3 shots for himself. The bartender asks why 3 shots? The man says that he has two brothers overseas and that whenever they drink, they all drink for each other as well. 

A few weeks later, the same man comes in again and orders 2 shots for himself. The bartender asks the man if something happened to one of his brothers. The man replies "Nah, I've just stopped drinking."
***
A 7 yr old and a 4 yr old are in their bedroom...
The 7 yr old looks at his brother and says, "I think it's time we start swearing"

The brother nods in agreement. 

"When we go downstairs, I'll be the first to swear and then you swear" says the 7 yr old. 

The two brothers go downstairs and the mother asks what they want for breakfast. 

"I'll have a bowl of cocoa puffs, bitch!"

The mother smacks the kid so hard that he flies out of his chair. 

The mother asks the 4 yr old what he wants. Stunned, the 4 yr old says, "I don't know, but it won't be fucking cocoa puffs!"
***
How do you feel about sex?
An elderly couple, who were both widowed, had been going out with each other for a long time. Urged on by their friends, they decided it was finally time to get married. Before the wedding, they went out to dinner and had a long conversation regarding how their marriage might work.They discussed finances, living arrangements and so on.
 
Finally, the old gentleman decided it was time to broach the subject of their physical relationship.
 
'How do you feel about sex?' he asked, rather tentatively.

'I would like it infrequently' she replied.
 
The old gentleman sat quietly for a moment, adjusted his glasses, leaned over towards her and whispered - 'Is that one word or two?'

***
A boy wants to know the difference between hypothetically and realistically
His father says, "Go ask your mother and sister if they would have sex with somebody for a million dollars."

The boy returns and tells his father they both said yes.

"Well son hypothetically we're sitting on two million dollars, realistically we're living with a couple of whores."
***
My wife and I were having great difficulty conceiving.
We tried everything, got tested, tried in vitro, etc.  Nothing worked.  Finally, the doctor said we were putting too much pressure on ourselves.  He said to throw away the charts and the thermometer and just enjoy sex again, doing it whenever the mood struck.

On morning at breakfast, I was reading the paper and reached for the salt.  My wife reached for it at the same time.  Our fingers touched, our eyes met, and I swept everything off the table, picked up my wife and made love to her right there.  Nine months later we had a baby.

Of course, we still aren't allowed in our local Burger King, but I think it was worth it.
***
Three drunks on the top of the Empire state building.
Three drunkards are standing on top of the Empire State Building. The first one says to the other two, "You know, it's a funny thing about these wind currents. A person could jump off of this building right now and not even hit the ground; the wind would carry him right back up to the top of the building!" The second drunk says, "You're crazy!" The first drunk says, "I'm serious! Watch!" 

The first drunk jumps off of the building, and the wind carries him right back up to the top! The second drunk says, "Let me try!" 

So the second drunk leaps off of the building and promptly falls to the street below, landing with a hideous SPLAT! 

The first drunk smiles, clearly amused. The third drunk looks at him and says, "You know, Superman, you can be a real Jerk When you're drunk!"
***
What is the only reason Donald Trump is watching the Olympics?
So he can determine how high Mexican pole vaulters can jump.
***
Why didn't the terminator upgrade to windows 10?
I asked him and he said, "I still love vista, baby!"
***
Bird Impression
A traveling sideshow puts up a help wanted ad. A guy gets all excited and applies.

The sideshow owner brings him in for an interview and asks, "Ok, what's your talent? What can you do for me?"

The guy says "I do a really great bird impression!"

The owner responds, "Pff, no thanks. Plenty of people can do that."

So the guy says "Oh..ok...well thanks anyway,' and flies away.
***
I translated a German joke and hope it's still funny
A man is treated by a psychiatrist because he thinks that he is a mouse. After some weeks of psychiatric counseling he is finally healed and has learned, that he isn't a mouse.

As the man in walks out of the psychiatrists office he sees a cat on the street and runs back to the psychiatrist and screams: "I'm scared! There's a cat on the street!"

The psychiatrist replies "I thought you know now, that you are not a mouse."

The man  answers "Yes, I know that, but does the cat know this too?"
***
I always thought Americans should say "B".
Because Canadians say "Eh", and Mexicans say "Ci".
***
Dead Cow Lecture
First-year students at the OSU Vet School were attending their first anatomy class with a real dead cow. They all gathered around the surgery table with the body covered with a white sheet.

The professor started the class by telling them, “In Veterinary medicine it is necessary to have two important qualities as a doctor.

The first thing is that you not be disgusted by anything involving the animal’s body.”

For an example, the professor pulled back the sheet, stuck his finger in the butt

of the cow, withdrew it, and stuck his finger in his mouth.

“Go ahead and do the same thing,” he told his students.

The students freaked out, hesitated for several minutes, but eventually took turns sticking a finger in the butt of the dead cow and sucking on it.

When everyone finished, the Professor looked at them and said, “The second most important quality is observation. I stuck in my middle finger and sucked on my index finger. Now learn to pay attention. Life’s tough but it’s even tougher if you’re stupid.

***
My Wife and I Were Sitting at a Table
At her high school reunion, when she kept staring at a drunken man swigging a beer as he sat at a nearby table. 

I asked her "Do you know him?" 

"Yes" she sighed. "He's my old boyfriend. I understand he took to drinking right after we split up those many years ago & he hasn't been sober since. 

"WOW" I said. "Who would think a person could go on celebrating for so long?!?" 

And that's when the fight started.... 
***
Pakistani math problem.
Ahmed has 3 lunch boxes. 
He gives one to Mohammed and another to Hassan. Calculate the radius of the explosion.
***
Putin at the airport
Vladimir Putin arrives at an airport, gets in line at customs desk.
 
Customs officer: Occupation?

Putin: No, just visiting.

***
A successful businessman is driving home and sees another man on the sidewalk eating grass.
He stops and asks, "Hey! Why are you eating grass?"

The man replies, "I'm out of money, I lost my job and I haven't eaten in three days! Grass is my only option."

The businessman thinks for a few second and says, "You know what, why don't you come with me to my house."

The man, very grateful, replies, "Yes! That would be nice. Thank you so much, sir." He points at the end of the road and says, "There's another family of 5 there. They also haven't eaten in a long time! Would you mind if they come along as well?"

The businessman says, "Sure, as long as they can fit in my car. My house isn't far down this road so it shouldn't be a problem. Besides, I haven't mowed my lawn in months."
***
I came out my front door this morning to see my neighbour frantically trying to scrub off the word "PEDO" that had been spray painted on his front window.
"What's been going on John?"' I asked.

"Fucking kids," came his mumbled reply.

Dirty bastard.
***
Everybody on Earth dies and goes to Heaven....
The Lord comes and says, "I want the men to make two lines. One line for the men that dominated their women on earth and the other line for the men that were dominated by their women. Also, I want all the women to go with St. Peter." 

Said and done, the next time The Lord looked, the women are gone and there are two lines. 

The line of the men that were dominated by their women was 100 miles long, and in the line of men that dominated their women, there was only one man. 

The Lord got mad and said, "You men should be ashamed of yourselves! I created you in my image and you were all whipped by your mates! Look at the only one of my sons that stood up and made me proud! Learn from him! Tell them my son, how did you manage to be the only one in this line?" 

And the man replied, "I don't know, my wife told me to stand here."
***
A girl asked her boyfriend to come over on friday night and have dinner with her parents.
Since this was such a big event, the girl announced to her boyfriend that after dinner, she would like to go out and make love for the first time.

Well, the boy was estatic, but he had never had sex before, so he took a trip to the pharmacist to get some condoms. The pharmacist helped the boy for about an hour. He told the boy everything there is to know about condoms and sex. At the cash register, the pharmacist asked the boy how many condoms he'd like to buy: a 3-pack, 10-pack or a family pack. 'Oh well, I'm really going to put it to this girl," the boy tells the pharmacist. "I intend to plug every orifice in her body at least twice. The pharmacist, with a laugh, suggests the family pack, saying the boy will be rather busy, being his first time and all.

That night, the boy showed up at the girls parents' house and met his girlfriend at the door. "Oh I'm so excited for you to meet my parents, come on in!" she said. The boy happily went inside and was sweetly led to the dinner table where the girl's parents were seated. The boy quickly offers to say grace and bowed his head. A minute passed; and the boy was still deep in prayer with his head down. Ten long minutes pass, and still no movement from the boy. Finally, after 20 minutes with his head down, the girlfriend finally leans over and whispered to the boyfriend, "I had no idea you were this religious". The boy turned, and whispered back, "I had no idea your father was a pharmacist".
***
My wife asked me what I wanted to do for Easter
So I told her "The same thing Jesus did. Disappear on Friday and come back on Sunday."
***
What did Hillary Clinton do when her email was hacked?
She asked Donald Trump to build a firewall.
***
Little boy has diarrhea and tells his mom he needs viagra
Mom replies " What the hell for?"
Boy replies "Isn't that what you give dad when his shit doesn't get hard?"
***
Why wouldn't the airline allow the vulture to board his flight?
#Because of the horrible stench coming from his carrion luggage.

*I deserve any and all insulting comments I will get for this joke, I make no excuses for myself and should probably be ashamed.*

*edit: thank you for the gold benevolent stranger.  :-)*
***
A 2nd grade teacher decides to teach sex ed...
to her class. She starts out by drawing a penis on the chalk board and asks the class, "Does anyone know what this is?"

And little Johnny says, "Yes, my dad has 2 of them!"

And the teacher says, "Are you sure about that?"

And little Johnny says, "Yes, he uses a small skinny one to go to the bathroom, and a big long one to brush the babysitter's teeth."
***
Naked sunbathing....
A man was sunbathing naked at the beach. For the sake of civility, and to keep it from getting sunburned, he had a hat over his privates. A woman walks past and says, snickering, "If you were a gentleman you'd lift your hat."

He raised an eyebrow and replied, "If you weren't so ugly, it would lift itself."

***
So my wife said "take off my shirt".
So I did as she said and took off her shirt.

Then she said, "Take off my skirt." I continued and took off her skirt.

"Take off my shoes." Once again, I did as she said and I took off her shoes. 

"Now my hose, bra, and panties." And lastly, I took them off.

Then she looked at me and said, "I don't want to catch you wearing my things ever again."
***
Stop sending toys to children in Africa
It's gotta be depressing, getting a Tamagotchi that will outlive you.
***
A young man moved from his parents home into a new apartment
A young man moved from his parents home into a new apartment of his own and went to the lobby to put his name on his mailbox. 

While there, an attractive young lady came out of the apartment next to the mailboxes, wearing a robe. 

The boy smiled at the young woman and she started a conversation with him. 

As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious that she had nothing else on.

The poor kid broke into a sweat trying to maintain eye contact.

After a few minutes, she placed her hand on his arm and said, "Let's go to my apartment, I hear someone coming."

He followed her into her apartment; she closed the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off completely. 

Now completely nude, she purred at him, 

"What would you say is my best feature?" Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, "It's got to be your ears."

Astounded, and a little hurt she asked, "My ears? Look at these breasts; they are full and 100% natural. I work out every day and my butt is firm and solid. Look at my skin - no blemishes anywhere, so how can you think that the best part of my body is my ears?!"

Clearing his throat, he stammered, "Outside, when you said you heard someone coming, that was me..."
***
I was having dinner ..
 .. .. with Garry Kasporov 

and on the table was a checkered tablecloth.

 
 It took him 2 hours to pass me the salt.
***
Another blonde joke.
A blonde, wanting to earn some money, decided to hire herself out as a handyman-type and started canvassing a wealthy neighborhood. She went to the front door of the first house and asked the owner if he had any jobs for her to do. "Well, you can paint my porch. How much will you charge?" 

The blonde said "How about 50 dollars?" The man agreed and told her that the paint and other materials that she might need were in the garage. The man's wife, inside the house, heard the conversation and said to her husband, "Does she realize that the porch goes all the way around the house?" The man replied, "She should, she was standing on it." 

A short time later, the blonde came to the door to collect her money. "You're finished already?" he asked. "Yes," the blonde answered, "and I had paint left over, so I gave it two coats." Impressed, the man reached in his pocket for the $50. 

"And by the way," the blonde added, "it's not a Porch, it's a Ferrari."

***
Scientists removed the right half brain of a man
and asked him to count to ten. The man counted, "two, four, six, eight, ten."

Then they put the right-half back and removed the left-half, and again asked the man to count to ten. The man counted, "one, three, five, seven, nine."

The scientists then removed both halves of the man's brain, and asked him again to count to ten.

The man said, "look, we're gonna count to ten. We're gonna count. Because I know numbers, I have the best numbers. All the politicians in Washington can't count to one-believe me, I've counted to one many, many times. They said we couldn't count to ten. Well, I'm beating all of those people in the polls. We're gonna count to ten. Everybody, count to ten. Okay? And let me tell you - let me tell you something. I will be the best counting President God has ever created. We are gonna count to so many tens, I tell you. Look at that!"
***
A man was driving along the highway...
... and saw a rabbit hopping across the middle of the road. He swerved to avoid hitting the rabbit, but unfortunately the rabbit jumped in front of the car and was hit.

 The driver, being a sensitive man as well as an animal lover, pulled over to the side of the road, and got out to see what had become of the rabbit. Much to his dismay, the rabbit was dead.
The driver felt so awful, he began to cry.

 A woman driving down the highway saw the man crying on the side of the road and pulled over. She stepped out of her car and asked the man what was wrong.

"I feel terrible," he explained, "I accidentally hit this rabbit and killed it."
The woman told the man not to worry. She knew what to do. She went to her car trunk, and pulled out a spray can. She walked over to the limp, dead rabbit, and sprayed the contents of the can onto the rabbit.

Miraculously the rabbit came to life, jumped up, waved its paw at the two humans and hopped down the road. Fifty yards away the rabbit stopped, turned around, waved and hopped down the road, another 50 yards, turned, waved, and hopped another 50 yards.

The man was astonished. He couldn't figure out what substance could be in the woman's spray can!!

He ran over to the woman and asked, "What is in your spray can? What did you spray on that rabbit?"

The woman turned the can around so that the man could read the label.

 It said: "Hair spray. Restores life to dead hair. Adds permanent wave!!..
***
German girlfriend
My german girlfriend likes to rate my sexual performances on a scale of 1-10.

Last night we tried anal. She kept yelling 9. That's the best I've ever done. 
***
A woman was in a coma.
 Nurses were in her room giving her a sponge bath. One of them was washing her private area and noticed that there was a response on the monitor when she touched her. 

 They went to her husband and explained what happened, telling him, "Crazy as this sounds, maybe a little oral sex will do the trick and bring her out of the coma." 

 The husband was skeptical, but they assured him that they'd close the curtains for privacy. The hubby finally agreed and went into his wife's room. 

 After a few minutes the woman's monitor flat lined, no pulse, no heart rate. The nurses ran into the room. 

 The husband was standing there, pulling up his pants, and said, "I think she choked." 

***
A hunter goes into the forest
He sees a bear and fires at it, but misses. The bear is nowhere to be seen. 
Suddenly the bear taps him on his shoulder and says, "You tried to kill me, either I'll kill you or pull down your trousers and let me fuck you". The man chose life. 

He goes home embarrassed, buys a bigger gun and goes back to hunt the bear. He sees it at a distance, fires, misses, the bear disappears in the thick brush only to pop up behind him a little later. The bear recognizes the hunter and says, "You know the choices." 

The hunter, after being fucked again, brings a bazooka to get over his humiliation. He finds the bear, fires and falls back due to recoil. The smoke clears and the bear is standing over him, rubbing it's chin. "You don't come here for hunting, do you?
***
My favourite joke
So a guy goes into a pub, walks up to the bar and asks for a pint. 

The barman replies: one pound please. The guy says back: only one pound?!
The barman replies: aye only a pound.

The guy takes his pint and enjoys it and after a few more pints at a pound each the guy feels cheeky.

The guy says: ill have a steak and chips mate.
The barman replies: three quid.
The guy then asked: do you own this pub?
The barman replies: no.
The guy then asked: wheres the boss then? I want to ask why the prices are so low.
The barman replies: he's upstairs with my wife.
The guy then asked: why? Whats he doing with your wife?
The barman replies: the same thing i'm doing to his business.

***
A nun is having a bath...
Suddenly there is a knock on the door. A voice says it's the blind man. The nun thinks about it, and thinks I'll open the door. As she opens the door the man looks her up and down and says " nice tits where do you want this Venetian hanging"

It was my dads joke, sorry reddit. 
***
"I'm sorry sir, but we've determined you have a highly contagious, deadly virus. You'll need to be kept in quarantine and fed a diet of pancakes."
"Oh my, that's horrible news, doctor.  But will the pancakes really be able to help me get better?"

"No, that's just the only thing we can slide under the door."
***
Jesus is at the last supper with his disciples,
And at the last supper, Jesus takes the bread, blesses it, and says,

"Take this, all of you, and eat it, for this is my body."

He then proceeds to bless the wine and says,

"Take this, all of you, and drink it, for this is my blood."

Finally, he picks up the milk, but Peter looks at him and says,

"You can fuck right off."
***
Once there was a king who had 10 wild dogs...
...He used them to torture and eat all the ministers who made mistakes.

Once, one of the ministers gave an opinion which was wrong, and which the king didn’t like at all… 
So he ordered for the minister to be thrown to the dogs.

So the minister said, 
"I served you 10 years and you do this..?

Please give me 10 days before you throw me in with those dogs!"
So the king agreed… 

In those 10 days the minister went to the guard that was guarding the dogs and told him he wants to serve the dogs for the next 10 days… 

The guard was baffled… 
But he agreed… 
So the minister started feeding the dogs, cleaning them, washing them, providing all sorts of comfort to them.

When the 10 days were up… 

The king ordered that the minister be thrown in to the dogs as his punishment. 

But when he was thrown in, 

Everyone was amazed at what they saw..
They saw the dogs licking the feet of the minister!

So the king, baffled at what he saw, said:” what happened to my dogs. !!!” 

The minister then said;” 
I served the dogs for 10 days and they didn’t forget my service…
Yet I served you for 10 years and you forgot all on the first mistake!”… 

So the king realised his mistake

and

Got wolves instead.
***
The Monk Story with a great suspense.
This has really a great suspense...!!!!!


A man is driving down the road  and breaks down near a monastery. He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?
The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a very strange sound. The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say, We can't tell you. You're not a monk.



The man is disappointed  but thanks them anyway and goes about his merry way. Some years later, The same man breaks down in front of the same monastery. The monks again accept him, feed him, and again fix his car. That night, he hears the same strange noise that he had heard years earlier. The next morning, he asks what it is, but the monks reply, We can't tell you. You're not a monk.

The man says, All right, all right. I'm dying to know. 


If the only way I can find out what that sound was is to become a monk, how do I become a monk?


The monks reply, You must travel the earth  and tell us how many blades of grass  there are and the exact number of sand pebbles, when you find these numbers, you will become a monk. The man sets about his task. Some 54 years later, he returns and knocks on the door of the monastery.


He says, I have traveled the earth  and have found what you have asked for. There are 145,236,284,232 blades of grass and 231,281,219,999,129,382 sand pebbles on the earth.


The monks reply, Congratulations. You are now a monk. We shall now show you the way to the sound.

The monks lead the man to a wooden door  where the head monk says, The sound is right behind that door. The man reaches for the knob, but the door is locked.


He says, Real funny. May I have the key? The monks give him the key, and he opens the door. Behind the wooden door is another door  made of stone.

The man demands the key to the stone door. The monks give him the key, and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. He demands another key  from the monks, who provide it.

Behind that door is another door, this one made of sapphire, And so it went until the man had gone through doors of emerald, silver, topaz, and amethyst.

Finally, the monks say, This is the last key  to the last door.

The man is relieved to know that he has finally reached to the end  .

He unlocks the door, turns the knob, and behind that door he is amazed  to find the source of that strange sound.

But he can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk.

EDIT: I feel everyones pain who read this, I went through the same feeling when I read it first time.
***
New Apple Product Announcement: The iBra
Apple announced a new product: a bra that can store and play music. The iBra. The product is being praised as a step toward better relations between men and women. It is intended to address the complaints of women about men staring at their breasts and not listening to them.
***
Why doesn't Pacman use Twitter?
He doesn't like being followed.
***
A man lives on the 15th floor of an apartment.
One rainy Saturday afternoon he walks out onto his balcony and sticks his hand out over the edge to see if it's raining or not, and a glass eye falls into his hand. He looks up, and there is a gorgeous woman standing on the balcony above him, who apologises and says she was just leaning out to check the rain and her glass eye fell out. She asks him to bring it up the stairs to her, which he does immediately. To say thanks, she kisses him on the mouth. Mildly surprised, he asks, "Do you do that to every guy you meet?"

And she replies, "Only the ones that catch my eye."
***
Bill Clinton jokes never get old
What does Bill Clinton say to Hillary after sex?

"I'll be home in 20 minutes."
***
'Hi, we're prostitutes. Want to have some fun?'"
A lady approaches her priest and tells him "Father, I have a problem. I have two female talking parrots, but they only know how to say one thing."

"What do they say?" the priest inquired.

"They only know how to say, 'Hi, we're prostitutes. Want to have some fun?'"

"That's terrible!" the priest exclaimed, "but I have a solution to your problem. Bring your two female parrots over to my house and I will put them with my two male talking parrots whom I taught to pray and read the bible. My parrots will teach your parrots to stop saying that terrible phrase and your female parrots will learn the joys of praise and worship."

"Thank you!" the woman responded.

The next day the woman brings her female parrots to the priest's house. His two male parrots are holding the rosary beads and praying in their cage. The lady puts her two female parrots in with the male parrots and the female parrots say "Hi we're prostitutes, want to have some fun?"

One male parrot looks over at the other male parrot and exclaims, "Put the beads away, brother. Our prayers have been answered"
***
why dont atheists solve exponential equations ?
they dont believe in higher powers.
***
I dated an English teacher for a few months, but it didn't work out.
She didn't approve of my improper use of the colon.
***
Employee Award goes to......

Employee: Excuse me sir, may I talk to you?

Boss: Sure, come on in. What can I do for you? 

Employee: Well sir, as you know, I have been an employee of this prestigious firm for over ten years.

Boss: Yes.
 
Employee: I won't beat around the bush. Sir, I would like a raise. I currently have four companies after me and so I decided to talk to you first.

Boss: A raise? I would love to give you a raise, but this is just not the right time. 

Employee: I understand your position, and I know that the current economic down turn has had a negative impact on sales, but you must also take into consideration my hard work, pro- activeness and loyalty to this company for over a decade.

Boss: Taking into account these factors, and considering I don't want to start a brain drain, I'm willing to offer you a ten percent raise and an extra five days of vacation time. How does that sound? 

Employee: Great! It's a deal! Thank you, sir!

Boss: Before you go, just out of curiosity, what companies were after you? 

Employee: Oh, the Electric Company, Gas Company, Water Company and the Mortgage Company!
***
A man with a black eye takes his seat on a plane...
...where he notices the gentleman next to him also has a black eye.

"So how'd you get that black eye." he asks

"Well it was a slip of the tongue.  I meant to ask the attractive woman at the desk for, "one ticket to Pittsburgh".  Instead I asked for, "one picket to Titsburgh" and she punched me.  What about you?"

"Mine was a slip of the tongue too.  This morning at breakfast I meant to ask my wife, "honey please pass me the Cheerios".  But instead it came out, "you ruined my life you stupid bitch."
***
The very famous barber


 A guy sticks his head into a barber shop and asks, "How long before I can get a haircut?"

 The barber looks around the shop and says, "About two hours." The guy leaves. 

A few days later the same guy sticks his head in the door and asks, "How long before Icon get a haircut?" 

The barber looks around at the shop full of customers and says, "About three hours." The guy leaves. A week later the same guy sticks his head in the shop and asks, "How long before I can get a haircut?"

 The barber looks around the shop and says, "About an hour and half." The guy leaves.

 The barber looks over at a friend in the shop and says, "Hey. Bill, follow that guy and see where he goes. He keeps asking how long he haste wait for a haircut, but then doesn't come back."

 A lithe while later. Bill comes back into the shop, laughing hysterically. The barber asks, "Bill, where did he go when he let here?" Bill looks up, tears in his eyes and says, "Your house!" 

***
A younger chimp asks one of his elders what's a conditioned reflex.
The older chimp says: "When I press this red button an idiot in a white coat will open that door and bring us some bananas."
***
I'm against picketing....
But I don't know how to show it.
- Mitch Hedberg
***
A wife asks her husband if she were to die, would he remarry?...
...and her husband says "yes I would remarry I like living a married life and spending time with someone else. The wife gets uncomfortable and proceeds to ask " well would you let her live in our house?" And the husband says "yes I'd let her live here there's nothing wrong with this house." That worried the wife more, so then she asks "well would you let her sleep in our bed?" And the husband says "yes I like my bed and I don't want to get rid of it I'd let her sleep in it." This only makes the wife more worried so she feels compelled to say "well at least promise me you will never let her use my golf clubs." The husband say "don't worry she will never use your clubs, she's left handed." 

Joke my 95 year old grandpa told me. 
***
My wife doesn't know this, but I put a dollar in an envelope every time we have sex. This is all I'm spending for her Christmas present.
So far she's getting a McChicken.
***
Why does West Virginia have so many unsolved murders?
There are no dental records and all the DNA is the same.
***
Her best feature.... NSFW
A teenage boy was delivering papers to an apartment house. While there, a stunning young woman came out of the apartment next to the mailboxes wearing only a robe. The boy smiled at the young woman and she started up a conversation with him. As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious that she had nothing else on. The poor kid broke into a sweat trying to maintain eye contact. 

After a few minutes of flirting, she placed her hand on his arm and said, "Let's go to my apartment, I hear someone coming." 

He followed her into her apartment; she closed the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off completely. Now nude, she purred at him, "What would you say is my best feature?" 

Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, "It has to be your ears."

Astounded, and a little hurt she asked, "My ears? Look at these breasts; they are a full 38 inches and 100 percent natural. I work out every day and my ass is firm and solid. I have a 28 inch waist. Look at my skin, not a blemish anywhere. How can you think that the best part of my body is my ears?"

Clearing his throat, he stammered, "Outside, when you said you heard someone coming...that was me."

Edit:  sweet front page thanks guys.  I wish I heard it coming.
***
Frankenstein enters a bodybuilding competition
And was promptly left in embarrassment when he realized that he'd severely misunderstood the objective.
***
Two bacteria walk into a bar
Two bacteria walk into a bar.

The bartender says, "We don't serve bacteria here."

And the bacteria says, 
*"But we work here. We're staph."*
***
A midget on the bus.
So I'm riding on the bus and this midget comes on and sits beside me.

After a couple of stops, the driver slams on the brakes and the midget slides off the seat, so I grab him by the arm and sit him down again.

Next stop, the same thing happens so again I grab him by the arm and sit him down.

By the fifth stop, the same thing happens and I'm irrirated so I grab him and say: "Hold on tight you dumb midget or you gonna keep sliding off the seat".

He turns around and says to me: "My stop was 5 stops ago, I've been trying to get off the bus you sunabitch".
***
A state trooper lays in wait at a speed trap...
and spots a speeder.

He flashes his lights, pulls the car over, walks up to the driver and says, "I've been waiting for you all day."

The driver responds, "I got here as fast as I could."
***
Why did Mozart kill all his chickens?
Because when he asked them who the best composer was, they'd all say "Bach bach bach!"

***
Joke from Spain (forgive my English)
There was once a married couple that wanted a divorce, and they were arguing about who would keep the child.

"I birthed the child, therefore it's mine!" Says the wife.
"That's not true, you're not the mother!" Replies the husband.
"Oh, and I suppose you claim to be the real father then?" Says the wife.
"No, I actually don't know who the real parents are," replies the husband.

The wife is surprised at this and so asks what he means by that.
"Well," he replies, "when the child was born, while we were still in the hospital, you told me that the baby had pooped himself and you told me to change him while you rest."

"And?" She asks.

"And I did!"
***
As he inserted the rectal thermometer, I got a painfully hard and obvious erection.
"Maybe you should wait outside whilst I examine your dog," said the vet.





Edit: HOLY SHIT FRONT PAGE!!!! I'm so excited i almost cum in my pants! but i came in my dog instead :)


***
Two Cannibals are Wandering the Jungle...
They come upon a big fat missionary and brain him with a rock.  They're excited to have such a feast before them.

Being equitable to one another, as all cannibals are, they decide that one start at the feet and the other start at the head; they'll both work their way to the middle.

After a few minutes, the cannibal at the feet says to the other, "How are you enjoying the feast?"

The other replies, "I'm having a ball!"

The cannibal at the feet says, "You're eating too fast!"
***
Redneck boy meets his dream girl!
A young boy comes home to his father one day after school.

"Dad, I met the most INCREDIBLE girl in the world today.  She's smart, she's beautiful, AND she's funny."

Dad pats his son on the back and walks him into the kitchen, "That's great, son.  I'm proud of you for finding someone you like so much."

"That's not the best part, Dad.  She's a VIRGIN."

At this point the father slams his hand down on the counter, "I forbid this relationship, son.  I never want you to see this girl again.  And if I find out you do, I'm going to give you the biggest whooping you ever had."

Tears stream down the son's face, "But, Dad, WHY?  She's amazing and she likes me!"

"Well, son.  If she ain't good enough for her own family, she ain't good enough for ours."
***
How I got my car fixed.
So I'm sitting on the side of the road, car broken down, when a guy pulls up to me. He gets out and asks if I need help. I said, "Sure, if you can fix it." He walks around back and kicks the bumper, slams his fist on the trunk, and twists the gas gap a bunch of times. Then he walks around to the side, opens the door, and slams it shut a few times, then pulls on the front handle for about a minute. He asks me to try it again, and sure enough it starts. I ask him, "Is it fixed?" He says, "No, I tricked the car into thinking it works again. I say, "Wow, you're not too bad of a bad mechanic." Confused, he says, "Mechanic? No.... I'm a Chiropractor."
***
a muslim, a jew, a christian and an atheist walk into a coffee shop...
and they talk, laugh, drink coffee and become good friends. thats what happens when you're not an asshole.
***
Men entrance to Heaven
When everybody on earth was dead and waiting to enter Heaven,God appeared and said,"I want the men to make two lines. One line for the men who were true heads of their household, and the other line for the men who were dominated by their women. I want all the women to report to St.Peter."

Soon, the women were gone, and there were two lines of men.

The line of the men who were dominated by their wives was 100 miles long, and in the line for men who truly were heads of their household, there was only one man.

God said to the long line, "You men should be ashamed of yourselves; I created you to be the head of your household! You have been disobedient and have not fulfilled your purpose! Of all of you, only one obeyed. Learn from him."

God turned to the one man, "How did you manage to be the only one in this line?"

The man replied, "My wife told me to stand here."
***
Marriage, the real story
A husband walks into the bedroom to see his wife packing a suitcase. He asks, "What are you doing?"
She answers, "I'm moving to Nevada . I heard that prostitutes there get paid $400.00 for what I'm doing for YOU for FREE!"
Later that night, on her way out, the wife walks into the bedroom and sees her husband packing his suitcase.
When she asks him where he's going, he replies,
"I'm coming too. I want to see how you live on $800.00 a year."
***
Why isn't there democracy in North Korea?
Because everytime they try to pronounce "election" everyone starts to giggle
***
What's the difference between the Titanic and Kim Kardashian?
The number of people who rode the Titanic is known.
***
Three new cellmates are contemplating their life sentences in prison.
The first guy pulls out a deck of playing cards and says, "Don't worry, guys. I brought these cards with me so that we can play poker to pass the time."

The second guy pulls out a harmonica and says, "I brought this harmonica so that I can play some music to cheer us up when we're feeling down."

The third guy pulls out a box of tampons.

"What the hell are we supposed to do with those!?" ask the first two.

"Well, it says on the back that I can ride, swim, ski, *and* play tennis with these."
***
Hitler's proofreader for Mein Kampf was literally a Grammar Nazi.

***
Little Timmy lived in Flint
But little Timmy is no more

For what he thought was H2O

Was PbSO4
***
An old man goes to confession..
An old German man goes to confession one Sunday. He enters the confession, sits down and says "Forgive me Father for I have sinned, and I want to confess". The Priest says "Well my child, what are your sins?". The old man responds "During the war I hid a young Jewish woman from the Nazis in return for sexual favours". The Priest, while surprised, says "It was a difficult time, you risked your life to help this woman despite the immoral exchange". "I understand that father" the old man says "But, do you think I should tell her the war is over?".

Courtesy of my Dad!
***
First Aid
A woman goes into a restaurant in a small town out in the country.       
She orders the chicken and starts to eat.        
Eating too fast she starts to choke on a chicken bone.       
Well these two hillbillies in the next booth notice she is choking,     
so they get up and go over to help her.       
The first country boy drops his coveralls and bends over        
and the second hillbilly starts licking his butt.          
The woman watches these two go at it and is grossed out.          
She pukes all over the place, dislodging the chicken bone from her throat.          
 The hillbilly pulls his overalls back up and says to the other,        
"You're right Leroy, that hind-lick maneuver works like a charm."
***
You play World of Warcraft AND Leage of Legends?
Wow, lol.
***
Donald Trump has just announced his candidacy for president
Sorry for putting the punchline in the title.
***
Grandma's Password
My 100 year old grandma asked me to set up a security camera, so she could see who was stealing her clothes at her assisted living facility, so I brought over a wireless camera and started to install an app on her IPAD for monitoring.

I needed her Apple ID to download the app, so I asked her what her password was.

She poked around in her notebook, and said "required".

It was the wrong password, so I told her, and she looked up at me and said, 'I know that it is right.  I remember it said, "Your password is required."'


***
Balls
A group of generals and an admiral are all fishing off a pier one crisp fall afternoon. They each have a personal aide* with them. The topic of which branch has the biggest balls comes up and the debate get's pretty heated.

The Navy admiral takes his hat* off and throws it into the lake. "Seaman, go get my hat!". His aide* jumps in the cold water and retrieves the admirals hat. He turns to the group and says "Now that, takes balls!". 

The Army general takes his hat off and throws it much farther than the admiral and says "Private, go get my hat!". The private does the same and retrieves his hat. "That gentlemen, takes balls!"

Not to be out done the Marine general takes his hat off and throws it almost the whole length of the lake. "Marine, go and get my hat!". The marine retrieves the hat and with a big look of satisfaction looks at everyone and says "That takes balls!".

The Air Force general had been quiet up to this point. Everyone turned to look at him. He took his hat off and threw it just two feet into the water. He turned and said "Airman, go and get my hat!". The airman looked at the general and said "Fuck you sir". 

With a huge smile on his face the Air Force general said "NOW THAT TAKES BALLS!".

EDIT 1: had should have been hat*.

EDIT 2: aid should have been aide*
***
An atheist in the forest...
stumbles upon a bear. The bear rears up to attack and the atheist yells "oh god no!" time stops and he hears the voice of god say "you called for me my son?" the atheist responds "I would ask you to save me, but that would be hypocritical, so instead, can you make the bear a christian?" he hears "I shall do this for you my son". Time resumes and the bear stops, puts his paws together and says "God in the heavens.... thank you for this meal you have provided me with today, amen"
***
A guy was nailing his interview
A guy was nailing his interview when the employer said "well you look great but I see here there was a 7 year gap since your last job, what happened there?".

The guy says "oh I went to yale".

The employer: "oh great!! Well you're hired, you start monday"

Guy: "Yay! I got a yob!"
***
A physicist, engineer, and a mathematician are in a hotel...
A physicist, engineer, and a mathematician are in a hotel in 3 separate rooms. All 3 of their waste paper baskets catch on fire and wake them up from their humble slumber. 
The physicist sees the fire and thinks quickly! He calculates the amount of water needed to put out the fire, and douses it with water. The fire goes out and he goes back to bed. 
The engineer sees the fire and thinks quickly! He draws, designs, and constructs a larger bucket to suffocate the fire. The fire goes out and he goes back to bed.
The mathematician sees the fire and thinks quickly! He gets out a pad of paper and a pen and starts calculating. After a few minutes he yells "ahah! This problem has a solution!" And goes back to bed.

***
Engineering Joke
Two engineering students were biking across a university campus when one said, "Where did you get such a great bike?"

The second engineer replied, "Well, I was walking along yesterday, minding my own business, when a beautiful woman rode up on this bike, threw it to the ground, took off all her clothes and said, "Take what you want."

The first engineer nodded approvingly and said, "Good choice: The clothes probably wouldn't have fit you anyway."
***
Why didn't the Mexican go bow hunting?
Because he didn't habanero.
***
"Mom? Don't freak out, but I'm in the hospital..."
"Jeremy, you've been a doctor for over 8 years now, please stop starting every phone conversation we have with that."
***
A man saw a lady with big breasts.
He asked, "Excuse me, can I bite your breasts for $1000 ?". She agreed, so they went to a secluded corner. She opens her blouse and the man puts his face in her breasts for 10 minutes. Eventually the lady asks, " Aren't you gonna bite them?". He replies, "No, it's too expensive!".
***
What did the Squirtle say to the Charmander? (X-post from /r/pokemon)
Squirtle
***
A widow puts out an ad for a man...
She put out an ad for a man that would not beat her, not run away, and could satisfy her sexually. A few days later the doorbell rings. And in the doorway is a man with no arms or legs. He told her he was there to answer her ad, and she asked him why he thought he fit the criteria.

"Well, I have no arms so I will never beat you. I have no legs so I can't run from you."

"How do you suppose that you can satisfy me sexual," she asked with a puzzled face.

"Well, I rang the doorbell didn't I?"
***
What do Kim Kardashian and Hurricane Sandy have in common?
They will both blow the entire east coast just to get on TV.


***
Three Old Men
Three old men are sitting on a porch discussing their old person problems

Man 1: Every day at 7:00am i wake up and i piss like a racehorse

Man 2: If you think thats bad, every day at 8:00 i wake up and i have to shit like a pig!

Man 3: You guys don't even have it that bad! Everyday at 7:00 i have to piss like a horse and then at 8:00 i have to shit like a pig, the problem is i don't wake up 'til 9!
***
Why are gay men so well dressed?
They didn't spend all that time in the closet doing nothing.

Edit: ( ͡ʘ ͜ʖ ͡ʘ)
***
Throwing Watches
Three tourists climbed up the tower with London's Big Ben and decided to throw their watches off the top, run down the stairs and try to catch them before they hit the ground. 

The first tourist threw his watch but heard it crash before the had taken three steps. The second threw his watch and made only two steps before hearing his watch shatter. 

The third tourist threw his watch off the tower, went down the stairs, bought a snack at a shop up the street and walked slowly back to Big Ben in time to catch the watch. 

"How did you do that?" asked one of his friends. 

"My watch is 30 minutes slow." 

***
Whats your name?
An attractive woman arrives at a party. While scanning the guests  she spots an interesting looking man standing alone. She approaches him and says "Hello, my name is Carmen."  
"That's a beautiful name" he says, "is it a family name?"
 "No", she replies. "As a matter of fact I gave it to myself. It represents the things I enjoy most...cars and men. Therefore I chose Carmen."
"What's your name?" she asks.

The man replies "B.J.......B.J. Titsngolf."
***
I've been taking Viagra for my sunburn
Doesnt cure it, but it keeps the sheets off my legs at night
***
BUMP... BUMP... BUMP...
Just read this in an email, thought it worthy of sharing.

A man is walking home alone late one foggy night... 
when behind him he hears:
Bump...
BUMP...
BUMP...
Walking faster, he looks back and through the fog he makes out the image of an upright casket banging its way down the middle of the street toward him.
BUMP...
BUMP...
BUMP...
Terrified, the man begins to run toward his home, the casket bouncing quickly behind him
FASTER...
FASTER...
BUMP...
BUMP... 
BUMP...
He runs up to his door, fumbles with his keys, opens the door, rushes in, slams and locks the door behind him.
However, the casket crashes through his door, with the lid of the casket clapping
clappity-BUMP...
clappity-BUMP...
clappity-BUMP...
on his heels, the terrified man runs.
Rushing upstairs to the bathroom, the man locks himself in. His heart is pounding; his head is reeling; his breath is coming in sobbing gasps.
With a loud CRASH the casket breaks down the door.
Bumping and clapping toward him.
The man screams and reaches for something, anything, but all he can find is a bottle of cough syrup!
Desperate, he throws the cough syrup at the casket...
and,
The coffin stops
***
What's long, hard and bendable and contains the letters p, e, n, i, s?
Your spine

Edit: Thanks guys, made it to the front page. Was my first joke and ~~penis~~ spine joke on Reddit. 
***
A man goes to a costume party with nothing but a naked woman on his back.
"What the hell are you supposed to be, then?" the host asks.

"I'm a turtle," the man replies.

"What a pile of shite!" the host replies. "How can you be a turtle when all you've got is that naked woman on your back?"

"Oh her?" the man smiles. "That's just Michelle!"
***
A crab, a tuna, a lobster, and a Chinese man being run over by a steam roller. What doesn't belong?
The Tuna, since all of the others are crushedasians.
***
What do you call a book club that's been stuck on the same book for thousands of years?
Church

Edit: Thanks for Frontpage I will read thru all this when I get home and yeah I'm not an Atheist I'm a Christian
***
Married couple
Married couple at a Zoo walks past a gorilla enclosure.  

Says the woman: 'Mark, Do you know that gorillas are the only animals which resemble men in their behavior? Look, seeing that no"one" is looking, I'll expose 1of my breasts to it & see how horny it gets just as men do.'   

  
Mary then exposes 1 of her breasts, and, sure enough the gorilla gets excited and grabs the bars of the enclosure as if it wanted to break free.   
  
 'See,' says the woman, 'Now, I know why you react the way you do; men can't control their animal instincts just like gorillas can't.'   
Says Mark: 'Now expose both breasts and let us see what happens.' The woman exposes both breasts to the gorilla and it gets very excited and is now desperately trying to escape from the enclosure.   
Says Mark: 'This is incredible, now, pull your skirt up, turn around and expose your bum and let us see what happens!'   
  
The woman pulls her skirt up, turns around with her bum to the gorilla, which by now ,was extremely aroused, breaks free from the enclosure, grabs the woman and starts yanking the clothes off her.   
   
The woman yells: 'Mark , what do I do now? Please, help me!'   
  
Mark replies: 'Now, tell him you have a headache and you're not in mood ...   
Edit: 2   
Edit 2: one
***
I had an idea for a movie plot.
A retired CIA agent searches for his kidnapped daughter in Paris, but it turns out that idea was taken.
I had another idea for one where the same agent is kidnapped with his wife in Istanbul, but it turns out that one was taken too.
***
Judge: "Micky, I can't grant you a divorce from Minnie Mouse, because she is not crazy"
"I didn't say she was crazy Judge, I said she was fucking Goofy"
***
How would a Muslim describe Castro's gay, atheist lover?
In Fidel.
***
A radical feminist is getting on a bus when, just in front of her, a man gets up...
A radical feminist is getting on a bus when, just in front of her, a man gets up from his seat.
She thinks to herself, "Here's another man trying to keep up the customs of a patriarchal society by offering a poor, defenceless woman his seat," and she pushes him back onto the seat.
A few minutes later, the man tries to get up again. She is insulted again and refuses to let him up.
Finally, the man says, "Look, lady, you've got to let me get up. I'm two miles past my stop already."
***
A farmer was having trouble telling his horses apart.
"I have two horses that I can't tell apart," he tells his friend. "Is there any way you can help me?"

"Shave the mane off one horse," his friend said. "Then you'll know the difference between them."

The farmer did as he was told, but after some time the mane grew back and he couldn't tell the difference anymore.

"This time, give one of them a small cut on its leg," said his friend. "Then you can tell it apart from the other."

The farmer did this again, but the other horse ran into a thorn bush and got a similar cut on its leg.

"Measure their height," said his friend. "One of them must definitely be a bit taller than the other."

The farmer tried it out, and it worked. Ecstatic, he ran back to his friend's house.

"It worked!" he yelled. "The black one is two inches taller than the white one!"




***
"Knock knock"
"Who's there?"
"Dave"
"Dave who?"
Dave had to hold back tears as he realised his mother's Alzheimer's is getting worse
***
I used to work in a bakery, didn't really enjoy it and the pay wasn't great...
I just kneaded the dough


I'm sorry, I'll leave now...
***
A man breaks down out the front of a monastery
A man is driving down the road and breaks down near a monastery.

He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, My car broke down. Do you think I could stay the night?

the monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car.

As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound.

The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say,

We can't tell you. You're not a monk.

The man is disappointed but thanks them anyway and goes about his merry way.

Some years later,

The same man breaks down in front of the same monastery.

The monks again accept him, feed him, even fix his car.

That night, he hears the same strange noise that he had heard years earlier.

The next morning, he asks what it is, but the monks reply, We can't tell you. You're not a monk.

The man says, All right, all right. I'm dying to know.

If the only way I can find out what that sound was is to become a monk, how do I become a monk?

The monks reply, You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of sand pebbles When you find these numbers,

you will become a monk.

The man sets about his task.

Some years later, he returns and knocks on the door of the monastery.

He says,

I have traveled the earth and have found what you have asked for. There are

145,236,284,232 blades of grass and

231,281,219,999,129,382 sand pebbles on the earth.

The monks reply, Congratulations. You are now a monk.

We shall now show you the way to the sound.

The monks lead the man to a wooden door where the head monk says,

The sound is right behind that door.

The man reaches for the knob, but the door is locked.

He says, Real funny. May I have the key?

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door.

Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone.

The man demands the key to the stone door.

The monks give him the key, and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby.

He demands another key from the monks, who provide it.

Behind that door is another door, this one made of sapphire,

So it went until the man had gone through doors of emerald,

silver,

topaz,

and amethyst.

Finally, the monks say, This is the last key to the last door.

The man is relieved to know end.

He unlocks the door,

turns the knob,

and behind that door he is amazed to find the source of that strange sound

.

.

.

But he can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk

***
-What are you drinking, son?
-Soy milk.

-Hola milk, soy tu padre.

Edit : Removed the "es" that was bothering everyone
***
In 1839 an Arab man made the first condom
The condom was made of goat intestines.  In 1844, a British scientist revolutionized the condom by removing the intestines from the goat first
***
My favorite joke ( the only one I can remember)
I translated it from Dutch, I hope it is funny in English too.

Yesterday I walked out of the office. A man with a gun approached me and yelled: "your money or your life". So I told him: "I don't have any money, because I work at Reddit". Then the robber said: "Oké, go home then because I hear you have no life either." 
***
Two magicians walk into a bakery
The first palms 3 donuts. He then snidely challenges the other magician to perform a trick of equal benefit. The second magician then calls the baker and asks for 3 donuts if he'd like to see a magic trick. The baker does his part and provides the donuts. The magician then eats the donuts and exclaims "Ta-Dah." The bakery is angered and asks "Well what's the magic trick?" The second magician replies "Look in my friend's pocket."
***
Charles Dickens walks into a bar...
and orders a Martini. The bartender asks,"Olive or twist?"
***
Hillary Clinton will potentially be the first f***** president.
I wrote female, but apparently someone deleted the email
***
My Gran just asked me "What's the name of that God-damn Jew who keeps hiding stuff around my house!?"
It's Alzheimer, grandma. Alzheimer.
***
How did Darth Vader know what Obi-Wan Kenobi was getting for Christmas?
He felt his presents…
***
Why did Leonardo DiCaprio laugh at the Oscar joke?
Because he finally got it﻿
***
Why Sharks Circle You Before Attacking...
Two great white sharks swimming in the ocean spied survivors of a sunken ship. "Follow me son" the father shark said to the son shark and they swam to the Mass of people.

"First we swim around them a few times with just the tip of our fins showing." And they did.

"Well done, son!  Now we swim around them a few times with all of our fins showing."   And they did.

"Now we eat everybody."   And they did.

When they were both gorged, the son asked, "Dad, why didn't we just Eat them all at first?   Why did we swim around and around them?" His wise father replied, "Because they taste better without the sh!t inside!"
***
I have finally punched my membership card into Dad jokes!
So last night my 12 year old son and I are watching the Little League World Series.  The pitcher for the Nevada team has a last name of "Kryszczuk".  My son looks to me and asks "Do you think he's Russian?"

My response:  Nope, it looks like he's taking his time.

It took him a couple of seconds to realize and then he gave me that wonderful "Really, Dad?" look.  I'm so proud.
***
Burglars are getting very clever these days
Last night, my wife woke me up
Darling...! Darling...! There's a burglar downstairs...!!!
So I go down, check every room and don't find anyone.
Then I realized I don't have a wife and when I went back upstairs my bed and TV were gone.
***
A drunk walks into a library...
He goes up to the desk and slurs: I'll have a burger, fries and a milkshake.

The librarian replies: Sir, this is a library!

***whispers*** Sorry, I'll have a burger, fries and a milkshake.
***
A teenage girl goes to her dad and asks if she can borrow
his Porsche for the night. Her dad says:"no", but she begs and begs and he comes up with a solution. He says: "Tell you what, you give me a blow job and the car is yours for the night". She is taken aback but finally decides that she will look so cool and her friends will be so envious and agrees. She unzips his pants and puts his cock in her mouth, then immediately stops and starts gagging. "Dad your cock tastes like shit", she says. Then the dad snaps his fingers in realization and says: "That's right, your brother has the car".
***
A pirate goes to a doctor...
A pirate goes to a doctor, worried that the moles on his back might be cancerous. The doctor inspects them.

"It's ok," he says. "They're benign."

The pirate replies "Check 'em again matey, I think there be at least ten!"

(sorry if repost, haven't seen it on this sub)
***
A guy is in a bar looking slightly worse for wear... (NSFW)
...and the barman notices he looks pretty down and has been drinking quite heavily that night so he decides to ask him what's up.

The guy answers, "Well, I got home from work today to find my wife fucking my best friend."

"Shit, I'm sorry to hear that," says the barman, "that's terrible. What did you do?"

"I told my wife it was over, that I was going out for a couple of hours and when I get back she better be gone because I never want to see her again."

"Fuck," says the barman, sympathetically. "And what did you say to your best friend?"

"Bad dog!"
***
Trump is blaming Sanders for the violence at his rally...
because you can't truly be Hitler until you blame a jew for all your problems.
***
Two gay men were on a train trip

During the night when everyone in the train were sleeping, one of the gay men got horny. 

"Come on, lets do it!"

"No, let's not"

"Why?"

"Maybe the other travelling people will be bothered and awoken by it."

"No, they won't! They're all sleeping like pigs. Let me show you. ANYONE GOT A LIGHTER?" See, no one answered, because they are all sleeping."

"Alright, let's go."

The morning after, the conductor of the train asked the travelers if they had a good night of sleep. 

Then, a drowsy and disturbed-looking old man in the back of the train replied.

"No, I didn't sleep very well at all."

"Why not?" Replied the train conductor.

"I was freezing."

"You could've asked for a blanket."

"I was afraid to ask. There was a guy asking for a lighter, and he got fucked in the ass by someone for three hours."

***
A married couple went to the hospital to have their baby delivered...
A married couple went to the hospital to have their baby delivered. Upon their arrival, the doctor said he had invented a new machine that would transfer a portion of the mother's labor pain to the father.
He asked if they were willing to try it out. They were both very much in favor of it. 

The doctor set the pain transfer to 10% for starters, explaining that even 10% was probably more pain than the father had ever experienced before. But as the labor progressed, the husband felt fine and asked the doctor to go ahead and kick it up a notch. The doctor then adjusted the machine to 20% pain transfer. The husband was still feeling fine.

The doctor checked the husband's blood pressure and was amazed at how well he was doing. At this point they decided to try for 50%. The husband continued to feel quite well. Since the pain transfer was obviously helping out the wife considerably, the husband encouraged the doctor to transfer ALL the pain to him. The wife delivered a healthy baby with virtually no pain. She and her husband were ecstatic.

When they got home, the mailman was dead on the porch.
***
Hell no.
A man dies and is sent to hell. He meets the devil who offers him three choices of punishment for the sins that he had committed. The devil tells the man, "There are three torture rooms, of which you will pick one and go in to replace the person who is being punished in that room. The choice is yours."

The man walks to room one and sees another man in a pit of fire being stabbed by pitchforks. "No way in hell am I going in this room" he thought and proceeded to room two where he sees another man, bound and gagged, being whipped with a acid laced spiked chain. "Holy shit" the man says and he continues on to room three.

Upon arriving at room three he noticed a man receiving a blowjob from the sexiest, most beautiful woman he had ever seen, and without hesitation he tells the devil, "I choose this room." The devil replied, "Very well" and walks up to the woman and says to her, "You're free to go, your replacement's here."
***
Not a joke, just a story with a reminder to be careful when telling jokes...
I heard a joke a few weeks ago that went, "What do you do when an epileptic is having a fit in the bath? Throw your washing in."

I decided to repeat the joke in work today to a few of my customers (I work in a pub) and when I finished, one guy got really mad at me. He screamed that I shouldn't tell jokes like that because his brother died in the bath as a kid while having an epileptic fit.

I asked, "Did he drown?"

The guy was furious and said, "No, he choked on a sock!"


***
This piece of tarmac is arguing with a stone in a bar...
"I'm the hardest!." says the tarmac, "All the roads in the country are made from me bitch!." "I'm the hardest" says the stone, "Every mountain in the world is made from me!"
2 minutes later, a piece of a bicycle lane strolls in, orders a whiskey and silently sits down in the corner. 
A hush falls over the bar.
Sensing some hostility, the barman tries to keep the peace.
"Hey guys, whose the hardest?"
"We're hard, but that guy's a cycle path."

***
20 Long Years
A  woman awakes in the middle of the night to find her husband not in  bed. She puts on her robe and goes downstairs to look for him.

She  finds him sitting at the kitchen table with a cup of hot cocoa in front  of him. He appears to be deep in thought, just staring at the wall. She  watches as he wipes away a tear from his eye.

“What’s the matter dear?” she whispers as she steps into the room. “Why are you down here at this time of night!?”

    
The husband looks up from his drink, “It’s the 20th anniversary of the day we met.”

She can’t believe he has remembered. She starts to tear up.

The husband continues solemnly, “Do you remember 20 years ago when we started dating? I was 18 and you were only 15.”

Once again, the wife is touched to tears thinking that her husband is so caring and sensitive.

“Yes, I do,” she replies.

The husband pauses… the words were not coming easily.

“Do you remember when your father caught us in the back seat of my car?”

“Yes, I remember,” said the wife, lowering herself into a chair beside him.

The husband continued.

“Do  you remember when he shoved the shotgun in my face and said, ‘Either  you marry my daughter or I will make sure you spend the next 20 years in  prison?'”

“I remember that too,” she replied softly…

He sighed as he wiped another tear away from his cheek and said, “I would have gotten out today.” 
***
A penguin has some car trouble...
A vacationing penguin is driving his car through Arizona when he notices that the oil pressure light is on. He gets out to look and sees oil dripping out of the motor. He drives to the nearest town and stops at the first gas station.

After dropping the car off, the penguin goes for a walk around town. He sees an ice-cream shop and, being a penguin in Arizona, decides that something cold would really hit the spot. He gets a big dish of ice cream and sits down to eat. Having no hands he makes a real mess trying to eat with his flippers. After finishing his ice cream, he goes back to the gas station and asks the mechanic if he's found the problem. The mechanic looks up and says "It looks like you blew a seal."

"No no," the penguin replies, "it's just ice cream."
***
Nancy and the gold fish
Little Nancy is digging a hole in the back yard when her neighbor looks over the fence.

"What are you doing little girl?"

"My goldfish died, so I'm digging a hole to bury it."

The neighbor smiles:

"But isn't that hole a little big for a gold fish?"

"Not if it's inside your fucking cat."
***
A man walks into a bar...
and glances at the menu.

* **Sandwiches, $2**

* **Hand jobs, $5**

He calls over to the waitress, a gorgeous young blonde woman who appeared to be in her mid-twenties.

"Hey, hi there. Are you the one doing the hand jobs?"

She smiles thinly, "Yes sir, I am."

"Well, wash your hands and put on some gloves. I'd like a sandwich."
***
Why do they evacuate women and children first?
You can't fix shit with all that screaming and crying.

(**Yes, you can evacuate people.** Check #2 here: http://www.dictionary.com/browse/evacuate)
***
Dad with his son are watching a movie when a sex scene begins
\-Son, leave the room please.

\-Dad, but I'm 23...

\-I don't give a fuck how old you are, you're not going to watch me jack off.
***
A boy asks his Dad one day, “Dad, what’s the difference between confident and confidential?”
His Dad replies, “Well, you’re my son – I’m confident about that. And your best friend Jimmy is also my son – that’s confidential.”
***
Jesus and his disciples walk into a restaurant.
Jesus: A table for 26, please.

Headwaiter:  But there's only . . . um, 13 of you.

Jesus: Yeah, we're all going to sit on the same side.
***
Lindsay Lohan got her blouse dirty...
..and had to take it to the dry cleaners.  She says "I need to get this cleaned" to the man behind the counter.  The man who was hard of hearing replies "come again?", Lindsay responds "No, mustard".
***
A man gets in a fight with his wife
A man gets in an argument with his wife during dinner. After the meal, the husband furiously runs down to their wine cellar and opens a bottle of vintage wine. Magically, a genie comes out of the bottle and says "You have freed me. You now have three wishes. But you should know, whatever you wish for, your wife will get double." 
The man says "I understand. My first wish will be a large beach house."
The genie snapped his fingers and said "Your new beach house is waiting for you. But your wife now has two beach houses right next to yours."
"That's fine" the man said. "How about a nice sports car?"
The genie snapped his fingers and said "Your brand new sports car is in your garage. But your wife now has two sports cars. You have one more wish."

The man thought and thought about what his last wish should be. After a few hours of thinking, he stood up and told the genie "I wish you would beat me half to death." 
***
After his team was eliminated from the World Cup,
The Nigerian captain personally offered to refund all expenses that fans of his country paid for to travel to Brazil.

According to sources close to the player, he just needs their bank details and pin numbers to complete the transactions.
***
If Mississippi wears her New Jersey, what does Delaware?
I dunno, Alaska.
***
No end in sight...
I can't see an end. 
I have no control.
I don't think there's any escape.
I don't even have a home anymore.

Time for a new keyboard.
***
The husband store
A store that sells new husbands has opened in town, where a woman may go to choose a husband. Among the instructions at the entrance is a description of how the store operates:
 
 
You may visit this store ONLY ONCE! There are six floors and the value of the products increase as the shopper ascends the flights. The shopper may choose any item from a particular floor, or may choose to go up to the next floor, but you cannot go back down except to exit the building!
 
 
So, a woman goes to the Husband Store to find a husband. On the first floor the sign on the door reads:

 
 Floor 1 - These men Have Jobs
 
 
She is intrigued, but continues to the second floor, where the sign reads:

 
 Floor 2 - These men Have Jobs and Love Kids.
 
 
'That's nice,' she thinks, 'but I want more.'
 
 
So she continues upward. The third floor sign reads:

 
 Floor 3 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, and are Extremely Good Looking.
 
 
'Wow,' she thinks, but feels compelled to keep going.
 
 
She goes to the fourth floor and the sign reads:

 
 Floor 4 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, are Drop-dead Good Looking and Help With Housework.
 
 
'Oh, mercy me!' she exclaims, 'I can hardly stand it!'
 
 
Still, she goes to the fifth floor and the sign reads:

 
 Floor 5 - These men Have Jobs, Love Kids, are Drop-dead Gorgeous, Help with Housework, and Have a Strong Romantic Streak.
 
 
She is so tempted to stay, but she goes to the sixth floor, where the sign reads:

 
 Floor 6 - You are visitor 31,456,012 to this floor. There are no men on this floor. This floor exists solely as proof that women are impossible to please. Thank you for shopping at the Husband Store.
***
Three engineers are riding in a car.
One is a mechanical engineer, one is an electrical engineer, and one is a computer engineer.

The car breaks down and coasts to the side of the road. 

"Hang on," says the mechanical engineer. "The problem is probably the engine, let me have a look at it and I'll have us on the road again in no time."

"Wait," says the electrical engineer. "The way it just stopped like that, I think it's the electrical system. Let me have a look and I'll get us going again in a minute or two."

"Hold on," says the computer engineer. "Why don't we all just get out of the car and get in again, and then see if it starts?"
***
Semen Sample
An 85-year-old man was requested by his doctor for a sperm count as part of his physical exam. The doctor gave the man a jar and said, "Take this jar home and bring back a semen sample tomorrow." 


The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor's office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day. The doctor asked, what happened and the man explained. "Well, doc, it's like this--first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin' it between her knees, but still nothing." The doctor was shocked! "You asked your neighbor?" The old man replied, "Yep, none of us could get the jar open."
***
A kid walks up to his dad... "Daddy, what does a vagina look like?"
His dad asks: "Do you mean before or after sex?"

Kid: "What's the difference?"

Dad: "Okay think of the most beautiful flower you've ever seen, with pink, symetrical petals, a thing of pure 
beauty... do you have that image in your head?" - "yes, daddy" - "Well son, that's what a vagina looks like before sex!"

Kid: "And what does it look like after?"

Dad: "Well... ever seen a bulldog who ate a jar of majonaise?"
***
Why do Indians hate snow?
Because it's white and settles on their land.

Edit: well now I know what people mean by rip inbox.

Edit2: wtf happened to my headline, why is it Donald trump?
***
String to the penis
A couple was watching a documentary about an African tribe. They learned that when each male member of this particular tribe reaches a certain age, he has a string with a weight attached to it tied around his penis. After a while the weight stretches the penis until it's 20 inches long.

Later that evening, as the man was getting out of the shower, his wife said, "let's try the African string and weight technique hon"

The husband agreed, and they tied a string with a weight to his penis.

A few days later the wife asked, "how is our little experiment coming along?". The husband replied "Well, it looks like we're about halfway there".

The wife impressed and said, "you mean it's already grown to 10 inches?"

"No" the husband replied. "It's turning black"
***
Two whales walk into a bar.
The bartender asks what he can get them.

The first whale says "WOOOOOOWWWWWWWOOOOOOOEEEEEEEEEEE WWONNNKKKKKWOAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOAAAAAAAAAAAAAWOOOOO."

The second whale says "damn it Frank you're already drunk."
***
A woman is at home when she hears someone......
A woman is at home when she hears someone knocking at her door.
She goes to the door opens it and sees a man standing there.
He asks the lady, "Do you have a Vagina?"
She slams the door in disgust.
The next morning she hears a knock at the door, its the same man and he asks the same question to the woman, "Do you have a Vagina?"
She slams the door again.
Later that night when her husband gets home she tell him what has happened for the last two days.
The husband tells his wife in a loving and concerned voice, "Honey, I am taking an off tomorrow so as to be home, just incase this guy shows up again."
The next morning they hear a knock at the door and both ran for the door. 
The husband whisperes to the wife, "Honey, im going to hide behind the door and listen and if it is the same guy I want you to answer yes to the
question because I want to a see where he's going with this."
She nods yes to her husband and opens the door.
Sure enough the same fellow is standing there, he asks, "Do you have a Vagina?"
"Yes I do." says the lady.
The man replies, "Good, would you mind telling your husband to leave my wife's alone and start using yours!"
***
As a couple gets into bed, the husband starts to rub and kiss his wife.
She turns over and says, "I'm sorry, honey. I've got a gynecologist appointment tomorrow, and I want to stay fresh." The husband sadly turns over. A few minutes later, he rolls back over and taps his wife. "Do you have a dentist appointment, too?"
***
A man is driving down the road...
A man is driving down the road and breaks down near a monastery. 

He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, My car broke down. 
Do you think I could stay the night?

the monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car. 

As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound. 

The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say,

We can't tell you. You're not a monk.

The man is disappointed but thanks them anyway and goes about his merry way. 

Some years later, 

The same man breaks down in front of the same monastery. 

The monks again accept him, feed him, even fix his car.

That night, he hears the same strange noise that he had heard years earlier.

The next morning, he asks what it is, but the monks reply, We can't tell you. You're not a monk.

The man says, All right, all right. I'm dying to know.

If the only way I can find out what that sound was is to become a monk, how do I become a monk?

The monks reply, You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of sand pebbles When you find these numbers,

you will become a monk.

The man sets about his task.

Some 45 years later, he returns and knocks on the door of the monastery.

He says,

I have traveled the earth and have found what you have asked for. There are 145,236,284,232 blades of grass and 231,281,219,999,129,382 sand pebbles on the earth.

The monks reply, Congratulations. You are now a monk.

We shall now show you the way to the sound.

The monks lead the man to a wooden door where the head monk says,

The sound is right behind that door.

The man reaches for the knob, but the door is locked.

He says, Real funny. May I have the key?

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door.

Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone.

The man demands the key to the stone door.

The monks give him the key, and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby.

He demands another key from the monks, who provide it.

Behind that door is another door, this one made of sapphire,

So it went until the man had gone through doors of emerald,

silver,

topaz, 

and amethyst.

Finally, the monks say, This is the last key to the last door.

The man is relieved to know end.

He unlocks the door,

turns the knob, 

and behind that door he is amazed to find the source of that strange sound

. . . . 

. . . . 

. . . . 

. . . . 

But he can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk
***
Pavlov walks into a bar.
Ivan Pavlov walks into a bar. 
The bartender rings the bell for last drinks, and he thinks "shit - I forgot to feed the dog"
***
Who are the most homo-erotic pop group at Hogwarts?
Wand Erection.

EDIT: If you don't get it, try saying it aloud.
***
Comas can really change the meaning of a sentence...
For instance:   
"Ben is in a hurry."  
"Ben is in a coma."  
***
Four engineers in a car...
Four engineers are driving to a conference when the car sputters and dies as they pull off to the shoulder. After a moment of silent contemplation, the electrical engineer says; "you know, I bet the coil's bad. We need to replace the core." The chemical engineer says; "you're nuts, it's obviously the fuel's gone bad. We need to drain the tank and refill." The mechanical engineer scoffs; "you're both wrong. Sounds to me like a valve lifter is froze. We're gonna need to rip the block apart."

After another moment of silence the three look back at the computer engineer who says; "maybe if we get out of the car and get back in?"
***
I told you I was broke…
A little old lady answered a knock on the door one day, only to be confronted by a well-dressed young man carrying a vacuum cleaner.

‘Good morning,’ said the young man. ‘If I could take a couple of minutes of your time, I would like to demonstrate the very latest in high-powered vacuum cleaners . ‘

‘Go away!’ said the old lady. ‘I’m broke and haven’t got any money!’ and she proceeded to close the door.

Quick as a flash, the young man wedged his foot in the door and pushed it wide open. ‘Don’t be too hasty!’ he said. ‘Not until you have at least seen my demonstration.’ And with that, he emptied a bucket of horse manure onto her hallway carpet. ‘If this vacuum cleaner does not remove all traces of this horse manure from your carpet, Madam, I will personally eat the remainder.’

The old lady stepped back and said, ‘Well let me get you a fork, ’cause they cut off my electricity this morning.

***
Two guys and a girl become shipwrecked on a deserted island...
...but fortunately there is plenty of food and fresh water. Over the next few months, they build a little community: all three craft little huts out of sticks and leaves, and they fairly split up all the tasks and chores essential to their survival. They even build a little church where they go to pray every Sunday.

But after a little while, everyone gets, well, restless. To be blunt, they're all horny and have no sexual outlets. Being devoutly religious people, pre-marital sex is out of the question.

So, they come up with a system. The woman marries one of the men for a week, then gets a divorce and marries the other man for a week. They just go back and forth like this. This way, each of the guys get seven days full of sex every other week, and the girl gets laid whenever she wants.

This situation works out great, and their three-person community is thriving. But after eight months of this, the woman gets bit by a poisonous snake and dies.

The first week is really rough. The second week is even worse. The third week is just plain terrible. The fourth week is practically unbearable. So on the fifth week, they decide to bury the body.
***
What did the NSA agent say to the other NSA agent when he saw the German Chancellor?
I'd tap that.
***
Naked Underneath
Naked underneath
A young man moved into a new apartment on his own, and went to the lobby to put his name on his mailbox. While there, an attractive young lady came out of the apartment next to the mailboxes wearing a robe.

The boy smiled at the young woman and she started a conversation with him.

As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious that she had nothing else on. The poor kid broke into a sweat trying to maintain eye contact. After a few minutes, she placed her hand on his arm and said, "Let's go to my apartment, I hear someone coming."

He followed her into her apartment; she closed the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off completely. Now nude, she purred at him, "What would you say is my best feature?" Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, "It's got to be your ears!"

Astounded, and a little hurt she asked, "My ears? Look at these breasts; they are full and 100% natural! I work out every day! My butt is firm and solid! Look at my skin - no blemishes anywhere! How can you think that the best part of my body is my ears?"

Clearing his throat, he stammered, "Outside, when you said you heard someone coming? That was me."
***
Have you heard my joke about the Ebola outbreak yet?
Eh... Nevermind. You probably won't get it.
***
A man named Eric Cole...
... discovered that there was a direct correlation between the amount of mayonnaise on his cabbage salad and how good it tastes.
He's calling this correlation Cole's Law.
***
Legs Up
Nina comes home after school and asks her mother "mommy, why do people go to heaven with their legs up?". Mother responds: "I don't think that's true, Nina. Why do you think so?". "Because I just walked past the neighbours house" Nina says "and the lady was screaming 'Oh God, i'm coming', so it was a good thing daddy was lying on top of her, otherwise she would have really gone too!"
***
A young couple, just married, were...
in their honeymoon suite on their wedding night. As they were undressing for bed, the husband, who was a big, burly man, tossed his pants to the bride and said, "Here, put these on."

She put them on, but they were way too big.

"I can't wear your pants," she said.

"That's right," said the husband, "and don't you ever forget it. I'm the man who wears the pants in this family."

With that, she flipped him her panties and said, "Try these on."

He tried them on, and they were way to thin.

"Hell," he said, "I can't get into your panties."

She replied, "That's right, and it's going to be that way till your attitude changes."
***
A man is condemned to death by stoning
A man is condemned to death by stoning. As the people gather around him and get ready to begin, Jesus emerges from the crowd and stands by the man. He says to the crowd, "Let he who is without sin, cast the first stone."

The crowd is taken aback, and begins to disperse, when an old lady comes forward, picks up a large rock, and hurls it at the condemned. The crowd quickly joins in and the man dies.

When the dust settles, Jesus walks up to the old lady and says "You know, I'm getting real sick of your shit mom."
***
News has just come in that The Mars Rover has discovered a member of the feline species while exploring.
Unfortunately, Curiosity killed the cat.

Edit: this is /u/Onetap1's joke, credit goes to him
***
Jesus walks into a restaurant...
And says to the Maitre'd "Table for 26 please"

Confused,  the Maitre'd does a quick head count,  and says "But there are only 13 of you."

Jesus replies "Yes, but we are all going to sit on the same side"
***
A woman arrived at a party
A woman arrived at a party & while scanning the guests she spotted an attractive man standing alone. She approached him smiled and said, "Hello. My name is Carmen."
"That's a beautiful name," he replied. "Is it a family name?"
"No," she replied. "As a matter of fact I gave it to myself. It represents the things that I enjoy the most - cars and men. Therefore I chose Carmen." "What's your name?" she asked.
He answered "B.J. Titsengolf."
***
A man with a gun walks in to a bar...
He unholsters the weapon and waves it in the air, shouting, "I have a 45 caliber Colt 1911 with 7 rounds in the magazine and one in the chamber, and I want to know who's been sleeping with my wife!"

A voice from the back shouts, "you're gonna need more ammo!"
***
The librarian NSFW
A man walks into a library and says to the librarian, "do you have that book for men with small penises?" 

The librarian looks on her computer and says, "I don't know if it's in yet."


"Yeah that's the one"
***
Where does Justin Timberlake go swimming when he's in the Ukraine?
The Crimea River
***
The black cow and the white cow.
A man goes hiking and he sees a farmer with two cows, one is black and the other is white. The man walks up to the farmer and asks him "What do you feed the cows?" The farmer asks "The black one or the white one?". 
"The black one" says the man. 
"I feed it grass."
"What about the white one then?"
"I feed it grass too."
The man nods "And where do the usually sleep?"
"The black one or the white one?" the farmer asks.
"The black one" 
"In the barn"
"What about the white one?"
"It sleeps in the barn too." Says the farmer.
The hiker starts getting frustrated, "And what do you use them for?" he asks.
The farmer asks again "The black one or the white one?". 
"The black one"
"Well I use it to get milk"
"And the white one?"
"I use it to get milk too."
The hiker gets extremely angry, and yells "What the hell is wrong with you? You keep asking me which cow I mean, then give me the same response for both!"
The farmer answers calmly "Well because the black cow is mine."
"Oh, and what about the white one?"
"It's mine too.."
***
"My first son has a PHD in arts, my daughter has two degrees in communication and jornalism and my youngest son is a burglar."
Friend: "Wow a burglar? You should kick him out!"

Dad: "Nah... he is the only one who makes money."
***
Guy goes into a pet store, looking to buy a parrot...
All the parrots were pretty expensive, except one. He asks the owner of the shop why is this one so cheap? It was a beautiful one to boot! the shop owner explains the the bird has a really dirty mouth and wants to get rid of it. The guy thinks to himself that he can teach it to be polite and not to curse anymore so decides to buy the parrot. When he get home with his new pet, the parrot starts calling him foul names, and will not stop no matter what the man tries. finally sick of the damn thing, the the man snatches the parrot up and puts him in the freezer. The parrot continues to curse and yell at the man for a few minutes, but then sudden stopped. No noise or anything, so the man feels so bad thinking he killed his parrot, he rushed to the freezer and swung it open as fast as he could! When he opened it the parrot calmly steps out and says, "I'm so sorry for calling you horrible names and spewing profanities, I promise I will never do it again." Shocked, the man just stared at the parrot and before he could think of anything to say the parrot says, "Sir, if I may ask, what did the chicken do?"

:D
***
How many hipsters does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
It's a really obscure number and you've probably never heard of it.
***
A blonde walks into a library and says to the librarian "CAN I GET A BIG MAC FRIES AND A COKE?!!" The librarian says "excuse me miss.....this is a library."
The blonde says...."oh im sorry (whispers) can i get a big mac fries and a coke?"
***
I was in the pub last night when the barman asked me, "How come I never see you in here with Pete any more?"
I asked him, "Would you drink with a bloke who's a liar, always late, borrows money he never pays back, always tries to squirm out of his round, jealous of everything you have, and when your back is turned he tries to fuck your wife and daughter?"

"Bloody hell! No!" he said, somewhat flabbergasted.

"Well, neither would Pete,"
***
Hung Chow Calls into work and says "Hey boss, I no come into work today, I really Sick...
I got Headache, stomachache, and my legs hurt. I no come to work."

The boss says, "You know Hung Chow, I really need you today.  When I feel sick, I go to my wife and tell her to give me sex.  That makes everything better and i go to work.  You try that."

Two hours later Hung Chow calls again.  "Boss, I do what you say and I feel great.  I be at work soon. You got nice house."

***
Comas can really change the meaning of a sentence..
For example
"Ben is in a hurry."
"Ben is in a coma."
***
My friend Oscar met Leonardo DiCaprio and told him a joke.
He didn't get it.
***
A chemist comes back from his lunch break.
He finds his assistant busy behind the counter, and a man twitching while leaning against the wall. "What's going on?" he asks. The assistant tells him that the man came in for some cough syrup. "Well, did you give it to him?" asks the chemist. "No, we didn't have any," replies the assistant.

"So what *have* you given him?" asks the chemist. "Laxatives," replies the assistant. The chemists stares at the assistant, then the man, then back again.

And the assistant says, "Well, he doesn't want to cough now."
***
A little girl asks her grandad...
"Would you make a frog noise for me?"
The grandad, confused asks, "why?"
The little girl replies, "dad says when you croak we are all going to disneyland".
***
Scotland's Independence
David Cameron has said Scotland could become a third world country if they become independent.
I'm not sure if things will improve to that degree, but you never know
***
How many McDonalds workers does it take to change a lightbulb?
None, because they can't climb the ladder.

*Edit: Wasn't my joke, it was a friends but I can't credit him since I don't know his account name*
***
Why wasn't Jesus born in the USA?
Because God couldn't find three wise men and a virgin.
***
TIL in 1974 Russians accidentally blew up their own submarine, thinking it was an enemy
Oops, wrong sub
***
So a man gets on a plane...
...he finds his seat and realizes he's sitting none other than the pope. The man is Catholic and greets the pope with:

"His Holiness". 

The pope welcomes him and then goes back to his crossword. The man is nervous, worrying about doing something to offend the leader of his religion. About halfway through the flight the pope leans over and asks:

"would you happen to know a 4 letter word for a girl that ends in U-N-T?" 

The man almost loses it. Of course the c word jumps to the front of his  mind. He pauses, turning white while searching his mind for a better word. In a flash it comes to him:

"AUNT!!!" he exclaims.

The pope responds:

"Of course! Would you happen to have an eraser?" 
***
The American education system obviously listen to Pink Floyd.
They've left those kids a loan.

EDIT: Woke up to find THIS :O


***
Why don't people give Melania Trump a break...
Life is hard enough growing up as a black woman in the USA.
***
Honey," said this husband to his wife,
 "I invited a friend home for supper." 
"What? Are you crazy? The house is a mess, I didn't go shopping, all the dishes are dirty, and I don't feel like cooking a fancy meal!"

"I know all that." replied the nonchalant husband.

"Then why on Earth did you invite a friend for supper?!?" said the infuriated wife.

"Because the poor guy's thinking about getting married."

***
So my Dad walked in on me making out with my girlfriend
I was naturally very embarrased, as I didn't want my parents to know I had a girlfriend and make a big deal about it. But my Dad said to me, "Don't worry son, I won't tell your mother, this will be our little secret".

The next day I'm eating breakfast with my family. My Mom says to me, "Son, where did that hickey on your neck come from?". In response I say, "This is me and Dad's little secret".

Afterwards, everyone at the table got really quiet.
***
Three logicians walk into a bar..
The bartender asks, "would all three of you like some beer?"

The first one replies,"I don't know"

The second one replies, "I don't know either"

The third replies, "Yes all three of us would like a beer"
***
Why was the Muslim rubbing the goat?


Not because he was in to bestiality, you Islamophobe.

He was at the petting zoo for his wife's 9th birthday

***
Why do hipsters love Raiders of the Lost Ark?
Because it's the first Indy movie.
***
A groaner just for you...
Q. What do you have if you are holding a mothball in your right hand and a mothball in your left hand?

A. A **VERY** large moth...
***
Two mathematicians walk into a bar...
and begin to argue about the intelligence of the waitresses. One mathematician gets up, and on his way to the bathroom stops his server. He tells her: "I'll give you $5 is you answer "one-third x cubed" to the next question I ask you, ok?" 
The server nods, and walks away. When the mathematician returns to his table, he tells his colleague: "I bet you $100 that our server can answer a simple calculus problem." He then proceeds to flag down the server and asks her, "What is the indefinite integral of x squared?"
She responds, "one-third x cubed." The man then proceeds to collect his money, only to be interrupted by the server saying "plus a constant."

***
Layoffs
The boss has to lay off one person from his department and he's narrowed the choice down to Ann or Jack. First he invites Ann in.
The boss says "I have a problem, I have to lay you or Jack off"
"You better jack off, I've got a headache"

***
What does Arnold Schwarzenegger call a colonoscopy?
A Cameron Diaz
***
A computer science student is studying under a tree and another pulls up on a flashy new bike. The first student asks, “Where’d you get that?”'...
A computer science student is studying under a tree and another pulls up on a flashy new bike. The first student asks, “Where’d you get that?”'

The student on the bike replies, “While I was studying outside, a beautiful girl pulled up on her bike. She took off all her clothes and said, ‘You can have anything you want’.”

The first student responds, “Good choice! Her clothes probably wouldn’t have fit you.”
***
An elderly couple are enjoying their 75th anniversary.
The old man leans forward and says softly to his wife, “Dear, there is something that I must ask you. It has always bothered me that our tenth child never quite looked like the rest of our children. Now I want to assure you that these 75 years have been the most wonderful experience I could have ever hoped for, and your answer cannot take that all that away. But, I must know, did he have a different father?” The wife drops her head, unable to look her husband in the eye, she paused for a moment and then confessed. “Yes. Yes he did.” The old man is very shaken, the reality of what his wife was admitting hit him harder than he had expected. With a tear in his eye he asks “Who? Who was he? Who was the father?” Again the old woman drops her head, saying nothing at first as she tried to muster the courage to tell the truth to her husband. Then, finally, she says, “You.”
***
Two Blondes are out on a hike....
....when one looks down and sees some tracks. "Hey look, deer tracks!" she exclaims. The other blond looks over and says, "Those aren't deer tracks! Those are rabbit tracks!" After about 10 minutes of bickering about what type of tracks they are, they get hit by a train.
***
A blonde, wanting to earn some money,
decided to hire herself out as a handyman-type and started canvassing a wealthy neighborhood. She went to the front door of the first house and asked the owner if he had any jobs for her to do. 

"Well, you can paint my porch. How much will you charge?" The blonde said, "How about 50 dollars?" The man agreed and told her that the paint and ladders that she might need were in the garage. The man's wife, inside the house, heard the conversation and said to her husband, "Does she realize that the porch goes all the way around the house?" The man replied, "She should. She was standing on the porch." 

A short time later, the blonde came to the door to collect her money. "You're finished already?" he asked. "Yes," the blonde answered, "and I had paint left over, so I gave it two coats." Impressed, the man reached in his pocket for the $50. "And by the way," the blonde added, "that's not a porch, it's a Ferrari."
***
New Apartment
A young man moved out from home and into a new apartment, all of his own, he went proudly down to the lobby to put his name on his mailbox. 
 While there, a stunning young lady came out of the apartment next to the mailboxes, wearing only a robe. 
 The boy smiled at the young woman and she started up a conversation with him. As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious that she had nothing else on. 
 The poor kid broke into a sweat trying to maintain eye contact. After a few minutes, she placed her hand on his arm and said, 'Let's go to my apartment, I hear someone coming.' 
 He followed her into her apartment; she closed the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off completely. Now nude, she purred at him, 'What would you say is my best feature?' Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, 'It's got to be your ears.' 
 Astounded, and a little hurt she asked, 'My ears? Look at these breasts; they are a full 38 inches and 100% natural. I work out every day and my ass is firm and solid. I have a 28 inch waist. Look at my skin - not a blemish anywhere. How can you think that the best part of my body is my 
 ears?' 
 Clearing his throat, he stammered... 'Outside, when you said you heard someone coming... that was me.' 

***
Why did EA remove gender restrictions in The Sims 4?
They're just doing their small part, because EA loves micro trans actions. 
***
What do you call a Frenchman that wears sandals?
Phillipe Floppe

Courtesy, my Neuroscience Prof.
 
***
My urge to sing "The Lion Sleeps Tonight" is just a whim away
a whim away, a whim away, a whim away
***
A 3-year-old is watching his mum get changed...
As she drops her knickers, he points at her crotch and asks: "Mum, what is that?!"

Panicking, the mother quips "Oh, that's... that's where god hit me with an axe..."

"Phwoar" Says the boy... "Right in the cunt!"
***
Sir you don't need to be tailgating me I'm already going 55mph in a 35mph zone
And the lights on top of your car look ridiculous 
***
I've been so stressed recently I've been doing that Chinese thing with the needles.
You know...heroin.
***
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman went to a bar.
They all had to leave because the Englishman wanted to go.
***
A pirate walks into a bar...
A pirate walks into a bar with a steering wheel attached to his crotch.  The bartender looks at the steering wheel and asks, "Doesn't that bother you?"  The pirate responds, "Yar it's driving me nuts."
***
A women is cooking eggs in the kitchen when her husband comes running in…
Immediately, he sees the eggs and gasps in horror.

"Be careful! CAREFUL! Put in some more butter! Oh, my GOSH!"

The wife, startled at her husband's violent reaction, dashes to the fridge to get some butter.

"You're cooking too many at once. TOO MANY! Turn them! TURN THEM NOW!"

The wife, concerned by the status of her husband's mental state,forgets about the butter and goes running to the eggs.

"WE NEED BUTTER! Are you CRAZY??? Where are we going to get the butter? They're going to stick! HURRY!"

The wife runs to the fri-

"CAREFUL about the eggs! CAREFUL. You NEVER listen to me when you're cooking! Never! Turn them quickly! Oh not that quickly, don't you know how to cook? Are you insane? Turn the DAMN EGGS!"

At this point, the wife starts crying, since she has no idea what to do. 

She gasps "What is WRONG with you? I know how to cook eggs."

The husband simply smiles, remarks "I just wanted to show you what it feels like while I'm driving with you in the car", and leaves.


***
Two factory workers are talking.
Two factory workers are talking. The woman says, "I can make the boss give me the day off."

The man replies, "And how would you do that?"

The woman says, "Just wait and see." She then hangs upside-down from the ceiling.

The boss comes in and says, "What are you doing?"


The woman replies, "I'm a light bulb."


The boss then says, "You've been working so much that you've gone crazy. I think you need to take the day off."


The man starts to follow her and the boss says, "Where are you going?"


The man says, "I'm going home, too. I can't work in the dark." 

***
Bros v. Hoes
A woman doesn't come home one night. The next day she tells her husband that she had slept over at a girlfriend's house. 
The husband calls his wife's 10 best friends. None of them know anything about it. 

A man doesn’t come home one night. The next day he tells his wife that he had slept over at a friend’s house. The wife calls her husband's 10 best men friends. Eight of them confirm that he had slept over, and two claim that he was still there.
***
Understanding Engineers
Two engineering students were biking across a university campus when one 
said, "Where did you get such a great bike?" The second engineer 
replied, "Well, I was walking along yesterday, minding my own business, 
when a beautiful woman rode up on this bike, threw it to the ground, 
took off all her clothes and said, "Take what you want." The first 
engineer nodded approvingly and said, "Good choice: The clothes probably 
wouldn't have fit you anyway."
***
What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea?
I've never paid $100 to have a lentil on my face. 
***
If Reese Witherspoon married Bill Withers
...she'd have to give up the poon. 
***
What do you call two gay Irish men?
Patrick Fitzgerald and Gerald Fitzpatrick
***
An Asian guy and this girl are driving in a car...
The girl decides it would be nice of her to give the guy a blowjob. They both agree. She starts to take off his pants, but before she gets past his underwear the girl looks up and says"Is it true what they say about Asian guys?" and he turns to her and says" Sadly it is." then he crashes the car and they both die.
***
Husband and wife are arguing...
The husband thinks it's raining

His wife says, "No honey, that's snow"

So they ask Rudolph, their Soviet friend what he thinks.

He says, "That is rain, comrade."

The husband says, "See! Rudolph the Red knows rain, dear."

***
Dad: Say daddy!
Baby: Mommy!

Dad: Come on, say daddy!

Baby: Mommy!

Dad: F*ck you, say daddy!

Baby: F*ck you, Mommy!

Mom: Honey, I'm home!

Baby: F*ck you!

Mom: Who taught you that?

Baby: Daddy!

Dad: Son of a b*tch.
***
A guy goes in an adult store and asks for an inflatable doll.
The guy behind the counter says, "Male or female?"The customer says, "Female"The counter guy asks, "Black or white?"The customer says, "White"The counter guy asks, "Christian or Muslim?"The customer says, "What the hell does religion have to do with it?"The counter guy says, "The Muslim one blows itself up!"
***
What does a Chicago police officer and a professional skateboarder have in common?
They both shred footage.



(*be gentle, it's my first time.*)
***
Why don't you want to win an award for Best Feline Sphincter?
Because it's a catastrophe :-)

Yeah, ok, I'll be going now.

EDIT: removed explanation.
***
What's the difference between John Wayne and Jack Daniels?
Jack Daniels is still killing indians.
***
Blonde guy gets home from work...
Hears his wife screaming, coming from their bedroom upstairs. He sprints up, and opens the door to see his wife laying naked on their bed, sweating and panting.

"Honey! Help! I'm having a heart attack!"

He runs back down the stairs and starts dialing the ambulance, when his son and daughter tell him:

"Dad! Uncle Terry's upstairs! And he's naked!"

He slams down the phone, sprints back up the stairs, runs past his wife and opens the wardrobe. Sure enough, there was his brother crouching in the corner naked.

"WHAT THE HELL TERRY! My wife's having a heart attack and you're running around naked scaring the kids!"
***
r/funny told me to post it here. So, a married couple went to the hospital...
A married couple went to the hospital so that the woman could give birth to her child. Upon their arrival, the doctor told them that they invented a new machine where they could transfer some of the labor pain to the father. He asked them if they would like to try it and they agreed. So the doctor set the pain to be transferred to 10% and told the man that this would be the most painful thing he ever experienced. But when labor set in the man still felt absolutely fine and the doctor set the machine to 20%. The man still felt fine so the doctor set it to 50% whilst checking the vitals man. Still no problem for the man. So he asked the doctor if he could set it to 100% because he could see how comfortable his wife was getting. After 2 hours of labor, the woman gave birth to a healthy baby. Both were pretty astonished, thanked the doctor left. When they came home the milkman was lying dead on the porch.
***
Husband and wife are in bed one night...
when the doorbell rings. The wife says "I'll get it" and goes downstairs and opens the door and it's the next door neighbor. Neighbor whispers "look, I'll give you a hundred bucks if you just open your robe for me..." so the woman shrugs and opens her robe for a few seconds and the neighbor smiles and gives the woman a hundred dollar bill. Wife gets back in bed and husband goes "who was it?" And the wife says "oh it was just the neighbor." And the husband goes, "did he give you the hundred bucks that he owes me?"

An old-timer told me this so it can't be that fresh but I had never heard it and thought it was good.
***
One day, my fiancé’s sister called and asked me to come over to check the wedding invitations
 She was alone when I arrived and whispered to me that she had these feelings and desires for me that she could not overcome. She told me that she wanted to make love to me -- just once -- before I got married and committed my life to her sister.

I was in total shock and couldn't say a word.

She said, "I'm going upstairs to my bedroom, and if you want to go ahead with it just come up and get me."

I was stunned. I was frozen in shock as I watched her go up the stairs. When she reached the top, she pulled down her panties and threw them down the stairs at me. I stood there for a moment, then turned and went straight to the front door. I opened the door, stepped out of the house, and began walking toward my car.
My future father-in-law was standing outside. With tears in his eyes, he hugged me and said, "We are very happy that you have passed our little test. We couldn't ask for a better man for our daughter. Welcome to our family!"

The moral of the story?

Be smart, like me. Always keep your condoms in your car.
***
How many Freudians does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
Two.

One to screw in the bulb and the other to hold the penis..*ER..LADDER! I MEANT LADDER!*
***
I've decided to go on the "England World Cup Diet"
It only lasts 5 days and you lose loads!

(England fan here using humour to cope with the pain...)
***
I've been talking to a 13 year old girl for about 2 weeks now
We've been texting a lot lately and she just told me she's an undercover cop, that's quite impressive for her age.
***
Personally, I'm fine with what Reddit's admins are doing.
It's fun watching them Digg their own grave.
***
Euro 2016
Hi! I've got 2 tickets for the final of Euro 2016 but forgot that it's on the same day as my wedding so I can't go.

If you are interested and want to go instead of me ...

... It's at St. Nicholas' Church, Brighton and she's called Jane. 
***
What's the difference between Isaac Newton and the baby I just stabbed to death?
Isaac Newton died a virgin.
***
(fairly gosh darn NSFW) Yeah, so, I'm a necrophiliac, right...
.....I *had* a girlfriend, but the rotten cunt split on me.
***
A man seeing flashing red and blue lights in his rear-view mirror pulls to the side of the road.
After coming to a stop, a police officer approaches the car.

The man asks, "What's the problem officer?"

Officer: "You were going 75 miles an hour in a 55 mile an hour zone. I'm afraid I'm going to have to ticket you."

Man: "No sir, I was going a little over 60."

Wife: "Oh, Harry. You were going at least 80."

(The man gives his wife a dirty look.) 

Officer: "I'm also going to give you a ticket for your broken tail light."

Man: "Broken tail light? I didn't know about a broken tail light."

Wife: "Oh, Harry. You've known about that tail light for weeks."

(The man gives his wife another dirty look.) 

Officer: "I'm also going to give you a citation for not wearing your seat belt."

Man: "Officer, I just took it off when you were walking up to the car."

Wife: "Oh, Harry. You never wear your seat belt."

The man turns to his wife and yells, "For cryin' out loud, can't you just shut up?!" 

The officer looks at the woman and asks, "Ma'am, does your husband talk to you this way all the time?" 

Wife says, "No, officer. Only when he's drunk."
***
A guy applies for a job with the L.A.P.D.
Inspector says "These are the best qualifications I've ever seen, just one more test before you get the job. 
Take this gun, go out and shoot six black guys and a rabbit."

Guy replies "Why the rabbit?"

Inspector says "Fantastic attitude, you've got the job!"

Edit: Thanks for the my first Reddit gold!
***
TIL: The Norwegian Navy have started to put barcodes on their ships.
So they can Scan da navy in
***
In a job interview
"Name?"

"JJoon Sttutuartt"

"Again please"

"JJoon Sttutuartt"

"Sir, are you a stutterer?"

"No, my father stuttered, and the civil servant was an asshole"
***
'' I'm suffering from a very rare medical condition...
A man and a woman are sitting beside each other on a flight to New York.

The woman sneezes, takes out a tissue, gently wipes her nose and then visibly shudders for about ten seconds.
A few minutes later the woman sneezes again.

Once more, she takes a tissue, wipes her nose and then shudders.

A few more minutes pass before the woman sneezes and violently shudders again.

Curious, the man says, "I can't help noticing that you shudder every time you sneeze. Are you OK? "

"I'm so sorry if I'm disturbing you," says the woman. ''I'm suffering from a very rare medical condition. Whenever I sneeze, I have an orgasm."

"Are you taking anything for it?" he asks. "Yes, " says the woman. "Pepper. "
***
Whats the difference between the government and a stripper?
Strippers don't rig their polls. 
***
A linguistics professor says during a lecture that, “In English, a double negative forms a positive. But in some languages, such as Russian, a double negative is still a negative. However, in no language in the world can a double positive form a negative.”
But then a voice from the back of the room piped up, “Yeah, right.”
***
What's the difference between Leonardo Dicaprio and Sesame Street?
Sesame Street has an Oscar.
***
How do you spot an attention whore on reddit?
Edit: Wow, I did not expect this to get so many upvotes!
***
Money or Sex
A woman preparing to leave her husband casually informs him, "I'm going to become a hooker. I can make $400 for what I give you for free." 

"I'm coming with you," the man replies. "I want to see you live on $800 a year." 

***
What's the difference between a lentil and a chickpea?
I've never begged to have a lentil on my face
***
A priest, a doctor, and an engineer go golfing
They get stuck behind a group of golfers who seemed to be moving slower than usual. 
One of the country club members explains to them that this is a group of blind men who lost their eyesight as firefighters. The country club allows them to use the course once a year free of charge.
The priest immediately chimes in and says, "I am going to pray for these men everyday in my church to help their well being."
The doctor then exclaims, "I am going to get the best medical care in the country to research a possible way to help these men."
The engineer then says, "Why don't they just golf at night?"
***
A local movie theatre was robbed of $600 worth of merchandise
The suspects stole 3 medium popcorns, 1 bag of skittles and 4 small diet cokes.
***
A woman went to a pet shop..
..and immediately spotted a large, beautiful parrot.. 
 
There was a sign on the cage that said $50.00.

"Why so little," she asked the pet store owner.

The owner looked at her and said,
"Look, I should tell you first that this bird used to live in a house of Prostitution
and sometimes it says some pretty vulgar stuff."

The woman thought about this, but decided
she had to have the bird any way.

She took it home and hung the bird's cage up
in her living room and waited for it to say something.

The bird looked around the room, then said..

"New house, new madam."

The woman was a bit shocked at the implication,
but then thought "that's really not so bad."

When her 2 teenage daughters returned from school
the bird saw and said, 
 
"New house, new madam, new girls."

The girls and the woman were a bit offended
but then began to laugh about the situation
considering how and where the parrot had been raised.

Moments later, the woman's husband Keith
came home from work.

The bird looked at him and said, 

 



"Hi, Keith!"
 
***
Lisa has 750 friends on Facebook. A week later she adds 150 more to her friends list. What does she have?
Huge tits. 


Stolen from sickipedia but I have seen it 5 times and it still makes me smile, just wanted to share
***
Donald Trump, Hillary Clinton and Jeb Bush jump of a bridge. They do a race who hits the ground first. Who wins?
Society
***
Dear Muslim refugees: just pretend to be Christian.
That's what most Christians do anyways. 
***
A Christmas Joke (...maybe a LITTLE early)
The guy was in the store buying a fake Christmas tree.  The shop attendant asked him, "Are you going to put that tree up yourself?"

The guy replied, "Don't be disgusting!  I'm going to put it in the living room!"
***
Why didn't DiCaprio laugh at Oscar joke?
Because he didn't get it.
***
What do you call a snobbish criminal going down the stairs?
A condescending con descending

I'll see myself out
***
lost wife
Santa & Banta both lost their wives and were searching for them when they bumped into each other "Where are you hurrying to?" asked Banta

"I lost my wife!"

"Really? Even mine. How did yours look like?"

"hmm... She was tall, slim, had huge tits, sexy soft and sweet ass, she was wearing a mini skirt at last, What about you?"

"Forget mine lets search for yours!" replied Banta.
***
Why did the Storm Trooper decide to buy an Iphone?
Because he couldn't find the Droid he was looking for.
***
Statistics are like bikinis.
What they reveal is suggestive, but what they conceal is vital.  
Edit- This is a famous quote by Aaron Levenstein. A Professor told this to a friend.
***
What do you get when you cross Henry VIII and Vlad the Impaler?
Executed. 
***
The trick to a good joke is nailing the punchline.
Jesus Christ
***
How to make girls feel safe in the hallways
I often find myself walking behind various girls while I'm going about my day and I'm always concerned I'm making them feel unsafe. So I like to remind myself not to walk like a rapist. 

I find this works much better if I don't say it out loud. 
***
A Paladin takes his car to a mechanic
A Paladin takes his car to a mechanic. "Whenever I'm driving, I get these strange urges to run over pedestrians."

The mechanic has a look under the car. "Your alignment is off."
***
When my wife left I was sad upset and lonely
When my wife left, I was sad, upset and lonely.
Since then I've got a dog,bought a new motorbike, shagged two women and blown a grand on drink .



She'll go fucking mental when she gets home from work.
***
Fastest Bolt at the Olympics?
Was it Usain Bolt or Ryan Lochte's ride to the airport?
***
Why did the little boy want Viagra?
A little boy with diarrhea tells his Mom he needs Viagra.  The Mom asks "Why on Earth do you need that?" The little boy replies, "isn't that what you give Dad when HIS shit won't get hard?!"
***
Woman calls 911 about a peeping tom in her yard
911: "How do you know he's a peeping tom?"

Woman: "When I asked him what he was doing out there, he said 'I was trying to get a pikachu'". 

***
A cop pulls over three elderly woman..
The cop says "M'am, do you realize you were going 15 mph in a 55?"

Old lady driver: " Ooo I must have been mistaken then, that sign over there says 15"

The cop laughs and says "M'am thats route 15; you're on route 15 right now"

Old lady driver: "I am so embarassed! Please forgive me"

The cop: "Well everything seems okay here, just make sure to keep it at the speed limit. I do have one question for you though. Your friend in the back seat seems to be a bit pale and anxious, is everything okay?"

Old lady driver: "Oh yeah she'll be fine....we just got off of route 115"
***
A black man and his young son were on a plane...
... when one of the engines blew out. 
Amidst the screams, the captain made an announcement: 

"Some of our passengers are going to have to jump off the plane. 
You will be selected in alphabetical order.
Starting with A: All African Americans." 

The young boy raises his hand, only to have it pulled back down by his father. 

"B: black."

 The little boy does the same thing and is stopped by his father. 

"O.K, C: coloured people."

The little boy raises his hand again. 

"Daddy, I thought we were black, why do you keep pulling my hand down?" 

His father replies, "Today we're Niggers, let the Mexicans jump first."
***
Just a joke I know.
There was a lady in her 90s who became a sort of local celebrity because she had recently gotten married. The local news station decided to interview her. The interviewer asked questions like how it was to be newlywed in her 90s.

"This isn't my first husband, so it's not much different than the others" She replied with a smile.

"Oh? How many husbands have you had?" The interviewer inquired.
"This one will be my fourth." She replied. "I was married in my 20s to a banker, then my 40s to a circus performer. After that I married a preacher"

"What does your current husband do?"
"Oh he's a funeral director."
The interviewer laughed and then asked how she came to marry these men from such different backgrounds and personalities.
"It always made sense to me." She replied "I married one for the money, two for the show, three to get ready, and four to go."
***
I went to the library and asked for a book on Pavlov's dog and Shrodinger's Cat
The librarian said "That rings a bell but I don't know if it's here or not."
***
So I just got back from a trip in Germany, and I realized how awful American children are.
While they may be nice and all where I live in NYC, kids in Germany are kinder.
***
If a man's signature is called a "John Hancock" what do you call a woman's?
Historically insignificant. 

Full disclosure: Heard on the radio this morning on my way to work. 
***
So this girl comes home pregnant.
Her mom's like, "What the shit? How'd you get all knocked up like this? Who's the dad?"

And she's like, "Mom, you've got it all wrong, it's a school project about the miracle of life!"

Mom's like, "Bitch you betta tell me who that bump's father is!"

The daughter just cries and is all like, "I don't know, mom! It was a group project!"
***
What does one saggy boob say to the other saggy boob?
If we don't get some support, people will think we're nuts
***
Racecar spelt backwards is still racecar
But racecar sideways is how Paul Walker died
***
If H2O is water, and H2O2 is hydrogen peroxide, what is H2O4?
Drinking, bathing, watering etc etc.
***
I need advice. I was whipping someone in a gimp mask during a BDSM session, but when he took it off - it wasn't my husband.
Whoops, wrong sub.
***
Husband and wife are arguing...
The husband thinks it's raining

His wife says, "No honey, that's snow"

So they ask Rudolph, their soviet friend what he thinks.

He says, "That is rain, comrade."

The husband says, "See! Rudolph the Red knows rain, dear."


***
Muslim scientists..
Muslim scientists have invented a time-travel device that can transport an entire country back to the dark ages.

They’re calling it ‘Islam’.
***
A quite mean joke
A physicist, an engineer, and a statistician go on a hunting trip, they are walking through the woods when they spot a deer in a clearing. The physicist calculates the distance of the target, the velocity and drop of the bullet, adjusts his rifle and fires, missing the deer 5 feet to the left.
The engineer rolls his eyes. 'You forgot to account for wind. Give it here', he snatches the rifle, licks his finger and estimates the speed and direction of the wind and fires, missing the deer 5 feet to the right.
Suddenly, the statistician claps his hands and yells "We got him!"
***
A man, whilst in a supermarket, approaches a woman he's never met before."Er Hello, do you mind if I talk to you for a moment?" he asks. "You see, I've lost my wife...
"Yes, If you want, but why in the world do you want to speak to me?"

He replied, "Because whenever I speak to a woman with breasts your size, my wife appears out of nowhere..."
***
A joke I heard at mass
A priest is baptizing a man. He dips him 3 times in water and says "Craig, from now on you will be known as Michael. From this day forth you are to shed your sinful ways and that includes no more gambling or alcohol" 

The man later that day goes home and heads straight for the fridge. He then grabs a can of coors light and dips it in the sink. As he does it he says "from this day on, you will be known as green tea" 
***
2 nuns take a shortcut
2 nuns are riding bicycles through the Vatican and they decide to take a shortcut down a cobblestone street. The first nun says to the second, "I've never come this way before." The second nun replies to the first, "Nor have I. It must be the cobblestones."
***
Sammy just bought a new pair of pants.
He's explaining to Dean that these pants were specially fitted for dancing. 

"Ballroom?" Dean asks.

"Not much," Sammy replies.
***
Star Wars Episode 7-9 Titles Revealed
Star Wars Episode VII: The Force Awakens

Star Wars Episode VIII: The Force Sleeps For Five More Minutes

Star Wars Episode IX: The Force Is Late For Work
***
How many friend-zoned guys does it take to change a lightbulb?
None, they'll just compliment it and then get pissed when it doesn't screw. 
***
A black Jewish boy runs home from school one day and asks his father, “Daddy, am I more Jewish or more black?”
The dad replies, “Why do you want to know, son?” “Because a kid at school is selling a bike for $50 and I want to know if I should talk him down to $40 or just steal it!”
***
When the smog clears over Los Angeles...
... U.C.L.A.

I am not at all sorry for this joke.

Edit: So at some point I went from 20 to 923 upvotes. I regret not checking this sooner.
***
Why isn't Hitler in Mario Kart?
Because he cant finish a race
***
What's the difference between an epileptic oyster and a prostitute with IBS?
Well, one you have to shuck between fits...
***
Yet Another Bar Joke
Three friends walk into a bar. After a round, the first of the group speaks up. "I would like to reveal to you that I am actually a wizard!" The second friend said, "Good gravy, I am a sorceror too!" The third wasn't anyone magical, but felt pressured to say that he was. The first man said, "Let's have a contest, let's try to make this bar rise into the air!" The first magician caused the bar to rise to the height of a tall mountain. The second said, "Pft, that's nothing," and the bar shot to the edge of space. Now the first two were waiting for the third. The third then cleverly said, "I can't do it. You've set the bar too high."
***
A magician was working on a cruise ship...
A magician was working on a cruise ship in the Caribbean.

The audience would be different each week, so the magician allowed himself to do the same tricks over and over again.
 
There was only one problem: The captain's parrot saw the shows each week and began to understand how the magician did every trick. 

Once he understood he started shouting in the middle of the show: 

"Look, it's not the same hat!" 

"Look, he is hiding the flowers under the table!" 

"Hey, why are all the cards the Ace of Spades?" 

The magician was furious but couldn't do anything; it was, after all, the captain's parrot. 

One day the ship had an accident and sank. 

The magician found himself on a piece of wood in the middle of the ocean -- with the parrot, of course. 

They stared at each other with hate, but did not utter a word. 

This went on for a day and another and another. 

After a week the parrot said, "OK, I give up. Where's the boat?"
***
I once dated a Welsh girl with 36 DDs.
Longest surname I've ever seen.
***
A woman gets on a bus with her baby.
The bus driver says: 'Ugh, that's the ugliest baby I've ever seen!' 

The woman walks to the rear of the bus and sits down, fuming. 

She says to a man next to her: 'The driver just insulted me!' 

The man says: 'You go up there and tell him off. Go on, I'll hold your monkey for you.'

***
A young man moved out from home...
A young man moved out from home and into a new apartment, 
all his own, and went proudly down to the lobby to put his name
on his mailbox. While there, a stunning young lady came out of 
the apartment next to the mailboxes, wearing only a robe. The
boy smiled at the young woman and she started up a conversation
with Him. As they talked, her robe slipped open, and it was obvious
that she had nothing else on. The poor kid broke into a sweat 
trying to maintain eye contact. After a few minutes, she placed her
hand on his arm and said, 'Let's go to my apartment, I hear
someone coming.' He followed her into her apartment; she closed
the door and leaned against it, allowing her robe to fall off 
completely. Now nude, she purred at him, 'What would you say is 
my best feature?' Flustered and embarrassed, he finally squeaked, 
'It's got to be your ears.' Astounded, and a little hurt she asked,
'My ears? Look at these breasts; they are a full 38 inches and 100% 
natural. I work out every day and my ass is firm and solid. I have a 
28 inch waist. Look at my skin - not a blemish anywhere. How can
you think that the best part of my body is my ears?' 
Clearing his throat, he stammered... 'Outside, when you said you 
heard someone coming... that was me.'
***
Dad joke
**Dad:** Whaddya got there son?

**Son:** Soy milk.

**Dad:** Hola milk, soy tu padre
***
Two men were walking home after a party
Two men were walking home after a party and decided to take a
shortcut through the cemetery just for laughs. Right in the middle of
the cemetery they were startled by a tap-tap-tapping noise coming
from the misty shadows. Trembling with fear, they found an old man
with a hammer and chisel, chipping away at one of the headstones.

"Holy cow, Mister," one of them said after catching his breath, "You
scared us half to death -- we thought you were a ghost!   What are you
doing working here so late at night?"

To which the old man replied: "Those fools! They misspelled my name!"
***
The Jewish Elbow
A Jewish grandmother is giving directions to her grown grandson who is coming to visit with his wife. 
  
"You come to the front door of the apartment. I am in apartment 301.
There is a big panel at the front door. With your elbow, push button 301. 
I will buzz you in. Come inside, the elevator is on the right. Get in, and with your elbow, push 3. When you get out, I'm on the left. With your elbow, hit my doorbell."
  
"Grandma, that sounds easy, but, why am I hitting all these buttons with my elbow?”
    
"What...you coming empty handed?" 

***
in mexico, we don't say "I love you"
cause we dont speak english.
***
A man from out of town walks into a bar...
he sees large pieces of meat hanging from the ceiling. He asks the bartender why the meat is hanging down from the ceiling. The bartender says "Around these parts we have a challenge. If you can jump up and touch the meat, you get it for free. If you can't you have to pay the price of the meat but you don't get it. How about taking the bet?" The man looks up at the meat. "Nah" He says. "The steaks are too high.  
***
what’s the difference between an old greyhound bus terminal and a lobster with 36B breasts?
one’s a crusty bus station and the other’s a busty crustacean
***
How do you know the toothbrush was invented in Kentucky?
If it was invented anywhere else it would've been called the teethbrush
***
A man is walking along...
when he sees a ladder going straight up into the clouds. His curiosity gets the better of him so he starts climbing.

He reaches a cloud, upon which is sitting a stout, ugly woman.

"Screw me or climb the ladder to success," she says.

No thanks, thinks the man, so he climbs the ladder to the next cloud. On this cloud is a slightly thinner woman, who is a bit easier on the eye.

"Screw me hard or climb the ladder to success," she says.

"Well," thinks the man, "might as well keep going."

On the next cloud is another lady who this time is very attractive.

"Screw me now or climb the ladder to success," she flirted.

As he turns her down and goes on up the ladder, the man thinks to himself that this was getting better the further he went.

On the next cloud is an absolute beauty. Slim, attractive, the whole works. "Fuck me hard or climb the ladder to success," she begs.

Unable to imagine what could be waiting, and being a gambling man, he decided to climb again. When he reached the next cloud, there was a 400-pound ugly man, armpit hair showing, flies buzzing around his head.

"Who the hell are you?" the man asked.

"Hey cutie," said the ugly fat man, "my name is Cess!"
***
Obvious media bias
Michelle Obama gives a speech when her husband is being nominated, and the media is generally positive. Melania Trump gives the exact same speech, and the media pretends it's some kind of scandal.
***
How many protestors do you need to change a lightbulb?
Trick question. Protestors don't change anything.
***
My band is called 999 megabytes. We don't have any gigs.
lol
***
A priest goes to the mechanic
He tells the mechanic, "hey, I just brought in my car last week, and since you guys worked on it, it's leaking oil all over my garage." The mechanic says, "my apologies father, we'll make sure we get it right this time, come back tomorrow, and we'll have it tip-top for you." The priest returns the following day, and he says, "well, how is it?" The mechanic says, "we found the issue. it was a loose oil filter, and it won't be leaking again because I screwed it in tighter than a nun's cunt." Solemnly, the priest looks the mechanic dead in the eye, and says, "better give it another quarter turn."
***
The Train Set
A mother was working in the kitchen, listening to her five-year-old son playing with his new electric train in the living room. She heard the train stop & her son saying........''All of you bastards who want off, get the hell off now, 'cause this is the last stop!  And all of you bastards who are getting on, get your ass in the train, cause we are going down the tracks.''
The horrified mother went in and told her son, ''We don't use that kind of language in this house. Now I want you to go to your room & stay there for TWO HOURS.  When you come out, you may play with your train, but I want you to use nice language.'' Two hours later, the son came out of the bedroom & resumed playing with his train.  Soon the train stopped & the mother heard her son say, ''All passengers who are disembarking the train, please remember to take all your belongings with you. We thank you for travelling with us today & hope your trip was a pleasant one.'' She hears the little boy continue, For those of you just boarding, we ask you to stow all your hand luggage under your seat.  Remember there is no smoking on the train. We hope you will have a pleasant and relaxing journey with us today.'' As the mother began to smile, the child added, 'For those of you who are pissed off about the TWO HOUR delay, please see the fat bitch in the kitchen

***
The phone bill was exceptionally high. The man of the house called a family meeting to discuss.
The phone bill was exceptionally high. The man of the house called a family meeting to discuss.

Dad: This is unacceptable. I don't use the home phone. I use my work phone.

Mum: Me too, I hardly use the home phone. I use my company's phone.

Son: I use the cell phone given to me by my office. I never use the home phone.

All of them shocked  and together look at the maid who is patiently listening to them.

Maid: What? so we all use our work phones. What's the big deal??
***
How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
Ten. One to change the lightbulb and nine to blog about how empowering it was.
***
A not so shitty story
A man walks into the doctor's office stating "Doc, I haven't had a shit in weeks". The doctor, does a normal check up, and upon finding the man to be okay, prescribes him some laxatives.

Two weeks later, the same guy walks into the office saying "Doc, I still can't shit". The doctor does another check up on him, and this time prescribes him some extremely powerful laxatives.

Another two weeks pass and the same guy walks in saying, "Doc, I still can't shit". Fearing the worst, the doctor then starts asking him about his family history and his background.

The doctor then gets to the question, "What's your occupation?"

"Well I'm a artist," he states. "A painter by trade."

The doctor then laughs, "That makes sense! Here's five dollars, go eat something".
***
*In the ER* "We're losing him, anyone have any ideas?"
"How about 50 cc's of a cool refreshing beverage?"

"Dammit Dr. Pepper not now!"
***
So a blind man walks into a bar..
The blind man sits down,  thinking he'd break the ice with the bartender by asking "Wanna hear a blond joke?"

In a hushed voice, a man beside him says "Before you tell that joke, you should know our bartender IS blonde, or bouncer is blond, I'm a 6'4" black belt, the man sitting on the other side of me is 6'2, 250lbs, and a rugby player.  The guy sitting next to you is pushing 300, 6'6, and he's a wrestler. We're ALL blond. So you think about it mister, do you really wanna tell that joke?" 

The blind man sat for a second, thinking over the odds and then replied "No, not if I have to explain it five times." 
***
A man goes to a restaurant
He has a seat at a booth and opens a menu to find out that none of the foods have prices next to them.  He asks the waiter, "How much is the fettucini alfredo?"

The waiter says "A penny."

The man exclaims, "A penny??  How much for a steak?"

The waiter says, "A nickel"

The man is astonished, "Are you serious?? Where's the man that owns this place?  I'd like to shake his hand!"

The waiter answers, "He's upstairs with my wife."

Confused, the man asks, "What's he doing upstairs with your wife?"

The waiter smiles and says, "The same thing I'm doing down here to his business."
***
The dead cow lecture
First-year students at the Vet School were attending their first anatomy class with a real dead cow. They all gathered around the surgery table with the body covered with a white sheet. 

The professor started the class by telling them, "In Veterinary medicine it is necessary to have two important qualities as a doctor". 

"The first is that you not be disgusted by anything involving the animal's body." 

For an example, the professor pulled back the sheet, stuck his finger in the butt of the cow, withdrew it, and stuck his finger in his mouth. 

"Go ahead and do the same thing," he told his students. 

The students freaked out, hesitated for several minutes, but eventually took turns sticking a finger in the butt of the dead cow and sucking on it. 

When everyone finished, the Professor looked at them and said, "The second most important quality is observation. I stuck in my middle finger and sucked on my index finger. Now learn to pay attention. Life's tough but it's even tougher if you're stupid." 
***
A newly graduated doctor is assigned to a rural area, and after a few days he realizes that there were no women in the village, they were all men.
After taking a bit of confidence he asks one of his patients that they did when they had the need for sex and the patient replied: That they went down to the river.

The weekend came and the doctor went to the river, and there was a huge line of men standing on the shore of the river. Being so well-known in the village, the locals gave him their position on the line, until he reaches the top of the line.

Looking ahead the doctor realizes that there is a donkey, he thinks: Wow, have sex with an animal? Poor people. And I cannot deny me now that they have so graciously ceded their positions.

Within fifteen minutes of having sex with the donkey, while all the men in the row watched, as he kissed her and bit her ears, one of them walks up to him and secretly ask him: Doctor, how long till you finish? We need the donkey to cross the river, there is a village with women there.

***
My girlfriend says penis size shouldn't matter in a healthy and loving relationship.
I still wish she didn't have one.  
&nbsp;


EDIT: to draw attention to new Gender Studies section in comments. 
***
*knock knock* "Who's there?" "Dejav."

"Dejav who?"

*knock knock*


*edit : thanks a lot for appreciating the stupidity 
***
Donald Trump's doctor has recently prescribed him Prozac.
He told him it would help him control hispanics.
***
Would you remarry if I die?
A husband and wife are sitting quietly in bed reading when the wife looks over at him and asks the question....

WIFE: "What would you do if I died? Would you get married again?"

HUSBAND: "Definitely not!"

WIFE: "Why not? Don't you like being married?"

HUSBAND: "Of course I do.."

WIFE: "Then why wouldn't you remarry? "

HUSBAND: "Okay, okay, I'd get married again."

WIFE: "You would?" (with a hurt look)

HUSBAND: (makes audible groan)

WIFE: "Would you live in our house?"

HUSBAND: "Sure, it's a great house."

WIFE: "Would you sleep with her in our bed?"

HUSBAND: "Where else would we sleep?"

WIFE: "Would you let her drive my car?"

HUSBAND: "Probably, it is almost new."

WIFE: "Would you replace my pictures with hers?"

HUSBAND: "That would seem like the proper thing to do."

WIFE: "Would you give her my jewellery?"

HUSBAND: "No, I'm sure she'd want her own."

WIFE: "Would you take her golfing with you?

HUSBAND: "Yes, those are always good times."

WIFE: "Would she use my clubs?

HUSBAND: "No, she's left-handed."

WIFE: -- silence --

HUSBAND: "Shit."
***
Young rooster
A farmer goes out and buys a new, young rooster. As soon as he brings him home, the young rooster rushes and screws all 150 of the farmers hens. The farmer is impressed. At lunchtime, the young rooster again screws all 150 hens. The farmer is not just impressed anymore,he is worried. Next morning,not only is the rooster screwing the hens but he is screwing the turkeys,ducks even the cow. 

Later farmer looks out into the barnyard and finds the rooster stretched out, limp as a rag, his eyes closed, dead and vultures circling overhead. The farmer runs out, looks down at the young roosters limp body and says: "You deserved it, you horny bastard!" And the young rooster opens one eye, points up at the vultures with his wing, and says, Shhhh!,they are about to land."
***
A guy meets a sex worker in a bar.
She says, ‘This is your lucky night. I’ve got a special game for you. I’ll do absolutely anything you want for £300 as long as you can say it in three words.’ The guy replies, ‘Hey, why not?’ He pulls his wallet out of his pocket and lays £300 on the bar, and says slowly. ‘Paint…my….house.’

***
One morning, His Majesty the lion calls all the animals in the jungle to a meeting.
"Right," says the lion, "I want every one of you to go out hunting and bring me back as much meat as you can. Anyone who fails to bring me meat I will batter to death with my dick!"

Later that day, a rabbit turns up with a basket of carrots.

"You have to understand, Your Majesty, I'm a rabbit, I can't hunt, but I've brought you a basket of carrots."

The lion towers over the rabbit and starts battering it with his dick.

The rabbit cries, and laughs, and cries, and laughs, and cries, and laughs...

"Why are you crying?" says the lion.

"It hurts," says the rabbit.

"And why the fuck are you laughing?" says the lion.

"I've just seen the hedgehog," says the rabbit, "and he's gathering mushrooms."
***
Hilary Clinton could be the first F president ever elected in to office.
Sorry it was supposed to say Female but the emale got deleted.
***
A Polish immigrant went to the DMV to apply for a driver's license

First, of course, he had to take an eyesight test.


The optician showed him a card with the letters: 'C Z W I X N O S T A C Z.'


"Can you read this?" the optician asked.


"Read it?" the Polish guy replied, "I know the guy." 
***
The Engineer's Interview
An engineering firm is looking to fill a position, and has interviewed a few dozen applicants. They've winnowed it down to just three candidates, and they're all bright, motivated, and experienced. To make the final decision, the interviewer decides to pose one last question to each of them. He tells the three interviewees, "So this building we're in, any idea how tall it is, down to the inch?" All three shake their heads. Turning to the first he says, so if I gave you an accurate barometer, how would you determine the height? The engineer pauses and says, "Well, I'd measure the pressure difference between the roof and ground, use that to find the change in altitude". Nodding, the interviewer turns to the second candidate. "And you? How would you measure this?", "Well" says the second engineer, "I would measure the shadow cast by the barometer and the shadow cast by the building. We know the length of one, we can find the length of the other". "Very good!" said the interviewer, finally turning to the last engineer. "And you?" After a moment's thought the third engineer finally says, "I think I'd just find the building manager, offer to give him a shiny new barometer if he told me how tall the building is."
***
One from Australia for you…
The Mrs and I had a huge bust up. She screamed at me to pack my bags and GTFO.

I was all packed up and about to get out the door when she said "I wish you a long and painful death, you bastard!"

"So, what? You want me to stay now?" I replied.
***
Two chemists walk into a bar
The first one says "I think I'll have an H2O." 

The second one says "I think I'll have water too."

The first chemist now has to rethink the assassination.
***
BLIND PILOTS
An airliner is fully boarded and ready to push-off from the gate, when two blind pilots enter the main cabin. The pilots both are wearing dark glasses, one is using a guide dog and the other is tapping his way along the aisle with a cane. 
Nervous laughter spreads through the cabin, but the men enter the cockpit, the door closes, and the engines start up. The passengers begin glancing nervously around, searching for some sign that this is just a little practical joke. None is forthcoming. 
The plane moves faster and faster down the runway and the people sitting in the window seats realize they're headed straight for the water at the edge of the airport. As it begins to look as though the plane will plough in to the water, panicked screams fill the cabin. At that moment, the plane lifts smoothly into the air. The passengers relax and laugh a little sheepishly, and soon all retreat into their magazines, secure in the knowledge that the plane is in good hands. 
In the cockpit, one of the blind pilots turns to the other and says, "Ya know, Bob, one of these days, they're gonna scream too late and we're all gonna die." 
***
A woman in hot air balloon realized she is lost...
She reduced altitude & shouted to a man below:  Excuse me, can you help me? I promised a friend to meet him an hour ago but I don't know where I am.

Man below replied:  You are in hot air balloon 30 feet above the ground. You are at 41 degree North latitude & 59 degree West longitude.

Lady:  Oh, You must be an engineer.

Man:  Yes! How did you know?

Lady:  Everything you told me is technically correct but useless & the fact is, I'm still lost.

Engineer:  I see, then you must be in Upper Management.

Lady:  Yes! How did you know?

Engineer:  You don't know where you are or where you are going. You made a promise, which you have no idea how to keep & you expect people beneath you to solve your problems..!!
***
My love life is like Santa Claus.
It exists thanks to gullible six year olds
***
A physicist, a chemist, and a statistician were supposed to give a guest lecture at a school.
When they arrive at the classroom, the professors see with alarm that there is a fire in the wastebasket. 

The physicist says, "We must cool down the materials until their temperature is lower than the ignition temperature and then the fire will go out." 

The chemist says, "No! No! We must cut off the supply of oxygen so that the fire will go out due to lack of one of the reactants." While the physicist and chemist are debating, they observe with alarm that the statistician is running around the room starting other fires. 

They both scream, "What are you doing?" 

To which the statistician replies, "Don't mind me, I'm just trying to get an adequate sample size."
***
Jesus Christ fed 2,000 people with 5 loaves of bread and 2 fish
But Hitler made 6,000,000 jews toast

EDIT: Holy shit guys, 2700?!
***
A Redditor walks into a bar
He cries out in pain.

His friend asks, "How did you even walk into that? You've encountered this hundreds of times before!"

The Redditor replies, "Well, not really? It seemed like a new post."
***
The English team visited an orphanage in brazil.
"It’s heartbreaking to see their sad little faces with no hope”,said Jose age 6.
***
A little silver-haired lady calls her neighbour and says "please come over here and help me. I have a killer jigsaw puzzle, and I can't figure out how to get started."
Her neighbour asks, "What is it supposed to be when it's finished?"

The little silver haired lady says, "According to the picture on the box, it's a rooster."

Her neighbour decides to go over and help with the puzzle.
She lets him in and shows him where she has the puzzle spread all over the table.

He studies the pieces for a moment, then looks at the box, then turns to her and says, "First of all, no matter what we do, we're not going to be able to assemble these pieces into anything resembling a rooster."

He takes her hand and says, "Secondly, I want you to relax. Let's have a nice cup of tea, and then," he said with a deep sigh

 ............
 
"Let's put all the Corn Flakes back in the box."
***
Two FBI agents search an office and find a hard drive with "KGB" on it...
One of the agents asks the other, "Why didn't they just write '1 TB' instead?"
***
How many Hillary Clinton supporters does it take to change a lightbulb?
None. They prefer to be left in the dark.
***
How many feminists does it take to change a lightbulb?
None.  You don't need a lightbulb when you have a glass ceiling.
***
For every upvote this gets, my girlfriend and I will try one thrust of anal sex.
Please don't upvote. Her strap-on is huge. 
***
So there's a farmer in his barn yard with a bull and a cow...
The farmer wants the bull to get his cow pregnant with a calf. The bull however is not interested in that at all and just wants to eat grass all day. The farmer gets the bright idea to try to get the bull feeling frisky himself. He takes his hand and shoves it into the cow's vagina. He then pulls it out and wipes it on the bull's nose, the bull goes crazy and hops right on the cow. Elated, the farmer goes back to his house, eats dinner and gets ready for bed. When he lays down next to his wife he starts feeling kind of frisky himself, but he can't get an erection. He gently reaches down and touches his wife with his hand and wipes it under his nose. He immediately gets hard as a rock and tries to poke his wife with it. His wife jumps out of bed, turns the light on and says "Really Ted!? You woke me up just because you have a bloody nose!?"
***
A man dies and goes to heaven
In heaven, he sees a wall of very large clocks.

He asks the Angel "What are all these clocks for?"

Angel answers "These are lie clocks, every person has one lie clock. Whenever you lie on earth, the clock ticks once."



The man points towards a clock and asks, "Who's clock does this belong to?"

Angel answers 'This clock belongs to Mother Teresa. It has never moved, so she has never told a lie."

then the man asks "Where is Hillary Clintons clock?"

The Angel replies "That one is in our office, we use it as a table fan."
***
What's the difference between Donald and a piece of fruit?
Oranges have thick skin.

Let the downvotes fly, people! You've only got one!

Edit: Did not expect this joke to get this good of a reception. Thanks, guys!
***
An Italian Girl
A woman has to go to Italy for a conference, so her husband drives her to the airport.

"Thank you, honey", she says. "What would you like me to bring back for you?"

He laughs and says, "An Italian girl!"

When the conference is over, he meets her at the airport and asks:

"So, honey, how was the trip?"

"Very good," she replies.

"And what happened to my present?"

"Which present?" she asks.

"The one I asked for - an Italian girl!"

"Oh, that," she says. "Well, I did what I could. Now we have to wait nine months to see if it's a girl."
***
The man with a 25 inch penis.
A man who had a 25 inch long penis went to his doctor to complain that he was having a problem with this rather massive instrument and has had more than one complaint. "Doctor," he asked, in total frustration, "is there anything you can do for me?" The doctor replies, "Medically son, there is nothing I can do. But, I do know this witch who may be able to help you." So the doctor gives him directions to the witch.


The man calls upon the witch and relays his story. "Witch, my penis is 25 inches long and I need help. Can anything be done to help me? You are my last hope!" The witch stares in amazement, scratches her head, and then replies, "I think I may be able to help you. Do this. Go deep into the forest. You will find a pond. In this pond, you will find a frog sitting on a log. This frog has magic. You say to frog, will you marry me? When the frog says no, you will find five inches less to your problem."
The man's face lit up and he dashed off into the forest. He called out to the frog, "Will you marry me?" 

The frog looked at him dejectedly and replied, "NO." The man looked down and suddenly his penis was 5 inches shorter. "WOW," he screamed out loud, "This is great!!" But at 20 inches it was still too long, so he asked the frog again. "Frog, will you marry me?" the guy shouted. The frog rolled its eyes back in its head and screamed back, "NO!" The man felt another twitch in his penis, looked down, and it was another 5 inches shorter. The man laughed, "This is fantastic." He looked down at his penis again, 15 inches long, and reflected for a moment Fifteen inches is still a monster, just a little less would be ideal.


Grinning, he looked across the pond and yelled out, "Frog will you marry me?" The frog looked back across pond shaking its head, "How many times do I have to tell you? NO, NO, NO!!"
***
My friend says he has the body of a Greek god...
I had to explain to him that Buddha wasn't Greek.
***
The Rabbit
A man was driving along the highway, and saw a rabbit hopping across the middle of the road. He swerved to avoid hitting the rabbit, but unfortunately the rabbit jumped in front of the car and was hit. 

The driver, being a sensitive man as well as an animal lover, pulled over to the side of the road and got out to see what had become of the rabbit. Much to his dismay, the rabbit was dead. The driver felt so awful he began to cry. 

A woman driving down the highway saw the man crying on the side of the road and pulled over. She stepped out of her car and asked the man what was wrong. 

"I feel terrible," he explained. "I accidentally hit this rabbit and killed it." 

The woman told the man not to worry. She knew what to do. She went to he car trunk and pulled out a spray can. She walked over to the limp, dead rabbit, and sprayed the contents of the can onto the rabbit. Miraculously, the rabbit came to life, jumped up, waved its paw at the two humans and hopped down the road. 

50 meters away the rabbit stopped, turned around, waved at the two again, hopped down the road another 50 meters, turned, waved, and hopped another 50 meters. 

The man was astonished. He couldn't figure out what substance could be in the woman's spray can! He ran over to the woman and demanded, " What was in your spray can? What did you spray onto that rabbit?" 

The woman turned the can around so that the man could read the label. It said: " 'Hare Spray' Restores Life to Dead Hare. Adds Permanent Wave." 

***
The Talking Clock
A guy picks up a woman in a bar and they go to his apartment. In the bedroom there's a brass gong and a wooden mallet hanging from a stand and the woman says "What's that for?" The guy says "That's a talking clock. I'll show you how it works." He hits the gong as hard as he can and when the sound dies away a voice from the other side of the wall says "Hey asshole! It's 3:15 in the morning!"
***
A wife texts her husband
A wife, being the romantic sort, sent her husband a text: "If you are
sleeping, send me your dreams. If you are laughing, send me your smile. If
you are eating, send me a bite. If you are drinking send me a sip. If you
are crying, send me your tears. I love you!"
The husband, typically non-romantic, replied: "I am on the toilet. Please advise."
***
A wife texted her husband
A wife, being the romantic sort, sent her husband a text: "If you are sleeping, send me your dreams. If you are laughing, send me your smile. If you are eating, send me a bite. If you are drinking send me a sip. If you are crying, send me your tears. I love you!" The husband, typically non-romantic, replied: "I am on the toilet. Please advise."
***
God decides to take a vacation...
So he goes to his travel agent to get some recommendations. God asks the agent where he should go and the agent says, "How about the Moon? It's supposed to be all the rage right now."

God thinks about it and says, "No... I'd like to go somewhere with a little more atmosphere."

So the agents says, "Okay, well how about Mars? It's really nice this time of year."

God considers it for a second and then says, "No... I'd really like to go somewhere with water."

The agent goes, "Oh well I've got the perfect place, how about Earth? It's got beautiful water and lots of atmosphere!"

God thinks about it again before saying, "No... I went there a couple thousand years ago and knocked up some Jewish girl and they've been talking about it ever since."
***
A Man Was Tanned Everywhere Except His Penis....
There was a man who really took care of his body. He lifted weights and jogged 6 miles a day. One day, he took a look in the mirror and noticed that he was tan all over except his penis. So, he decided to do something about it. 
He went to the beach, completely undressed and buried himself in the sand, except for his penis, which he left sticking out. 
Two old ladies were strolling along the beach, one using a cane. Upon seeing the penis sticking up over the sand, she began to move it around with her cane, remarking to the other lady, "There's no justice in the world." 
The other lady asked what she meant and she said: "When I was 20, I was curious about it.
When I was 30, I enjoyed it. 
When I was 40, I asked for it.
When I was 50, I paid for it. 
When I was 60, I prayed for it. 
When I was 70, I forgot about it. 
Now, I am 80 and the damn things are growing wild on the beach and I'm too old to squat."
***
Jimmy Kimmel should have Floyd Mayweather read mean tweets after the fight
Oh wait
***
A police man pulls over a priest for swerving..
As the officer approaches the window he notices a bottle in a brown bag on the seat.
 Officer says, "father, I pulled you over for swerving back there. You haven't been drinking have you?"

"No my son. Why would you ask that?"

"Well I noticed the bottle on the seat next to you."

"Oh my son, that's just holy water."

"OK father. So why is it in a bag?"

"Well my son, that is to protect it from the suns rays."

"Mind if I take a sip?"

"Not at all my son."

 As the officer puts the bottle to his lips and takes a drink, he immediately spits it out...

"Father, this is wine."

The preacher, "PRAISE THE LORD. HE'S DONE IT AGAIN!"
***
What's Hillary's favorite pizza place?
Little Seizures


Edit: credit to Joe Biggs @rambobiggs
***
A photon walks into a hotel.
A photon walks into a hotel. The desk clerk says, "Welcome to our hotel. Can we help you with your luggage?" 
The photon says, "No thanks, I'm traveling light."

Edit: Yaaaaay front page of jokes.
***
How many Black Lives Matters protesters does it take to change a light bulb?
Don't be silly, Black Lives Matters protesters can't change anything.
***
"Mr. President, two Brazilian soldiers were killed yesterday in Iraq."
"Oh my god... How many is a Brazilian?"
***
Why is Bernie Sanders challenging his 49 vs 50% loss in Iowa?
I thought he didn't care about the 1%
***
I've got my doctorate in palindromes.
I'm now addressed as Dr.Awkward
***
German women love me...
I'm a ladies man. I saw this fine German woman. I didn't even have to chat her up for her to hastily give me her number. It was easy to remember 999 9999.
***
I learned recently that 9/10 men masturbate regularly
You don't want to know how the last guy does it...


Note: all my jokes I post here are originals I'm working on, so as always, feedback is good yadda yadda yadda
***
What's a Jedi's favorite brand of vodka?
Skyy. Only Sith deal in Absolut.
***
What do you call a Muslim optometrist who has no regards for his patients?
Asif Eyecare
***
I caught my neighbor putting a layer of topsoil on my allotment
The plot thickened 
***
I'm American, and I'm fed up of people saying that America is the stupidest country in the world.
Personally, I think Europe is the stupidest country in the world
***
When German children play a game involving touching each other with bread...
it's called gluten tag.


I'll show myself out.
***
Knock, Knock.

Who's there? 

Dave. 

Dave who? 

Dave proceeds to break into tears as his grandmother's Alzheimers has progressed to the point where she can no longer remember him.
***
Harry Potter and Ron Weasley are talking. Harry says, "Ron, I'm gay."
"Are you fucking serious?!" asks Ron.

"Yeah...that too," says Harry.
***
I asked my English teacher whether I should pronounce "either" as "ee-ther" or "eye-ther"
He said, "You can say either."
***
Yet another redneck finds out his girlfriend is a virgin...
A redneck finds out his girlfriend is a virgin. Upon hearing this, he stands up, turns away from her, and leaves without a word.

Later, when his buddies see him sad at the bar they ask what went wrong, he explains...

"My mom just told me I'm adopted"
***
Police talking on the radio...
* Sergeant, we've arrived at the scene.
* So, what's the situation?
* A woman killed her husband. There were 35 stab wounds, two gunshot wounds, and after decapitating him, she finally burned his body.
* Wow, what was the reason she gave for the crime?
* He stepped where she was cleaning the floor.
* Did you manage to capture the woman?
* No, Sergeant. We are waiting for the floor to dry ...
***
A joke about golfers.
Two men were playing golf one afternoon when just as they are about to play an important putt on the final hole for the match a large funeral procession passes by on the road at the side of the golf course. One of the men stops in mid putt, removes his cap, bows his head in prayer. The second man retorts "Woah man, that was really respectful". "Well, we had been married for over 25 years" said the other man.
***
A mother shark is teaching her young how to eat humans...
"First, you go straight at them and then you circle them. You go straight at them again and circle them again. Finally, you go straight at them and then you eat them"

"But, mom, why can't I just eat them the first time around?"

"Well, I suppose you can, but why would you want to eat them with all the shit still inside?"

Edit: Obligatory "thnx 4 front page guis!"
***
What did the math text book say to the Shakespeare text book?
Look, buddy, I've already got a lot of problems, and I really don't need any of your drama.
***
A 60 years old billionaire marries a hot 25 year old girl..
After honeymoon they throw a party celebrating their marriage...

After a few drinks, billionaire's friends want to know the secret of how he landed 25 yo hottie..

"It's simple" billionaire boasts...
"I faked my age"

"Yes, but even for a 40/45 years old guy...she is sensational, what age btw did you tell you are?" A friend asks.

With a smile on his lips billionaire responds
"85 years old"
***
If you were stranded on an island and could bring three items what would you bring?
Michael Phelps, a saddle, and stick with a gold medal on the end. 
***
A hot schoolgirl is dangerously close to flunking class...
...so she tells the teacher : "I'd do anything for a good grade". The teacher whispers into her ear : "Anything ?" She replies : "Yes, anything". With a seductive smile he says : "Well then, sit down and start studying, you lazy fuck!"
***
Why is Caitlyn Jenner so skinny?
Because the FDA just banned trans fats.
***
Two Blondes
Two blondes meet up for coffee and one asks the other what she has been upto;

"I had sex with two Brazilian guys last night" 

"Wow - I've never even met that many guys" replied the other
***
Jesus walks into a bar with his disciples...
"Thirteen glasses of water, please!", Jesus said to the barman, winking at the others...
***
A prisoner escaped..
And snuck inside a house nearby. 

The prisoner found a young couple in bed and held them hostage, the woman was tied in a chair and the man was tied on the bed post. 

The prisoner walked up to the woman and kissed her in the neck afterwards he went to the bathroom. 

The man said to the woman "that guy is an escapee from the prison nearby, he's been in prison for such a long time that he's so thirsty for sex. I can tell it from the way he kissed your neck. No matter what happens let him do whatever he wants or else he will kill us! Be strong honey, i love you!" 

Then the woman replied..

"He didn't kiss me honey, he whispered to me that he thinks you're cute and asked me if we have some lubricant. I told him that we have some in the bathroom. Be strong honey, i love you!"
***
Apple, the FBI, and John McAfee are sitting in an office...
Only two were invited, but the third one got in through the backdoor.
***
A blonde is walking along the shoreline of a lake in Minnesota looking for seashells when she spots another blonde across the lake from her. Eager for company she shouts loudly "How do I get to the other side?"
The other blonde shouts back "You're on the other side!" 
***
What is the difference between American teenage girls amd Muslim teenage girls? (Offensive)
American teenage girls get stoned BEFORE they have sex.
***
Last night a movie theater was robbed of $1000 dollars.
The thieves took one large bag of popcorn, a combo meal and a pack of skittles. 
***
a man goes to confess after 25 years
So the man walks into the confession booth for the first time in his adult life, having nothing but bad memories about it from when he was a child.
So he opens the door, sits down and notices a couple of playboy nude calenders on the wall, a bottle of whiskey in the corner and a nice box of cigars next to it, and he thinks to himself "Wow, this place has really improved over the years"

But then the Father opens the door and yells "Get out! that's my booth!"
***
Rihanna was asked; "why do you think Chris Brown was denied a visa in Australia?"
She replied:


"Beats the hell outta me"


Edit: holy shit front page, thanks guys
***
Perfect on the spot SFW joke
What did the Zen Buddhist say to the hotdog vendor?

Make me one with everything.
***
A coworker told me I was a pedophile and said I probably had a van that said "Free Candy" on the side.
I told him that would be pointless. My target demographic can't read yet. 
***
So my drug dealer got me these new shoes..
And I don't know what he laced them with.. But I've been tripping all day
***
What do Donald Trump and the iPhone 7 have in common?
They both think de-porting is the answer when there’s no more Jobs.
***
Why does Donald Trump secretly want to lose the election?
Because if he wins, he'll have to move into a smaller house in a black neighborhood.
***
I think I'll vote the NSA for president...
...because at least they'll listen to the voters even after the election.
***
I just turned on nickelodeon and saw bob the builder building a wall...
... to keep Dora from exploring. 
***
What did Barack say to Michele when he asked her to marry him?
I don't wanna be Obama self.
***
So I heard that the hackers "Anonymous" are waging war on ISIS and al-Qaeda...
Quite ironic that 72 virgins will be attacking the terrorists!
***
Three Men Are Talking About Aging
A sixty year old, a seventy year old, and an eighty year old man are sitting on a  porch discussing the different stages of aging.

"When I wake up in the morning it now takes me 30 minutes to be able to take a piss!" complained the sixty year old.

"That's nothing," responded the seventy year old, "I wake up every morning at 6am sharp, but sit on the toilet unable to take a shit until 8."

"Hm." chimed in the eighty year old, "I take a piss right at 6:30, and a shit right at 7 every single morning."

"That sounds perfect," responded the other two men, "Being eighty sounds easy!"

"Well, I dunno about that, gents. I don't wake up until 8."
***
$1 joke from homeless man on Santa Monica pier- "What did 1 butt cheek say to the other butt cheek"
" Together We can stop this shit" 
***
My friend was raped by a teenager mutant ninja turtle.
He wasn't wearing a mask, so we don't know which one did it.
***
Who says men don't remember?
A couple were Christmas shopping. The shopping center was packed , and as the wife walked through one of the malls she was surprised when she looked around to find that her husband was nowhere to be seen. She was quite upset because they had a lot to do and so she became so worried that she called him on her mobile phone to ask him where he was.

In a quiet voice he said, "Do you remember the jewelers we went into about five years ago where you fell in love with that diamond necklace that we couldn't afford, and I told you that I would get it for you one day?"

The wife choked up and started to cry and said, "Yes, I do remember that shop."

He replied, "Well, I'm in the pub next door."
***
Over the past year, my sexual fetishes have been slowly getting more perverse.
But it wasn't until I spanked a statue that I realised I'd hit rock bottom.
***
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
One's a crusty bus station and one's a busty crustacean.
***
Why hasn’t Kim Kardashian seen her asshole lately?

He’s on tour.
***
Ive just been molested by a group of mime artists...
They did unspeakable things to me.
***
Why couldn't anyone hear Hellen Keller scream?
She was wearing mittens.
***
A man's wife gave birth while he was on a business trip.
The doctor called and asked, "Did you know you were having quintuplets?"
 "I'm not surprised," the man replied, "I've got a dick like a stovepipe!"
 "You should probably get it cleaned then," said the doctor, "because they're all black."
***
Two midgets in a bar...
...when they try and pick up two beautiful women standing on the other side of the room. The night goes on, buying drinks, paying for food and dancing away. Towards the end of the night the guys are invited back to the girls apartment.

In the apartment they have more drinks, dance, and are getting on very well. One of the girls takes on of the midgets to the bedroom. A little later the midget in the living room can here 'a one...a two...a three....' followed by a squeal, a bang, and giggling. This goes on for at least 45 minutes, the same pattern of counting, squealing, and giggling, until the second girl takes the second guy to her room.

In her room the second guy gets stage fright so they end up cuddled and talking until they can no longer hear the noise from next door.

The next morning the midgets are in the kitchen making breakfast when the second guy goes red and confesses that he wasn't able to perform or do the deed. The first guy looks at his friend, goes bright red and says, 'you think that's bad? I couldn't even get on the bed!'
***
A lady walks into a dry cleaners...
...she's carrying a beautiful black dress. She tells the clerk, "I'll need to pick this up tomorrow."

The clerk, hard of hearing and distracted, innocently asks, "come again?"

Unfazed, she replies, "No. Vanilla ice cream this time."
***
Two blondes working on a construction site...
Two blondes were working on a construction site. One of them who was nailing down siding would reach into her nail pouch, pull out a nail, and then either toss it over her shoulder or nail it into the siding.

The other blonde, figuring this was worth looking into, asked, "Why are you throwing those nails away?"

The first blonde explained, "If I pull a nail out of my pouch and it's pointed towards me, I throw it away 'cause it's defective. If it's pointed toward the house, then I nail it into the siding."

The second blonde was outraged. She yelled, "You moron! The nails pointed towards you aren't defective! They're for the other side of the house!"
***
An Englishman walks into a bar...
There's usually a Scotsman, Irishman and Welshman too, but they're still at the Rugby World Cup.
***
Goodnight Kiss
One night a guy takes his girlfriend home. As they are about to kiss each other goodnight, the guy starts feeling a little horny.

 With an air of confidence, he leans with his hand against the wall and, smiling, he says to her "Darling, would you give me a blowjob?"

 Horrified, she replies "Are you mad? My parents will see us!"

 "Oh come on! Who's gonna see us at this hour?"

 "No, please. Can you imagine if we get caught?"

 Horny as hell he says, "Oh please, please, I love you so much!"

 "No, no, and no. I love you too, but I just can't!"

 "Oh yes you can. Please?"

 Out of the blue, the light on the stairs goes on, and the girl's little sister shows up in her pajamas, and in a sleepy voice she says, "Dad says to go ahead and give him a blowjob. Otherwise I can do it. Or if need be, Dad says he can come down himself and do it. But for God's sake tell the asshole to take his fucking hand off the intercom!"
***
There was once a starving homeless man near Pyongyang...
This joke has been removed.

Food and shelter are plentiful in North Korea.

To desire more is greed.
***
A man is sitting next to a woman...
A man and a woman were sitting beside each other in the first class section of a plane.

The woman sneezed, took out a tissue, gently wiped her nose, and then visibly shuddered for ten to fifteen seconds.

The man went back to his reading. A few minutes later, the woman sneezed again, took a tissue, wiped her nose, then shuddered violently once more.

Assuming that the woman might have a cold, the man was still curious about the shuddering. A few more minutes passed when the woman sneezed yet again.

As before, she took a tissue, wiped her nose, her body shaking ever more than before.

Unable to restrain his curiosity, the man turned to the woman and said, “I couldn’t help but notice that you’ve sneezed three times, wiped your nose and then shudder violently. Are you OK?”

“I am sorry if I disturbed you, I have a very rare medical condition; whenever I sneeze I have an orgasm.”

The man, more than a bit embarrassed, was still curious. “I have never heard of that condition before” he said. “Are you taking anything for it?”

The woman smiled, “Pepper.”
***
Whats the difference between a porsche and an erection?
I dont have a porsche.

(Best told by whispering in someones ear.)
***
A guy calls a company and orders their 5-day, 10 lb. weight loss program.
A guy calls a company and orders their 5-day, 10 lb. weight loss program.

The next day, there's a knock on the door and there stands before him a voluptuous, athletic, 19 year old babe dressed in nothing but a pair of Nike running shoes and a sign around her neck. She introduces herself as a representative of the weight loss company. The sign reads, "If you can catch me, you can have me."

Without a second thought, he takes off after her. A few miles later huffing and puffing, he finally gives up. The same girl shows up for the next four days and the same thing happens. On the fifth day, he weighs himself and is delighted to find he has lost 10 lbs. as promised.

He calls the company and orders their 5-day/20 pound program. The next day there's a knock at the door and there stands the most stunning, beautiful, sexy woman he has ever seen in his life. She is wearing nothing but Reebok running shoes and a sign around her neck that reads, "If you catch me you can have me". Well, he's out the door after her like a shot. This girl is in excellent shape and he does his best, but no such luck. So for the next four days, the same routine happens with him gradually getting in better and better shape.

Much to his delight on the fifth day when he weighs himself, he discovers that he has lost another 20 lbs. as promised. He decides to go for broke and calls the company to order the 7-day/50 pound program

"Are you sure?" asks the representative on the phone. "This is our most rigorous program."

"Absolutely," he replies, "I haven't felt this good in years."

The next day there's a knock at the door; and when he opens it he finds a huge muscular guy standing there wearing nothing but pink running shoes and a sign around his neck that reads, "If I catch you, your ass is mine."

He lost 63 pounds that week
***
A Mexican magician tells his audience he will disappear on the count of 3. He says, "uno, dos... *poof*...
He disappeared without a tres
***
The last joke my brother made up, before he passed away this week.
Him: "If my name was Ella, and I married Darth Vader. My name would be Elevator". Stupid and corny, but it's exactly the kind of lame jokes he would make.
***
A blonde woman was speeding
down the road in her little red sports car and was pulled over by a woman police officer, who was also a blonde.The blonde cop asked to see the blonde driver's license. She dug through her purse and was getting progressively more agitated. "What does it look like?" she finally asked. The policewoman replied, "It's square and it has your picture on it." 

The driver finally found a square mirror in her purse, looked at it and handed it to the policewoman. "Here it is," she said. The blonde officer looked at the mirror, then handed it back saying, "OK, you can go. I didn't realize you were a cop..."
***
It's midnight and a woman awakes to find her husband not in bed.
She puts on her robe and goes downstairs to look for him. She finds him sitting at the kitchen table with a cup of hot cocoa in front of him. 


He appears to be in deep thought, just staring at the wall. She watches as he wipes away a tear from his eye. 


"What's the matter, dear?" she whispers as she steps into the room. "Why are you down here at this time of the night!?" 


The husband looks up from his drink, "It's the 20th Anniversary of the day we met." She can't believe he has remembered and starts to tear up. 


The husband continues, "Do you remember 20 years ago when we started dating? I was 18 and you were only 15", he said solemnly. Once again, the wife is touched to tears because her husband is so caring and sensitive. "Yes, I do" she replies.

The husband pauses.


The words were not coming easily. "Do you remember when your father caught us in the back seat of my car?" "Yes, I remember" said the wife, lowering herself into a chair beside him. 


The husband continued. "Do you remember when he shoved the shotgun in my face and said, "Either you marry my daughter or I will make sure you spend the next 20 years in prison?" 


He sighed as he wiped another tear away from his cheek and said, "I would have gotten out today."
***
A monkey claims that he has the best weed in the world.
A lizard notices a monkey sitting in a tree smoking a joint. He calls up, "Hey, monkey! What are you doing?" 

"I'm smoking the best weed in the world," replies the monkey. 

"I doubt it," says the lizard. The monkey invites him to the top of the tree to try it. The lizard takes a few puffs and concedes that it really is amazing weed! After a few more puffs he gets very thirsty. He tells the monkey that he'll be back after a quick drink and stumbles off to the river. 

At the river he is so stoned and uncoordinated that he falls in. An alligator sees him and pushes him back onto shore with his nose. He then asks, "What is wrong with you?"

 The lizard tells him, "Oh, the monkey up in that tall tree has the best weed in the world." 

The gator goes to the tall tree to see for himself.  "Hey, monkey!" he calls. The monkey opens his eyes wide and says, "How much water did you drink, man?"
***
Three men find themselves at a beach-side resort in the Caribbean...
... and they soon begin to discuss their lives and how they came to be there.

The first man says, "I use to run a successful business in the Mid West. One day unfortunately there was a huge fire and my entire warehouse burned to the ground. I collected the insurance on it and decided to move here."

The other two nod, slightly sympathetically. 

The second man says, "Similar story here. I used to run a jewellery store back in LA, but unfortunately one night there was a massive break in. I collected the insurance that I had on the jewellery and moved down here to settle."

They look at the third guy. He says, "I used to run a small fishing business on the East Coast. Last year unfortunately the entire thing was ruined by a hurricane. I collected my insurance and moved here."

The first two guys look at each other for a minute. Finally, one says, "How do you start a hurricane?"
***
A father buys a lie detector robot that slaps people when they lie.
He decides to test it out at dinner one night. The father asks his son what he did that afternoon.

The son says, "I did some schoolwork."

The robot slaps the son.

The son says, "Ok, Ok. I was at a friend's house watching movies."

Dad asks, "What movie did you watch?"

Son says, "Toy Story."

The robot slaps the son.

Son says, "Ok, Ok, we were watching porn."

Dad says, "What? At your age I didn't even know what porn was."

The robot slaps the father.

Mom laughs and says, "Well, he certainly is your son."

The robot slaps the mother.

Robot for sale.
***
Post turtles.
An old farmer was getting his hand stitched up after an accident at his cattle farm.

He and the doctor start into conversation, which leads into politics.

The old farmer explained, "Well, as I see it, most politicians are 'Post Turtles'."

Not being familiar with the term, the doctor asked what a 'post turtle' was. The old farmer explained as best he could, "When you're driving down a country road and you come across a fence post with a turtle on top, that's a 'post turtle.'

The doctor remained puzzled. The farmer continued further.

"You know he didn't get up there by himself, he doesn't belong up there, he doesn't know what to do while up there, he's elevated beyond his ability to function, and you just wonder what kind of dumb arse put him there to begin with."
***
A guy walks into a bar...
.and sees a gorgeous woman nursing a drink. Walking up behind her he says: "Hi there, good looking'. How's it going?" Having already downed a few power drinks, she turns around, faces him, looks him straight in the eye and says: "Listen up, buddy. I screw anybody, anytime, anywhere, your place, my place, in the car, front door,back door, on the ground, standing up, sitting down, naked or with clothes on,dirty, clean... It just doesn't matter to me. I've been doing it ever since I got out of college and I just flat-ass love it." Eyes now wide with interest, he responds: "No kidding. I'm a lawyer too. What firm are you with?"
***
What's the difference between Hillary Clinton and an acronym?
An acronym stands for something
***
Hung Like a Baby
I got married last week my fiancée and I were both virgins, and the night before our wedding my fiancée came up to me and said 

" I have to admit something....  My boobs are not really this big, I have been stuffing my bra the whole time!"
I responded "it is Ok, I am not marrying you for your boobs!"  "I have something to admit as well.... I am hung like a baby!"

she also said "it is OK, I am not marrying you for the size of your penis!"

So on our wedding night, after everyone had left we went to out hotel room.  I was sitting on the bed and she told me to wait there.  She went into the bathroom and cleaned up, she came out naked.  I immediately told her "your boobs are beautiful and I would not change a thing!"  

I started to get undressed and got to my underwear, I took them off, and she fainted.  I ran over to her to check on her.  When she came to she looked at me and said "I thought you were hung like a baby"

"I am 7 pounds 6 ounces 19 and a half inches"
***
A Koala is sitting in a bar...
A Koala is sitting in a bar enjoying his drink when a beautiful woman approaches him. She starts flirting and they chat for a few minutes before the woman looks at the Koala and says 

"hey, you wanna get outta here?" 

"Sure!" the Koala replied as he jumped off the stool and took her hand and led her out of the bar.

The moment they get into her apartment he immediately pulls her skirt down and starts going down on her. After about 15 minutes the Koala gets up and starts walking around. 

"what are you doing?" the woman asked.

"Oh, I'm getting my stuff and going back to the bar" the Koala replied.

"You have to pay me first!" the woman shouted.

"What!? Why?" the Koala asked.

"Because I'm a prostitute!" the woman said angrily.

"What's a prostitute?" he asked

The woman grabbed a dictionary from the bedside table and threw it at him. He opened it up and found the word:

Prostitute: A person who offers sexual activity in exchange for payment.

The Koala snapped the dictionary shut and angrily shouted

"Well yeah bitch, I'm a Koala!"

"What the fuck is a Koala?!" she barked

The Koala threw the dictionary back at her and she opened it up to the K section.

Koala: Eats bushes and leaves
***
The warning sign
There was a watermelon plantation which had been constantly spoiled by night thieves who were trespassing to steal melons. The owner came with an idea to repel the intruders: he put a warning sign on the plantation's fence: "Beware! Steal on your own risk! One melon below this fence is poisoned!"

The next day, there were no more missing melons and a short text added on the warning sign: "Now there are two".
***
Two scientists walk into a bar The first one says “I’ll have some H2O.” The second one says, “I’ll have some H2O too.”
The bartender pours them both hydrogen peroxide because he's tired of their bullshit every day
***
A guy with a monkey walks into a bar...
A guy with a monkey on his shoulder walks into a bar. No one really pays him any attention. He walks up to the bar and asks for a drink. The monkey gets off his shoulder and heads over to a pool table. The monkey picks up the cue ball and then eats it. 

"You're going to have to pay for another cue ball," the bartender says.

"Relax," the man says, "I will return with it in a few days."

3 days later, the man comes back with his monkey and hands the bartender the cue ball. He then sits down and orders a drink. The monkey gets off his shoulder. It grabs a peanut, sticks it up its butt, and then eats it.

"Why did he do that?" the bartender asks.

The man replies, "He likes to measure things now beforehand."
***
Are My Testicles Black?
A male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen mask
over his mouth and nose.
A pretty, young, student nurse appears to give him a partial sponge
bath.
'Nurse', he mumbles, from behind the mask. 'Are my testicles black?'
Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, 'I don't know, Sir. I'm only
here to wash your upper body and feet.'
He struggles to ask again, 'Nurse, please check. Are my testicles
black?'
Concerned that he may elevate his blood pressure and heart rate from
worry about his testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment and pulls
back the covers. She raises his gown, holds his manhood in one hand
and his testicles in the other.

Then, she takes a close look and says, 'There's nothing wrong with
them,
Sir!'

The man pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her and says very slowly:
'Thank you very much. That was wonderful, but, listen very, very
closely......
'A r e - m y - t e s t - r e s u l t s - b a c k ??'
***
An old man is dying..
His grandson asks him, "papa.. What will happen to your body when you die?" the grandfather looks up weakly at him and says, "I decay...". Just then his monitor flat lines and the boy sat wondering why his grandfather didnt know what would happen to his corpse.
***
Three girls die and go to heaven...
They are greeted by st. Peter at the pearly gates. He welcomes them and then says "But be careful, there are lots of ducks in heaven. If you step on any you will be punished". The girls go in and the first one steps on a duck right away and the ugliest man in existence gets chained to her for eternity. The second girl steps on a duck after about a week and the second ugliest man is chained to her for eternity. The third girl, however, never steps on a duck and the most beautiful man she had ever seen was chained to her. "What did I do to deserve such a nice thing?" she asks God. God looks at her and says, "He stepped on a duck."
***
Where would you park your camel?
The Camelot. 

PS Booze helped with this and now I'm laughing alone in my apartment

Edit: Went to class, came back, saw this. Me and my cat are thoroughly pleased.
***
What's Whitney Houston's favorite type of coordination?
HAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAND EEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEYEEEEEEEEE
***
Two hillbillies walk into a restaurant...
While having a bite to eat, they talk about their moonshine operation.

Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table, who is eating a sandwich, begins to cough. 
After a minute or so, it becomes apparent that she is in real distress. One of the hillbillies looks at her and says, 'Kin ya swallar?' 

The woman shakes her head no. Then he asks, 'Kin ya breathe?'

The woman begins to turn blue, and shakes her head no. 

The hillbilly walks over to the woman, lifts up her dress, yanks down her drawers, and quickly gives her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue.

The woman is so shocked that she has a violent spasm, and the obstruction flies out of her mouth. As she begins to breathe again, the Hillbilly walks slowly back to his table. His partner says, 'Ya know, I'd heerd of that there 'Hind Lick Maneuver' but I never seed nobody done it.'
***
A Panda Walks Into A Bar
A panda walks into a bar. He asks the bartender how he can get a little action for the night. The bartender motions to a young woman. She talks to the panda, and they go back to her place. After having sex, the panda abruptly leaves.

The next night, the woman goes to the panda's house. "You owe me money," she says.

"For what?"

The woman rolls her eyes and explains, "I'm a prostitute."

The panda pulls out a dictionary and looks it up: "Prostitute: Has sex for money."

The panda says, "I don't have to pay you. I'm a panda -- look it up." She is about to protest when the bear hands her the dictionary.

The woman looks up "panda" in the dictionary. It says, "Panda: Eats bush and leaves."
***
A man walks into a bar...
And see's a man, about 1 foot tall playing the piano. "Damn!" He exclaims, "how is this possible ?" The bartender explains that there is a genie in the back of the bar. Excited, the man goes into the back of the bar and wishes for "1 million bucks!" , suddenly 1 million ducks fly out of the bar. "This genie is hard of hearing! I asked for a million bucks, and I got a million ducks!". The bartender pauses and says... "Yeah, you think I really wished for a 12 inch pianist..."


***
There are four kinds of sex
HOUSE SEX - When you are newly married and have sex all over the house in every room.

BEDROOM SEX - After you have been married for a while, you only have sex in the bedroom.

HALL SEX - After you've been married for many, many years you just pass each other in the hall and say "FUCK YOU"

COURTROOM SEX - When your wife and her lawyer fuck you in the divorce court in front of many people for every penny you've got.
***
Why was the little ink drop crying?
His mother was in the pen and he didn't know how long the sentence would be.

Edit:  Thanks for all the upvotes.  My Dad used to tell this joke when I was a kid.  Wasn't trying to claim it was original.  I'm happy everyone got a good laugh.
***
A guy walks into a drugstore and sees a guy leaning heavily against the wall
He asks the clerk, 'What's with that guy?'

Clerk says, 'He came in with a bad cough and asked me for cough medicine.  We were out of cough medicine, so I gave him a whole bottle of laxative instead.'

The guy says, 'What?! You can't treat a cough with laxative!'

The clerk replies, 'Of course you can! Look at him. He's afraid to cough!'
***
A black man and a white man walk into a bakery
The black man immediately steals three pastries and puts them in his pocket.

He says to the white, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see a thing." The white man says to the black man, "That's typical of you black people. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."
Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. The white man swallows it and asks for another one. The owner gives him another one. Then the white man swallows that one and asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "So what did you do with the pastries?"

The white man replies, "Look in the black mans back pocket....."

EDIT: I forgot that you don't get karma for jokes, :(
***
old man goes to the Dr....
An 85-year-old man was requested by his doctor for a sperm count as part of his physical exam. The doctor gave the man a jar and said, "Take this jar home and bring back a semen sample tomorrow." The next day the 85-year-old man reappeared at the doctor's office and gave him the jar, which was as clean and empty as on the previous day. The doctor asked, what happened and the man explained. "Well, doc, it's like this--first I tried with my right hand, but nothing. Then I tried with my left hand, but still nothing. Then I asked my wife for help. She tried with her right hand, then with her left, still nothing. She tried with her mouth, first with the teeth in, then with her teeth out, still nothing. We even called up Arleen, the lady next door and she tried too, first with both hands, then an armpit, and she even tried squeezin' it between her knees, but still nothing." The doctor was shocked! "You asked your neighbor?" The old man replied, "Yep, none of us could get the jar open."
***
Got a pen?
I was in a pub in far Western Queensland last Saturday night, when this really brutally ugly girl came up to me, squeezed my arse and said, "Give me your number, sexy."

I replied "Have you got a pen?"

She smiled and said "Yes."

I replied, "Well you better get back to it, before the farmer notices you're missing." 
***
Two hillbillies
Two hillbillies, Ed and Red walk into a bar. While having a shot of whiskey they talk about their moonshine operation. Suddenly, a woman at a nearby table who is eating a sandwich, begins to cough. After a minute or so, it becomes apparent that she is in real distress.

One of the hillbillies looks at her and says, “Kin ya swaller?” The woman shakes her head no. “Kin ya breathe?” The woman begins to turn blue and shakes her head no.

The hillbilly walks over to the woman, lifts up the back of her dress, yanks down her drawers and quickly gives her right butt cheek a lick with his tongue.

The woman is so shocked that she has a violent spasm and the obstruction flies out of her mouth. As she begins to breathe again, the hillbilly walks slowly back to the bar.

His partner says, “Ya know, I heerd of that there ‘Hind Lick Maneuver’, but I ain’t never seed nobody do it!” 
***
It's not fair for people to keep comparing Trump to Hitler.
It's not fair for people to keep comparing Trump to Hitler.  Hitler was a decorated war hero and qualified leader.
***
A boy asked his father...
"Dad, what's the difference between confidence, and confidential?" 
The father thinks for a moment and says, "You are my son, and that I am confident of. Your friend billy is also my son but that's confidential."
***
My attempt to justifying the time I spend here.
Wife: I think my husband has alzheimer's.


Doc: Is he forgetting names?



Wife: No



Doc: Is he getting lost in familiar environments?



Wife: No



Doc: Is he forgetting to turn off the TV or stove?



Wife: No



Doc: Then why do you think he has alzheimer's?



Wife: Every day he goes to r/jokes. 



Doc: Is this a new occurrence?



Wife: No, but he is laughing at the jokes. 

***
Two policemen . . .
Two policemen call the station on their radio.

"Hello. ..... Is this the Sarge?"

"Yes?"

"We have a case here, Sarge. A woman has shot her husband 
dead for stepping on the floor she had mopped."

"Have you arrested the woman?"

"No sir. The floor is still wet."
***
The Stoned Koala and Lizard
A koala is sitting up a gumtree smoking a joint when a little lizard walks past, looks up and says:

"Hey Koala!
What are you doing?"

The koala says: "Smoking a joint."
"Come up and have some."

So the little lizard climbs up, sits next to the koala
and they enjoy a large doobie.

After a while the little lizard says his mouth is dry
and he is going to get a drink from the river.

But the little lizard is so stoned that he leans too far over and falls into the river.

A crocodile sees this, swims over to the little lizard and helps him to the side then asks the little lizard:

"What's the matter with you?"

The little lizard explains to the crocodile that he was sitting in the tree, smoking a joint with the koala, got too stoned, and then fell into the river while taking a drink.

The crocodile says he has to see this.

So they walk into the rain forest and find the tree where the koala is sitting, with yet another joint.

He looks up and says, "Hey you!"


The koala looks down at him and says...

"Fu-u-u-u-c-c-k, Dude.......
How much water did you drink?
***
Two cannibals are eating Amy Schumer
Two cannibals are eating Amy Schumer 
One turns to the other and asks, "does this taste funny to you?"
The other responds, "no."
***
A man with a stutter...
A man with a stutter is visiting the doctor.

"How's the stutter?", asks the doctor.

"It's g-getting better. My mate calls me D-Donkey," replies the man.

"Any idea why?" The doctor asks.

"No, but he aw he aw he aw he always calls me that."
***
What's the safest place in Dallas during a tornado?
The Cowboys stadium, the only place there'll never be a touchdown
***
A male patient is lying in bed in the hospital, wearing an oxygen mask over his mouth and nose.
A young student nurse appears and gives him a partial sponge bath.

"Nurse,"' he mumbles from behind the mask, "are my testicles black?"

Embarrassed, the young nurse replies, "I don't know, Sir. I'm only
here to wash your upper body and feet."

He struggles to ask again, "Nurse, please check for me. Are my
testicles black?"

Concerned that he might elevate his blood pressure and heart rate from worrying about his testicles, she overcomes her embarrassment and pulls back the covers.

She raises his gown, holds his manhood in one hand and his testicles gently in the other.

She looks very closely and says, "There's nothing wrong with them,
Sir. They look fine."

The man slowly pulls off his oxygen mask, smiles at her, and says very slowly, "Thank you very much. That was wonderful.
Now listen very, very closely: 

Are - my - test - results - back?"
***
What video game would Adolf Hitler play?
Mein Kraft.
***
Two Blonde Genies
A guy finds a lamp and rubs it. Out pop two blonde genies. They thank him and offer him 3 wishes. He thinks for a minute, and *poof*...  

He's in a vast room filled with $100 bills to his waist. He looks across the room and sees a door. He makes his way through the money to the door and opens it...

Now he is in another room filled with beautiful, naked women. He looks across the room and sees another door. He fondles his way across the room to that door and opens it...

Where he finds the two blonde genies who drag him to a tree and hang him by the neck until he is dead.

As they are walking away the one turns to the other and says, "I understand why he wanted wealth beyond his wildest dreams. I understand why he wanted to be surrounded by beautiful, naked women. By, why in the world did he want to be hung like a black man?"
***
An Elderly Couple are at home...
An elderly couple were at home watching TV.  Phil had the remote and was switching back and forth between a fishing channel and the porn channel.
Sally became more and more annoyed and finally said, "For God's sake, Phil... leave it on the porn channel... you know how to fish!" 
***
Three Lawyers and Three Engineers were Traveling by Train to Conference
At the station, each lawyer bought a ticket whereas the engineers bought only one ticket between them.
"How are you going to travel on a single ticket?" asked a lawyer.
"Wait and watch" answered one of the engineers.
When they boarded the train, the lawyers took their seats, but the three engineers crammed into a toilet and closed the door behind them. Shortly after the train started, the ticket collector arrived. He knocked on the toilet door and asked, "Ticket please." The door opened just a crack and a single arm emerged with a ticket in hand. The ticket collector took it and moved on. Seeing this, the lawyers decided to the same thing on the return trip.
So when they got to the station, they bought only one ticket. To their astonishment, the engineers didn't buy any.
"How are you going to travel without a ticket?" asked one of the perplexed lawyers.
"Wait and watch" answered an engineer.
In the train, the three engineers crammed into a toilet and the three lawyers into another nearby. Soon after the train started, one of the engineers got out of the toilet and walked to one where the lawyers were hiding. He knocked on the door and said, "Ticket, please."
***
Bobby buys condoms
Bobby walks into a drug store to buy condoms but couldn't find them. He tells the pharmacist "I'm going to need a dozen condoms?". The pharmacist replies "Sure thing. Big night tonight?" With a chuckle and a smile the Bobby said "Oh yeah, I'm going to take my girlfriends virginity tonight. She's a bit too immature for me but I'm still gonna pop her cherry. Might as well wear it out before I kick her to the curb". The pharmacist shakes his head and sells the boy the condoms.

Later that night, Bobby knocks on his girlfriends door and the pretty teenage girl answers. With a big hug she says, "Come, I want you to meet my family". "This is my mother and father", the young girl said. "Hello ma'am, hello sir, I was going to take your daughter to a movie and come straight back but only if I have your permission and blessing." With a big smile the girl says "Bobby, you never told me you were such a polite gentleman". Bobby sternly looked at her and said "yeah... and you never told me your dad was a pharmacist".
***
A man walks into a bank and approaches the counter.
He yells "This is a fuck-up!" 

Confused the bank teller asks "Don't you mean stick-up?"

The man scuffs his shoes on the carpet and says "No, I've left my gun at home.
***
What's the difference between Jimmy Fallon and myself?
I can get through a Jimmy Fallon joke without laughing. 
***
I was in the pub last night when the barman asked me, "How come I never see you in here with Pete any more?"
I asked him, "Would you drink with a bloke who's a liar, always late, borrows money he never pays back, always tries to squirm out of his round, jealous of everything you have, and when your back is turned he tries to fuck your wife and daughter?"
"Bloody hell! No!" he said, somewhat flabbergasted.
"Well, neither would Pete,"
***
Three Engineers are Discussing God
So, three engineers are sitting around a table at lunch, discussing God. 

The first engineer says, "I think God must be a mechanical engineer." and proceeds to explain in depth how only a mechanical engineer could've built the muscle and skeletal system to work so beautifully together.

The second engineer says "No, my guess is that he's an electrical engineer" and proceeds to describe how only an Electrical engineer could run an entire body off of such a small amount of power for such a complex system.

The third engineer says "Nope, he must be a civil engineer!", prompting stunned silence from the other two.

"A Civil Engineer?!" Says one after a long pause, "What makes you say THAT?".

The third engineer thinks for a minute and explains "well, only a civil engineer would run a waste pipe through a recreational area!"
***
Why did Satan keep growing his herb garden even when his oregano died each time?
Because he always had a Hell of a good thyme. 
***
Who's Leonardo Dicaprio's least favorite Sesame Street character?
Oscar

im so sorry
***
Comas make a big difference in a sentence.
For example,

Ben is in a hurry.

Ben is in a coma.
***
America is going to suffer if Donald Trump becomes president.
You could say they are going toupée for it. 
***
College
ON the first day of college, the Dean addressed the students, pointing out some of the rules:
"The female dormitory will be out-of-bounds for all male students, and the male dormitory to the female students. Anybody
caught breaking this rule will be fined $20 the first time." He continued, "Anybody caught breaking this rule the second time
will be fined $60. Being caught a third time will cost you a fine of $180. Are there any questions?"

At this point, a male student in the crowd inquired:
"How much for a season pass?"
***
A blonde walks into a drycleaners
and says 'good morning' to the elderly attendant and hands him a blouse.  The man didn't hear too well and asked, "Come again"?

The blonde turned red and giggled.  "No, just mayonnaise this time."
***
Two Blondes meet up for coffee...
Two blondes meet up for coffee and one asks the other what she has been up to. 


"I had sex with two Brazilian guys last night", she said.
"Wow - I've never even met that many guys" replied the other.





***
How many guys in the Friendzone does it take to screw in a lightbulb?
None, they just stand around complimenting it then get pissed when it doesn't screw.
***
Kim Jong-Un has promised a new clear future for North Korea.
Oops! Spelt ***nuclear*** wrong.
***
It only takes 3 inches to please a woman.
And it doesn't matter if it's mastercard, visa or American express.
***
A woman who lives on the top floor of her apartment building is out on her balcony when she slips and falls...
...Screaming, she is caught a floor down by a man standing on his own balcony. "Will you suck my dick?" the man asks. "No!" she yells horrified. The man drops her. Screaming, she is caught the next floor down by another man standing on his balcony. "Can I fuck you in the ass?" the man asks."No!" she yells again out of reflex, absolutely horrified. The man drops her. Falling and screaming, she is caught again by a third man on the balcony below. Terrified of being dropped again she frantically screams, "I'll suck your dick! You can fuck me in the ass!" The man looks at her and says, "Slut." and drops her. 
***
God says to jesus, "You remembered it's father's day?"
Jesus says "what the hell am I supposed to get a man who has everything?!"

*God turns & winks at camera*

"Omnipresents." 
***
I've got a friend who is a structural engineer.
He's always complaining about stress at work.


EDIT: damn I wish I got karma for this post.
***
A man runs into a bar...
A man runs into a bar, and demands to the barkeep: "Quick! How tall do penguins grow?"

"About two foot sir" replies the bartender

"Shit. I've just run over a nun."
***
I always wear a helmet during intercourse cause I'm a firm believer in safe sex.
Doesn't help much against the STD's but it sure is effective against the pepper-spray.
***
If Hillary Clinton is elected as our first female President it's really going to redefine a few things for me....
....Like the words President Bush. 
***
Late one night at the insane asylum one patient shouted, "I am Napoleon!"
A person in another room said, "How do you know?" The first patient said, "God told me!" Just then, a voice from another room shouted,

"I did not!"
***
I'd been in a serious accident.
Thursday night I gradually woke up stiff as a plank in hospital's ICU, tubes up my nose & down my throat, wires monitoring every function & all around my head, hell of a pain over my left ear, and a gorgeous nurse hovering over me.
 
 
It was obvious I'd been in a serious accident.


She looked deep & steady and I heard her slowly say,
 
'You may not feel anything from the waist down.'
 
 
I managed to mumble in reply,
 
'Can I feel your tits, then?'
***
During a marriage preparation class, the teacher asked how many kissable areas there are on a woman's body
One guy said, "18."

A French guy in the back yelled, "119!"

Another guy said, "12."

The French guy piped up again, "119!"

A sweet girl in the front said, "I know only one...the lips!"

The French guy shouted, "120!" 
***
10 men are about to become priests
10 men went to learn the way of priesthood. They have passed all tests and are going to go through the rite or ordination.

But before, they must pass a last test is to see if they are truly ready to serve the Lord.

All 10 are made to sit in line, naked, with a small bell tied to their penis. Then beautiful women, also naked, are made to pass in front of the priests. If the latter have all cast aside their human temptations, no bell should ring.

As the ladies walked by, trying to seduce the men, none but 1 bell started to ring. It rang louder and louder, until it slipped and fell down.

Ashamed, the should-be priest stood up to recover his bell. As he bent down to pick it up, 9 bells started to ring.
***
A wife was dying.
A wife was dying. She called her husband and said, "Gary, I've been unfaithful."

Gary answered, "I know. That's why I poisoned you."

***
Panda
A panda walks into a restaurant, sits down and orders a sandwich. After he finishes eating the sandwich, the panda pulls out a gun and shoots the waiter, and then stands up to go. "Hey!" shouts the manager. "Where are you going? You just shot my waiter and you didn't pay for your sandwich!"

The panda yells back at the manager and left the restaurant, "Hey man, I am a PANDA! Look it up!"

The manager opens his dictionary and sees the following definition for panda: "A tree-dwelling marsupial of Asian origin, characterized by distinct black and white coloring. Eats shoots and leaves.
***
My dentist reminded me of my wife's sensitive gag reflex
My dentist reminded me of my wife's sensitive gag reflex. We laughed & laughed. 
Then I remembered that my wife & I have different dentists
***
A man dies and goes to hell.
The devil says he must choose a room in hell to spend the rest of eternity in. He walks into the first room and sees a bunch of people doing headstands on a wood floor. 

He thinks "No way. I can't do that for eternity"

He walks into the second room and sees a bunch of people doing headstands on a metal floor.

He thinks "I definitely can't do that for eternity"

He walks into a third room where theres a bunch of people standing in 4 feet of shit and drinking coffee. 

He says to himself "...well I guess I could get used to the smell."

After 10 minutes in the room, the devil comes in and says "Alright, coffee break's over. Back to headstands."


***
What sound does Reddit make when it blows up?

Pao!


Edit: Whoa, FP *and* gold. Thank you! 
***
Why couldn't the American fly home from Russia after the Olympics?
Because he was Snow'den.
***
lady sneezes on a plane

The woman sneezed, took out a tissue, gently wiped her nose, then visibly shuddered for ten to fifteen seconds.

The man went back to his reading.

A few minutes later, the woman sneezed again, took a tissue, wiped her nose, then shuddered violently once more.

Assuming that the woman might have a cold, the man was still curious about the shuddering.

A few more minutes passed when the woman sneezed yet again. As before, she took a tissue, wiped her nose, her body shaking even more than before.

Unable to restrain his curiosity, the man turned to the woman and said, "I couldn't help but notice that you've sneezed three times, wiped your nose and then shuddered violently. Are you OK?"

"I am sorry if I disturbed you. I have a very rare medical condition. Whenever I sneeze I have an orgasm."

The man, more than a bit embarrassed, was still curious. "I have never heard of that condition before" he said. "Are you taking anything for it?"

The woman nodded, "Pepper.” 
***
African Penis Growth Technique.
A couple was watching a documentary about an African tribe. They learned that when 

each male member of this particular tribe reaches a certain age, he has a string with a 

weight attached to it tied around his penis. After a while the weight stretches the penis 
until it's 20 inches long.

Later that evening, as the man was getting out of the shower, his wife said, "let's try the African string and weight technique honey".
The husband agreed, and they tied a string with a weight to his penis.
A few days later the wife asked, "how is our little experiment coming along?" The husband replied "Well, it looks like we're about halfway there".
The wife impressed and said, "you mean it's already grown to 10 inches?"
"No" the husband replied. "It's turning black".
***
Muslim book store in New York: A man asks if they have the latest Donald Trump book on immigration.
"Fuck off, get out and don't come back" says the store owner. 

"That's the one!" says the man
***
A Blonde,Brunette,and a Redhead..
A Blonde,Brunette,and a Redhead decide to check their daughters bags, 

All 3 of them found condoms in their respective daughters bags.

The Brunette was stunned and said :" We're a catholic family, It is a sin to have premarital sex  "

The Redhead said "Its Good to see my girl is using protection, Because prevention is  better than cure !".

The Blonde said: " OH MY GOD, MY DAUGHTER HAS A PENIS "

EDIT: THANK ALL OF YOU FOR POSITIVE COMMENTS. IM GLAD THAT I COULD MAKE PEOPLE LAUGH. WILL COME UP WITH MORE JOKES FOR ALL YOU WONDERFUL PEOPLE. LOVE ALL OF YOU :)
***
Why was Han Solo suspicious when he first put his penis in Princess Leia?
It was Luke warm

***
A bear walks into a bar.
The bartender asks whata ya have there big fella?  The bear says "  Give me a .........................................................beer."  The bartender says" What's with the big pause?"  The bear throws his arms up in the air and says " I DON'T KNOW I WAS BORN WITH THEM."
***
A new soldier, fresh out of boot camp, is deployed to a remote base in Afghanistan.
After about a week, the young soldier is approached by his Staff Sergeant.  

"Private, how is everything?" he asks.

"It's ok sir, it's just so desolate out here.  Some of the guys have been deployed here for months... there's no women anywhere... what do they do.... you know, for women?"

The Staff Sergeant motions towards the south end of the base and says "The boys have some camels tied up over there.  No one's gonna judge you out here, son."

The Private shook his head in disgust, telling himself he would never stoop that low.

A few weeks later, the Private is pent up.  He needs release.  He finally decides to join the club, so early one morning he gets up, walks over to the camels, and unties one.

He begins pumping away at the camel from behind, when the Staff Sergeant and the Major discover him. 

"Private, just what in the fuck do you think you're doing?!" the Staff Sergeant asks.

"But, you said.." the Private stammers, still inside the camel.  "You said the boys have these camels tied up!"

"You idiot," the Sergeant says.  "The boys ride the camels into town to hire a prostitute."
***
Three vampires are bragging to each other...
The first says "Watch this." leaves, and is back in an instant, mouth covered in blood. He points at a villager and says "You see that villager? Sucked him dry."

The second, impressed, but not willing to be outdone, leaves and returns just as fast as the first, blood covering her mouth, neck and cheeks. She points and says "You see that town? Bone dry, no survivors."

The third shrugs and says "That's nothing, watch this." He's barely gone a fraction of a second before he's back with a face completely covered in blood. The first vampire asks "What did you do?" The third vampire replied "You see that pole?"

"Yeah?"

"I didn't"
***
A passenger in a taxi...
A passenger in a taxi leaned over to ask the driver a question and tapped him on the shoulder. The driver screamed, lost control of the cab, nearly hit a bus, drove up over the curb, and stopped 
just inches from a large plate glass window.

For a few moments everything was silent in the cab, and then the still shaking driver said, "I'm sorry but you scared the daylights 
out of me."

The frightened passenger apologized to the driver and said he didn't realize a mere tap on the shoulder could frighten him so much.

The driver replied, "No, no, I'm sorry, it's entirely my fault. Today is my first day driving a cab. I've been driving a hearse for the last 25 years.
***
TIL that at age 13 Jewish girls have a Bat Mitzvah and at age 15 Latina girls have a...
Baby shower.
***
The Bike
A 13 year old boy came home all happy.

His mom asked, "what did you do at school today, hunny?"

"Oh I had sex with my teacher," he said calmly.

The mother began to scream and yell and sent him to his room till his father got home.

When the father came home the mother said distraughtly and close to tears, "Go talk to your son...he had sex with his teacher today!!!!!!!!!"

The dad with the BIG grin on his face walked upstairs.

He asked his son what happened at school and the son told him... "I had sex with my teacher".

The dad said, "Son, I'm so proud of you I'm going to get you that bike you have wanted."

They go out and buy the bike and the dad asked him if he wanted to ride it home and the son replied, "Nah dad my butt is still sore."
***
A statue of two naked lovers has been in a park for 100 years.
God sees them and touched by their love sends down an Angel. The Angel waves his hand and the statues become alive. The angel says." God has granted you 30 minutes of life to do with what you will."

The two immediately run into the bushes where there is rustling and laughter. Fifteen minutes later they emerge holding hands and smiling.

The Angel says,"I don't mean to tell you what to do but you still have another fifteen minutes."

One lover looks at the other and exclaims, "Good! This time you hold down the pigeon and I'll shit on it's head!" 
***
Does it hurt anymore?
A woman playing Golf hit a man nearby. He put his hands together between his legs. Fell on the ground & rolled around in pain. She rushed to him & offered to relieve his pain as she was a Doctor.
Reluctantly he agreed.
She gently took his hands away. Unzipped his pants & put her hands inside.
She massaged him  tenderly for a few minutes & asked: "How does it feel?"
He replied: "Feels great but I still think my thumb is broken"
***
two guys are at work and one says to the other
“i had the worst freudian slip the other day..i was at the train station and the woman behind the ticket counter had these massive tits and i meant to say ‘could i please have two tickets to pittsburgh,’ but ended up saying ‘could i please have two pickets to tittsburg’” and the other guy laughs and says “yeah i did something like that the other day – my wife and i were eating breakfast and i meant to say ‘honey could you please pass the butter,’ but what i ended up saying was ‘you ruined my life you fucking bitch’”
***
I can make the boss give me the day off.
Two factory workers are talking.
The woman says, "I can make the boss give me the day off."
The man replies, "And how would you do that?"
The woman says, "Just wait and see." She then hangs upside-down from the ceiling.
The boss comes in and says, "What are you doing?"
The woman replies, "I'm a light bulb."
The boss then says, "You've been working so much that you've gone crazy. I think you need to take the day off."
The man starts to follow her and the boss says, "Where are you going?"
The man says, "I'm going home, too. I can't work in the dark."
***
My roommates get angry when I steal their kitchen utensils
But frankly, thats a whisk I'm willing to take. 

***
"I always try to go the extra mile for my customers"
-New York's most hated cab driver


Courtesy of @lordbeef on Twitter
***
What Pokémon would you catch in Rio De Janeiro?
Zikachu.
***
A joke most likely to get me banned by Ellen Pao
So, a man walks into a bar and sees a fat girl dancing on a table.

He walks over to her and says, "Wow, nice legs!"

The flattered woman replies, "You really think so?"

The guy says, "Oh of course! Most tables would have collapsed by now."
***
A Farmer buys a young Cock.......
A Farmer buys a young Cock.
As soon as it comes Home, it rushes & fucks all the 150 Hens. Farmer is impressed.
At lunch, the Cock again screws all 150 Hens, Farmer gets tense now.
Next day, he finds Cock fucking the Ducks, Goose & Parrot too.
Later, he finds the Cock lying Pale, half-dead & Vultures circling over it's head.
Farmer Says: U Horny bastard u deserve this!
The Cock opens 1 eye, says: Sshhh! Don't shout, let them land...!
***
Marriage, the real story
A husband walks into the bedroom to see his wife packing a suitcase. He asks, "What are you doing?"

She answers, "I'm moving to Nevada . I heard that prostitutes there get paid $400.00 for what I'm doing for YOU for FREE!"

Later that night, on her way out, the wife walks into the bedroom and sees her husband packing his suitcase.

When she asks him where he's going, he replies,

"I'm coming too. I want to see how you live on $800.00 a year." 
***
Deaf Sex
Two deaf people get married and during the first week of marriage they find that they are unable to communicate in the bedroom with the lights out since they can't see each other signing, or read lips. After several nights of fumbling around and many misunderstandings, the wife figures out a solution.
She writes a note to her husband: 'Honey, Why don't we agree on some simple signals? For instance, at night, if you want to have sex with me, reach over and squeeze my left breast one time. If you don't want to have sex, reach over and squeeze my right breast two times.
The husband thinks this is a great idea. He writes back to his wife That if she wants to have sex with him, reach over and pull on his penis one time. If she doesn't want to have sex, pull on his penis two hundred and fifty times.
***
What's the difference between a physicist and an engineer?
An engineer and a physicist are roommates.  One day a fire starts in the kitchen.  The engineer is the only one home.  He hears the alarm jumps out of bed grabs the fire extinguisher off the wall and puts out the fire and goes back to bed.  

The next night a fire starts in the kitchen again.  This time the physicist is the only one home.  The physicist gets out of bed and sees the fire.  He looks at the wall and sees a fire extinguisher.  He then goes back to bed happy knowing that a solution exists.
***
"Dad, why is my sister called Paris?"
"Because we conceived her in Paris."  
"Ahh, thanks Dad! "  
"You're welcome, Backseat."
***
A war veteran interviews for a job...
A war veteran goes to a job interview at a factory. Browsing over the vet's resume, the manager of the factory seems impressed. 
"I have one question" he asks. "Do you have any disabilities that will prevent you from completing your work?"

"Well, I had both of my testicles blown off in Nam, but that shouldn't slow me down" replies the veteran.

"Great", says the manager.  "Well the job is yours if you want it. We start every day at 830am sharp, but for you, you can come in at 9"

Not wanting an preferential treatment, the veteran asks the manager, "Why do you want me to come in later than everyone else? I have no problem coming in at the normal start time."

To which the manager responds, "Well, the thing is... for the first half hour, everyone just kinda stands around and scratches their balls."
***
A little boy and his grandfather are raking leaves in the yard
The little boy sees an earthworm trying to get back into its hole. He says, "Grandpa, I bet I can put that worm back in that hole." The grandfather replies, "I'll bet you five dollars you can't. It's too wiggly and limp to put back in that little hole."

The little boy runs into the house and comes back out with a can of hair spray. He sprays the worm until it is straight and stiff as a board. The boy then proceeds to put the worm back into the hole. The grandfather hands the little boy five dollars, grabs the hair spray and runs into the house.

Thirty minutes later the grandfather comes back out and hands the boy another five dollars. The little boy says, "Grandpa, you already gave me five dollars." The grandfather replies, "I know. That's from your Grandma."

Edit: Format 
***
My neighbour really pissed me off last night...
He kept playing the same Lionel Richie song over and over. I wouldn't mind normally but it was all night long.
***
Old blonde joke.
A husband comes home to find his beautiful blonde wife sitting at the kitchen table in tears.  
"What's wrong, dear?" He asks
Through her tears she says,  "well, I've been trying to put this puzzle together all day and I just can't seem to figure it out! It's supposed to be a tiger."
He looks at her and in his most sympathetic voice says, "sweetheart, put the frosted flakes back in the box."

Ba dum-tiss
***
So a little kid is going through his mothers purse and takes out her drivers lincense...
his mother catches him reading it and mildly scolds him

the kid says "but i learned so much about you from it"

she says "well, ok, what did you learn about me"

"well, says the kid... "i know your age now"

"and what is that?" says his mother

"you're old" says the kid

"and i learned your height"

"which is?' says the mother

"your really tall" he says

"well, yes, i am tall for a woman"

"and, i learned your weight" he says

"and what is that?" asks the mother

"a lot for a woman your height" the kids says

the mother sighs and says "well, that's not nice, but i can't argue that"

"and" the kid says "i know why dad divorced you"

"Huh? what?" says the mother, "how on earth did you get that from a drivers license"

"because, you got an f in sex"
***
A woman gets on a bus with her baby...
A woman gets on a bus with her baby. The bus driver says, "That's the ugliest baby that I've ever seen. Ugh!" The woman goes to the rear of the bus and sits down, fuming. She says to a man next to her, "The driver just insulted me!" The man says, "You go right up there and tell him off – go ahead, I'll hold your monkey for you."
***
Fifty Shades of Grey
 #272727, #282828, #292929, #2b2b2b, #2c2c2c, #2e2e2e, #313131, #323232, #343434, #353535, #373737, #393939, #3a3a3a, #3c3c3c, #3f3f3f, #404040, #424242, #444444, #454545, #474747, #484848, #4a4a4a, #4b4b4b, #4d4d4d, #4e4e4e, #505050, #515151, #535353, #565656, #575757, #585858, #595959, #5b5b5b, #5c5c5c, #5e5e5e, #616161, #626262, #646464, #656565, #676767, #6a6a6a, #6b6b6b, #6c6c6c, #6d6d6d, #6f6f6f, #727272, #737373, #757575, #767676, #777777, #7b7b7b, #7c7c7c, #7d7d7d, #7e7e7e, #808080, #818181, #838383, #868686, #878787, #888888, #898989, #8b8b8b, #8c8c8c, #8e8e8e, #919191, #929292, #949494, #959595, #979797, #9a9a9a, #9b9b9b, #9c9c9c, #9d9d9d, #9f9f9f, #a0a0a0, #a2a2a2, #a5a5a5, #a6a6a6, #a8a8a8, #a9a9a9, #ababab, #aeaeae, #afafaf, #b0b0b0
***
If laziness was an Olympic sport...
I would be fourth so I wouldn't have to step up on the podium.

Edit: too lazy for dictionaries, thanks /u/ReddSpy
***
Wife has hearing problems
A old man thinks his wife is losing her hearing.  He calls the doctor about it and the doctor says he can do a little experiment to determine the severity, "Ask her a question from the next room in a normal tone of voice, and keep asking while coming closer until she can hear you.  That way you know the range of her hearing."

That night, he's sitting on his easy chair in the living room while his wife is in the kitchen cooking dinner.  He estimates he's about 30 feet away.  In a normal tone of voice, he says, "What's for dinner?"

She doesn't respond, so he gets up and walks to the kitchen doorway, about 20 feet away, and asks, "What's for dinner?"

She still doesn't respond so he walks 10 feet closer and asks, "What's for dinner?"

She still doesn't say anything, so he gets right up beside her and asks, "What's for dinner?"

She says, "For the fourth damn time we're having chicken!"
***
The United States and Britain are having a competition on who can fuck themselves up the most.
Britain is in the lead, but America has a Trump card.
***
And The Lord said unto John, "Come forth and receive eternal life"
...but John came in fifth and won a toaster.
***
How often do airplanes crash?
Just once.

/**************************************/

Edit: Thank you all for letting the world know that planes have in fact crashed more than once throughout history. No shit, Sherlock. Its called a joke. Do you think it would be all that funny if the punchline was "Usually, they get destroyed when they crash, but sometimes they go back up in da air."?
***
A woman goes into labor...
A woman and her husband go to the hospital as she goes into labor. The doctor tells them that they are trying a new machine that will transfer a percentage of the pain to the father. The couple decides to try it out. They want to start at 10% and see from there. The husband doesnt feel too much, so they crank it up to 20%. He is still feeling good and they decide to bring it all the way up to 50%. At this point, he is still not feeling very much pain, and he sees how much it is helping his wife. They eventually go all the way up to 100% and the child is born with no pain for the mother. The couple finally gets home and finds the mailman dead on the porch.
***
Why does Windows 10 say "Hello"?
Because my PC is a Dell.


(please don't hurt me it's my first post on r/Jokes omg)
***
the three legged pig joke reminded me of a joke my dad once told me
a scientist was doing an experiment on a frog in his lab, he placed the frog down on the floor and said "Frog jump!". the frog jumped 4 feet and so he noted in his notebook

"frog with 4 legs, jumps 4 feet"

he then cut off one of the frogs legs and again said "Frog jump!". the frog jumped only 3 feet this time and so he noted in his notebook

"frog with 3 legs, jumps 3 feet"

he cut off a 2nd leg and said "Frog jump!". this time the frog only jumped 2 feet and so he noted

"frog with 2 legs, jumps 2 feet"

he then cut off a 3rd leg and again said "Frog jump!". the frog only jumped a foot and so he noted

"frog with 1 leg, jumps 1 foot"

the scientist then cut off the frogs last remaining leg and said "Frog jump!, Frog jump!, FROG JUMP!!!!!" but the frog did not move. so he noted

"frog with 0 legs, deaf"
***
On average, an American man will have sex
two to three times a week; whereas a Japanese man will have sex only one or two times a year. This is upsetting news to me. I had no idea I was Japanese. 


***
A linguistics professor was lecturing to his class one day.
 "In English," he said, "a double negative forms a positive. In some languages, though, such as Russian, a double negative is still a negative. However, there is no language wherein a double positive can form a negative."

A voice from the back of the room piped up, "Yeah, right."
***
How many friendzoned guys does it take to change a lightbulb?
None. They'll just compliment it and get pissed when it doesn't screw.
***
My pastor asked me how I view lesbian relations.
Apparently "In HD" wasn't the right answer.
***
I got caught fapping...
while sniffing my friend's sister's underwear yesterday. It wouldn't have been so bad if she wasn't still wearing them at the time. He went fucking ballistic. Sure as hell made the rest of her funeral really awkward.
***
I bumped into an old school friend today.
I bumped into an old school friend today. He started showing off, talking about his well paid job and expensive sports car.

Then he pulled out a photo of his wife and said, "She's beautiful, isn't she?"

I said, "If you think she's gorgeous, you should see my girlfriend."

He said, "Why? Is she a stunner?"

I said, "No, she's a fucking optician."
***
A woman walks into a sex shop
She tells the clerk she wants a sex doll.
He says" First off, do you want a man or a woman?"
Sey replies "A man"
Then he asks " Black or white"
She replies "White"
Finally he asks "Christian or Muslum"
She asks" what's the difference?"
He says" Well the Muslum blows itself up"
***
The man with a tiny penis
A man had an extremely small penis he was very ashamed of. Fortunately for him, he found a lovely woman that he eventually decided to marry and make his wife.

On their wedding night, he whispered to his new bride that it turned him on to have the room in complete darkness. In the dark, they messed around for a bit before the man pulled out a decent-sized dildo and used it on his wife.

This ritual continued every night for 30 years.

On their 30-year anniversary, tired of having sex in the dark, the man's wife begged the man to let her turn the lights on just for the night while they had sex. The man completely refused. While fooling around in the dark, just as the man brought out the dildo and was about to use it on his wife, she reached out and turned the bedside lamp on, her eyes widening in shock at the sight of the sex toy.

"HOW DARE YOU?? So for 30 years you have lied to me?? You betrayed me and my trust!"

The man calmly looked at his wife,

"Oh yeah? Then how do you explain our two kids?"
***
If a Norwegian robot...
If a Norwegian robot analyzes a bird, it Scandinavian.
***
How many rioters does it take to change a lightbulb?
Don't be stupid, rioters can't change anything. 
***
My doctor said if I get 1000 upvotes he will perform free LASIK surgery!!
Upvote for visibility.
***
What concert costs 45 cents?
50 Cent feat. Nickelback


Go ahead, down vote me to oblivion

Edit: thanks for all the love, appreciated
***
Day off
Two factory workers are talking. The woman says, "I can make the boss give me the day off." The man replies, "And how would you do that?" The woman says, "Just wait and see." She then hangs upside down from the ceiling. The boss comes in and says, "What are you doing?" The woman replies, "I'm a light bulb." The boss then says, "You've been working so much that you've gone crazy. I think you need to take the day off." The man starts to follow her and the boss says, "Where are you going?" The man says, "I'm going home, too. I can't work in the dark."
***
A man with no carnal desires walks into a Freudian psychoanalyst's office
The psychoanalyst stops him and says, "hey, buddy, I'm gonna need to see some id." 



***
I'm American and I'm sick of people saying America is the stupidest country in the world...
Personally, I think Europe is the stupidest country in the world.
***
A man buys a lie detecting robot that slaps people when they lie.
He decides to test it at dinner one night. He asks his son what he did that afternoon.
Son: "I did some homework."
The robot slaps the son.
Son: "Ok, ok. I was at a friend's house watching a movie."
Dad: "What movie did you watch?"
Son: "Toy Story."
The robot slaps the son.
Son: "Ok, ok, we were watching porn."
Dad: "What? At your age I didn't even know what porn was."
The robot slaps the father.
Mom: "Well, at least this isn't a repost."
The robot slaps the mother.
***
Some Things You Just Can't Explain....
A farmer was sitting in the neighborhood bar getting drunk. 
A man came in and asked the farmer, "Hey, why are you sitting here on this beautiful day, getting drunk?" 
The farmer shook his head and replied, "Some things you just can't explain."
"So what happened that's so horrible?" the man asked as he sat down next to the farmer.
"Well," the farmer said, "today I was sitting by my cow, milking her. Just as I got the bucket full, she lifted her left leg and kicked over the bucket."
"Okay," said the man, "but that's not so bad." "Some things you just can't explain," the farmer replied. 
"So what happened then?" the man asked. 
The farmer said, "I took her left leg and tied it to the post on the left."
"And then?"
"Well, I sat back down and continued to milk her. Just as I got the bucket full, she took her right leg and kicked over the bucket."
The man laughed and said, "Again?" 
The farmer replied, "Some things you just can't explain." 
"So, what did you do then?" the man asked.
"I took her right leg this time and tied it to the post on the right."
"And then?"
"Well, I sat back down and began milking her again. Just as I got the bucket full, the stupid cow knocked over the bucket with her tail."
"Hmmm," the man said and nodded his head. 
"Some things you just can't explain," the farmer said.
"So, what did you do?" the man asked.
"Well," the farmer said, "I didn't have anymore rope, so I took off my belt and tied her tail to the rafter. In that moment, my pants fell down and my wife walked in ... Some things you just can't explain.
***
On the bus today, I saw an attractive young woman breastfeeding
Suddenly an old woman started shouting, "you shouldn't be doing that in public, that's disgusting!!!".

A part of me wanted to scold the old woman, but another part of me thinks...

"Maybe I shouldn't have been masturbating on a bus..."


***
I used to go out with an English teacher, but she dumped me.
I used to go out with an English teacher, but she dumped me.


She didn't approve of my improper use of the colon. 
***
Condoms
1272AD - Arab Muslims invent the first condoms using the lower intestine of goats.

1856AD - English farmers improve on the idea by first removing the intestine from the goat.
***
Sneezing orgasm.
A man and a woman were sitting beside each other in the first class section of an airplane. The woman sneezed, took out a tissue, wiped her nose, then visibly shuddered for ten to fifteen seconds. 
 
The man went back to his reading. A few minutes later, the woman sneezed again, took a tissue, wiped her nose, and then shuddered violently once more. 
 
Assuming that the woman might have a cold, the man was still curious about the shuddering. A few more minutes passed when the woman sneezed yet again. 

As before she took a tissue, wiped her nose, her body shaking even more than before. 
 
Unable to restrain his curiosity, the man turned to the woman and said, 'I couldn't help but notice that you've sneezed three times, wiped your nose and then shuddered violently. Are you OK?' 

 'I am sorry if I disturbed you, I have a very rare medical condition; whenever I sneeze I have an orgasm. ' 

The man, more than a bit embarrassed, was still curious. 'I have never heard of that condition before' he said. 'Are you taking anything for it?' 
 
The woman nodded, 'Pepper.'
***
How does Donald Trump plan on deporting millions of illegal immigrants?
Juan by Juan
***
Late for School
Mother: "Come on, Victor, you have to get out of bed or you'll be late for school."

Victor: "Mom, do I have to? All the teachers hate me, and all the students hate me, too."

Mother: "Yes, you do."

Victor: "Give me one good reason."

Mother: "Because you're 34 years old, and you're the principal."
***
a woman and her boyfriend
A woman and her boyfriend have just left a wild party and are speeding down a country lane in a sports car. The woman wants some fun and strips off her dress so she can flash at passers-by. Unfortunately, the man gets distracted and crashes the car. The naked woman is thrown clear but her boyfriend is trapped in the wreckage. The only cover the woman can find is one of her boyfriend's shoes, so she holds it over her crotch and runs to a nearby garage. She sees a mechanic and shouts, 'Help! Help! My boyfriend's stuck!' The mechanic looks at the shoe and says, 'You're going to need a doctor, miss, he's too far in.'
***
Wife comes home and finds her husband sipping coffee with another woman
She starts swearing at her husband immediatelly.

He stops her: ‘Don't shout at me, this woman has come to see you.’

‘Me? You cheating liar, I don't know her at all!’

‘OK, let me introduce you then. This is Carol, wife of your lover…’
***
Ol' Russian joke
Comrade Stalin approaches a farmer and asks :

"Comrade, how many potatoes have we grown this season?"

"Enough to reach God, comrade!" Replied the farmer. 

"But there is no God" said Stalin

"Ah, said the farmer, as there are no potatoes."


***
What do Bill Cosby and Santa Claus have in common?
They both come when you're alseep.
***
*Airhorn sound*
*Second airhorn sound*

Me: "Well this clearly isn't deodorant."
***
Opening a bank account
A man walked into a bank and walked up to the teller. He said, "I want to open a fucking bank account."
Astonished, the lady replied, "I'm sorry sir, but we don't tolerate that kind of language at this banking establishment." With that said she walked up to the bank manager and explained the situation. He agrees that the woman should not have to listen to that sort of language. They both return to the man. "What is the problem here, sir?", the manager asks. "There is no fucking problem here. I just won $200 million bucks in the damn lottery and I want to put my mother-fucking money in this mother-fucking bank."
"Oh...I see," says the bank manager, "and is this bitch giving you a hard time, sir?"
***
A bus full of disturbingly ugly people crashes...
A bus carrying only ugly people crashes into an oncoming truck, and everyone inside dies. They then get to meet their maker, and because of the grief they have experienced; He decides to grant them one wish each, before they enter Paradise. They're all lined up, and God asks the first one what the wish is. "I want to be gorgeous," and so God snaps His fingers, and it is done. The second one in line hears this and says "I want to be gorgeous too." Another snap of His fingers and the wish is granted. This goes on for a while but when God is halfway down the line, the last guy in line starts laughing. When there are only ten people left, this guy is rolling on the floor, laughing. Finally, God reaches this guy and asks him what his wish will be. The guy calms down and says: " Make 'em all ugly again."
***
A womans husband worked at a Pickle Factory...
One day, her husband comes home and says, "Dear, for years at work I have had the powerful urge to stick my dick in the pickle slicer. Every day, when I walk past the pickle slicer, I get the compulsion to just stick it in. Well, today, I gave in and shoved my dick in the pickle slicer right there on the work floor."

The wife gasps, "Oh my God! What happened?"




"She and I both got fired."

***
A man is laying in a hospital bed...
He has just taken a few tests, to find out what is wrong with him. He is feeling pretty awful, so he has an IV, and oxygen mask, etc. So the nurse walks in to see if the man needs anything. 

“Would you like anything?” She says. 

The man says, “Yes, are my testicles black?”

The nurse is very confused. 

“I don't know, sir.” She says. 

“Please check,” He says, “if my testicles are black”.

The woman is still confused, but she decides to check. She lifts up his hospital gown, sees that everything is in order, and puts it back down. 

“Well, sir,” she says, “you are fine. Your testicles are not black”.

“That's great, now listen closely,” the man says, removing the oxygen mask from his face, “*are my test results back?*”
***
Wearing Crocs is like getting a blow job from a dude...
It feels really good until you look down, and realize how gay you are. 



Edit:
Adam Carolla apparently wrote this. 
Who knew?
***
What do you call it when Batman skips Church?
Christian Bale.﻿
***
(Hope its no re-post) So this pilot was talking to his co-pilot...
and he says, "man i could really use a blowjob and a coffee." Little did he know, he had his hand on the intercom, blasting his statement out to the whole plane. The flight attendants all exchanged looks before one of them started running up to the front of the plane to tell the pilot to let go of the button. On her way there a passenger shouts to her, "Don't forget the coffee!" 
***
I don't understand why Obama has to give his speeches behind bullet proof glass.
I mean, I know he's black and all, but I doubt he'll shoot anyone.  
Edit: Holy *shit*! This blew up!
***
The Imperial Wizard of the KKK was just found dead near a river in Missouri...
Man, the moment the EPA gets threatened people start dropping white trash in our water.
***
What do a thong and Donald Trump's toupee have in common?
They both barely cover an asshole. 
***
A Polish man goes to the eye doctor...
A Polish man goes to the eye doctor. The bottom line of the eye chart has the letters:

C Z Y N Q S T A S Z

The Optometrist asks „Can you read this?”

„Read it?”, the Pole replies, „I know the guy!”

***
Psychic buys clothing
Employee: How about this one?

Psychic: That shirt is too small

Employee: You didn't even try it on

Psychic: I'm a medium
***
I'm not worried about Muslim suicide bombers
They can only do it once. Those Hindu suicide bombers are the real threat.
***
I can tell you're single
A woman at the grocery store went to the register with these items in
her cart:

* a carton of eggs
* a quart of orange juice
* a head of romaine lettuce
* a 2 lb. can of coffee
* a 1 lb. package of bacon.

As she was unloading her items on the conveyor belt to check out, a
drunk standing behind her watched as she placed the items in front of the
cashier.

While the cashier was ringing up her purchases, the drunk calmly stated,
"I can tell you're single."

The woman was a bit startled by this proclamation, but she was intrigued
by the derelict's intuition, since she was indeed single.

She looked at her six items on the belt and saw nothing particularly
unusual about her selections that could have tipped off the drunk
to her marital status.

Curiosity getting the better of her, she said "Well, you know what,
you're absolutely correct. But how on earth did you know that?"

The drunk replied, "Cause you're uglier than shit".
***
A man is driving a car through the woods...
Suddenly, he stumbles upon a frog and he immidiately stops. He leaves his car, and the frog thanks him for stopping and offers him 3 wishes. The man is confused, but eventually he has these 3 wishes:

1. I want a huge house
2. I want a basement full of money
3. I want 2 women in every room with big boobs.

The frog claps, and hops away. Man goes to his home, and he has something to see: huge house, with his name on the mailbox. He enters it and in all rooms there are women waiting for him, he rushes to his basement to see it full of money. After a few days of 'making love' and spending some money, he decides to visit the frog again to thank it.

He goes to the forest to the exact spot where he first saw the frog, and after he finds it, he thanks the frog and asks if there's anything he can do for it.

"Everyone always asks me for wishes, but I have always wanted someone to fuck me."

After all that the frog has done for the man, he could not refuse. He starts, and suddenly BAM!, the frog turns into a 13 year old girl. 

THAT'S WHAT HAPPENED YOUR HONOR, NOT WHAT THE MOM SAID!
***
20 years
A woman awakes during the night to find that her husband was not in their bed. She puts on her robe and goes downstairs to look for him. She finds him sitting at the kitchen table with a hot cup of coffee in front of him.

He appears to be in deep thought, just staring at the wall.  She watches as he wipes a tear from his eye and takes a sip of his coffee.

“What's the matter, dear?" she whispers as she steps into the room, "Why are you down here at this time of night?" The husband looks up from his coffee, "Do you remember 20 years ago when we were dating, and you were only 16?" he asks solemnly. The wife is touched to tears thinking that her husband is so caring and sensitive. "Yes I do" she replies. 

The husband paused. The words were not coming easily. "Do you remember when your father caught us in the back seat of my car making love?" "Yes, I remember" said the wife, lowering herself into a chair beside him. The husband continued. "Do you remember when he shoved the shotgun in my face and said, ‘either you marry my daughter, or will send you to jail for 20 years?’" "I remember that too" she replied softly. 

He wiped another tear from his cheek and said......  "I would have gotten out today."

***
A horse walks into a bar
A horse walks into a bar and says "bartender, scotch on the rocks please!"

The bartender, rubbing his eyes in disbelief says "did.. did you just talk?!"

"Yes I have, why?" Said the horse

"It's just, incredible! I've never seen a talking horse! You know, you should really go talk to the local circus, they would LOVE to have someone with your skills!"

The horse replied "why? Are they short on electricians?"
***
A Physicist, an engineer, and a mathematician are all locked in separate burning buildings
The Physicist runs to a chalkboard, calculates exactly how much water he will need to put out the fire, runs and finds that amount, puts out the fire, and survives.
The engineer pulls out a calculater, calculates exactly how much water he will need to put out the fire, runs and finds 10 times that amount, puts out the fire, and survives.
The mathematician runs to a chalkbaord, calculates exactly how much water he will need to put out the fire, declares, "There IS a solution!", and then burns to death.
***
Woman sends her husband to the doctor, because he has erectile problems
He comes home with a bottle of pills. Wife asks, "so, did he give you Viagra, or Cialis?"

Guy says, "Neither, he gave me really strong diet pills."

Wife says, "that's weird, why would you have to take diet pills?"

Handing her the bottle, the man says, "They're not for me. You take one at breakfast and one at bedtime."
***
A date with a twist..
A boy and his date were parked on a back road some distance from town, doing what boys and girls do on back roads some distance from town, when the girl stopped the boy.

"I really should have mentioned this earlier, but I'm actually a hooker and I charge $20 for sex." The boy reluctantly paid her, and they did their thing.

After a cigarette, the boy just sat in the driver's seat looking out the window. "Why aren't we going anywhere?" asked the girl.

"Well, I should have mentioned this before, but I'm actually a taxi driver, and the fare back to town is $25."
***
An engineer tells his coworkers about his walk to work
"So I'm walking to work this morning through the park, like I always do, but today was a bit different...  A beautiful woman on a bicycle rode up next to me and got off the bike.  She stripped naked and put her clothes in a pile next to the bike, then looked right at me and said 'You can have anything you want...'"

One of his coworkers asks "So what did you do?"

He replies, "I took the bike."

The coworker says "Yeah, you made the right choice..  Her clothes wouldn't have fit you anyway."
***
How many Arabs does it take to change a lightbulb?
None. They'll sit in the dark and blame the Jews
***
My buddy was dating twins...
I asked him how he could tell them apart, and he replied, "That's easy. Barbara has really big tits and Bob has a mustache."
***
A black guy walks into a bar with a parrot...
The bartender says, "Wow! That is really cool! Where did you get it?"

"Africa", says the parrot.
***
A con artist, a pervert, and a racist walks into a bar.
The barkeep looks up and says "The usual, Mr. Trump?"
***
I took a selfie after my kidney removal surgery
hashtag nofilter
***
A fisherman comes home to his wife
A fisherman comes home to his wife after a day out on the sea. He hands her his catch and after she cleans and cooks they both sit down to a lovely fish dinner. He takes one fish and begins to eat when he notices his wife sullenly looking down at her plate. 

After a concerned silence she looks up and speaks. "You always used to take the smaller fish and insist I have the bigger one for myself. I'm starting to feel that you don't love me as much as you used to." 

The fisherman chuckles to himself before taking her hand and says, "My love for you hasn't changed, but your cooking has gotten much better!" 
***
A man wanted to teach his sons the evils of alcohol
So he takes out two glasses. Fills one with bourbon and one with water. 

He puts A worm in the bourbon and a worm in the water. Worm in the water lives, worm in the bourbon dies. 

He turns to his son and say "now what does that teach you about the evils of alcohol?"

His son thought about it for a second and says "well if I drink bourbon I won't get worms" 

-my dad tells this one to at least one person every time he goes into a liquor store-
***
True Romance.
A man is dining in a fancy restaurant and there is a gorgeous redhead sitting at the next table. He has been checking her out since he sat down, but lacks the nerve to talk with her.

Suddenly she sneezes, and her glass eye comes flying out of its socket toward the man. He reflexively reaches out, grabs it out of the air, and hands it back.

'Oh my, I am so sorry,' the woman says as she pops her eye back in place.

'Let me buy your dinner to make it up to you,' she says.

They enjoy a wonderful dinner together, and afterwards they go to the theatre followed by drinks. They talk, they laugh, she shares her deepest dreams and he shares his. She listens.

After paying for everything, she asks him if he would like to come to her place for a nightcap and stay for breakfast. They had a wonderful, wonderful time.

The next morning, she cooks a gourmet meal with all the trimmings. The guy is amazed. Everything had been SO incredible! 'You know,' he said, 'you are the perfect woman. Are you this nice to every guy you meet?'

'No,' she replies...   
   
'You just caught my eye.'
***
So a three masted sailing ship is leaving port...
... just a day out of port the captain is standing on the deck when the lookout calls down "Sir! There's an enemy ship on the horizon!"

The captain turns to his cabin boy and shouts "Bring me my red shirt!"  

After the cabin boy brings him the red shirt and he puts it on, the two ships close to fighting range and fight all day, with many heroics on both sides, but with the captain and his red shirt standing alive and victorious as the other ship sinks behind them in the sunset light.

Later that night the cabin boy is curious and asks the captain why he needed his red shirt, and the captain replies "Well, with my red shirt on, none of the men would see me bleeding if I was wounded, and so they would not lose heart and continue to fight on to victory!" 

The cabin boy thinks that's pretty clever and goes to bed for the night.

The next day, the captain is standing on the deck as they sail along when the lookout shouts down "Sir! Twenty enemy ships on the horizon!"

And the captain turns to his cabin boy and says "Bring me my brown pants!"
***
This actually just happened...
*Wife: I wanna get into coding.

*Me: Oh, that sounds fun. You might even earn some 
money on the side while you're at home. What language 
did you wana code in ?

*Wife: English. Duh!
***
A Blond, Brunette and a Redhead go to a Bar
They come up to the bartender and the bartender says "we have a magic mirror in the girl's bathroom,  if you tell it a truth about yourself you'll get free drinks and if you tell it a lie it will kill you." Excited, the brunette rushes to the bathroom and says "I think I'm the prettiest out of the three of us." The mirror gives the brunette a voucher for free drinks. Next, the redhead rushes to the bathroom seeing as her best friend had gotten free drinks and says "I think I have the best hair in the group." The mirror gives the redhead a voucher for free drinks and she rushes out. The blonde is so surprised, she runs to the bathroom to test it and says "I think-" and immediately dies

Edit: Blonde
***
There's a whore house at the top of a hill
There's a whore house at the top of a hill. There is a man walking up the hill, a man walking down the hill, and a man at the whore house. What are their nationalities?

The man walking up the hill --he's Russian, the man walking down the hill -- he's Finnish, the man at the whore house -- Himalayan
***
You know why Mayweather won't beat Pacquiao?
Pacquiao isn't his wife. 
***
Fright flight!
After waiting for what seemed like an eternity, the flight attendant announces over the intercom that, "We're just waiting for the pilots."

The passengers look out the windows, and see two men, dressed in pilot's uniforms, walking towards the plane.

Both men are using guide dogs and appear to be blind.

There are murmurs among the passengers, and some believe it is a joke.

The men board the plane and go into the cockpit.

More concerned murmurs and uneasy chuckles from the passengers.

The plane taxis normally to the runway and begins its takeoff.

As passengers look out the window, they realize they are nearing the end of the runway!!

The entire passenger cabin begins screaming, but the plane lifts off, just before the end of the runway.

The passengers calm down and chuckle to themselves, at this point believing that they fell for a joke.

In the cockpit, the pilot turns to his copilot and says, "You know, one day those people are gonna scream too late and we're all gonna die!"
***
What's Adolf Hitler's favourite computer game?
Mein Kraft.
***
I was watching porn with the missus and she complained, "This is so unrealistic."
I said, "Just because you're unwilling to try new things, doesn't mean everyone's that frigid."

"Not that," she explained, "It's just the plumbers that come to our house have tiny dicks."
***
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with a boob job?
Ones a rusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean!

ahahhahahahahah 
***
I woman had just given birth to a baby boy...
The doctor was holding him and told the parent,"I regret to inform you that your son was born without eyelids." The mother replies," That's terrible. What are we going to do?" The doctor says," I've seen this before, don't worry. We will circumcise him and use the foreskin to make him new eyelids." The father says," Won't that make him cock-eyed." The doctor replies," No, if anything it will give him foresight"
***
(NSFW) I heard that Research In Motion, the company that makes BlackBerry phones, is hiring.
So I ran a Google search on RIM Jobs. And you know what? I don't think I'm cut out for this line of work after all.
***
A swastika has been spray painted over Donald Trump's star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame...
...Police say it's impossible to tell if the act was committed by Trump's opponents or supporters.
***
If Trump wins Im leaving the country if Clinton wins Im leaving the country
Not a political post, I just love to travel
***
A cute one I heard from a friend at work.
Three animals walk into a bar; A duck,a skunk and a deer. They go up to the bar and order 3 drinks. "5 dollars" Says the bartender. The deer looks at the duck and says "I don't have a buck to my name!" the skunk cries "I have no money, not even a scent!" but the duck says to the bartender "It's alright, just put it on my bill".
***
A couple of newlyweds on were on their honeymoon and moments before the passionate love making commenced, the wife says to the husband, "Please, be gentle, I'm still a virgin."

The husband was shocked and replied, "How's this possible? You've been married *three* times before!"

The wife responds, "Well, my first husband was a gynecologist and all he wanted to do was look at it. My second husband was a psychiatrist and all he wanted to do was talk about it. Finally, my third husband was a stamp collector and all he wanted to do was...oh, *god*, I miss him!" 
***
Why couldn't the Mexican be a Firefighter?
Because he didn't know the difference between Jose and Hose B. 
***
0 to 200 in 6 seconds
Bob was in trouble. He forgot his wedding anniversary. His wife was
really pissed.

She told him "Tomorrow morning, I expect to find a gift in the
driveway that goes from 0 to 200 in 6 seconds AND IT BETTER BE THERE !!"

The next morning he got up early and left for work. When his wife woke
up, she looked out the window and sure enough there was a box
gift-wrapped in the middle of the driveway.

Confused, the wife put on her robe and ran out to the driveway, brought
the box back in the house.

She opened it and found a brand new bathroom scale.

Bob has been missing since Friday.
***
My 5 year olds painful twist on a knock knock joke
I was telling my son the "knock knock who's there banana joke", and he laughed and told me to tell it to him again. As I said knock knock he then backhanded my face and said "you shouldn't stand so close to the door"

***
They say statistically, 1 out of every 3 of your neighbors are likely to be a pedophile.
Luckily for me, I live next to two gorgeous 12 year olds.
***
Who won the first Tour de France?
The 7th German Panzer division 
***
Last Names.
It's commonly known that a lot of last names originate from an ancestor's profession, or what they were known for, hundreds of years ago.  
If your last name is Smith, it's likely one of your ancestors was a blacksmith.  
If your last name is Cooper, they may have been a cooper, who were known for making barrels.  
If your last name is Dickinson I wouldn't delve too deep into your family history.
***
WHAT DO WE WANT?!?!!
WHAT DO WE WANT?!?!?

LOW FLYING AIRPLANE NOISES!!!

WHEN DO WE WANT ‘EM?!?!?

*NEEEEEYYYYOOOOOOOOWWWW*

Edit: Wow, this really took off. 
***
A man and his wife go to a class reunion.....
A man and his wife go to a class reunion after a grueling 4 hour drive. When they arrive they're given name tags and head to the gymnasium. 


They start talking to some friends when the wife is starting to get thirsty. So she asks the husband to go get in line to give her some punch.

 
 He returns after 10 minutes with one empty cup, and when the wife asks about her drink the husband replies, 


"Sorry honey, the punchline was too long and it wasn't worth it


***
Peanut butter and Jelly flavoured apples
A man is walking by a fruit stand and sees a sign for "Peanut Butter and Jelly flavoured Apples" so out of curiosity he asks the fruit vendor for a sample. 

The man bites in to the Apple. 

"Wow that tastes just like peanut butter, but you said it tastes like peanut butter AND jelly."

The vendor replies "Flip it around!" 
And sure enough the other side tasted like jelly. 

The man now astonished by this apple, asks about any other flavors. 

The vendor says, "Sure I do! I even have an apple that tastes just like pussy. Try it!" 

The man bites into it. With an expression of pure disgust he spits it out. 

"This tastes like shit!!"

The fruit vendor replies, "Flip it around!" 
***
Why was Han Solo so suspicious when he put his penis inside Princess Leia for the first time?
...it was Luke warm.
***
A feminist visited a Muslim country and was unhappy with the treatment of women there...
All of the Muslim men made their wives walk at least five feet behind them. The visiting feminist was outraged, "How could you be so sexist? This is an outrage!" 


She left the country, only to return years later. Much to her surprise, all of the women were walking five feet *ahead* of their husbands. The feminist couldn't believe it. "What changed? Why are you so progressive now?" One of the men overheard and said with a smile... "land mines."
***
The best joke that I have ever heard :)
And the Lord said unto John, "Come forth and you will receive eternal life"
But John came fifth, and won a toaster
***
Can you touch your dick to your asshole?
One day a young boy is going into the kitchen to get some cookies. In the kitchen he runs into his grandpa who is drinking some whiskey. He asks "What's that grandpa, can I have some?"

In response grandpa asks "I don't know, can you touch your dick to your asshole?"

Taken aback the boy says "no"

"Well when you can touch your dick to your asshole, come back here and I'll share my whiskey with you."

Slightly offended the boy gets his cookies and begins to walk out of the room but his grandpa stops him.

"Hey kid, wanna give your old gramps one of those cookies?" he asks.

The boy turns to his grandpa and says "I don't know, can you touch your dick to your asshole?"

Grandpa grows a big wide grin "I sure can!" he says.

"Good," says the boy "then Go fuck yourself. These are MY fucking cookies."
***
How to get free internet @ home
I live in an apartment complex so I have neighbors left to right and below me. One day I asked my neighbor if he was interested in splitting the cost of my wifi 50/50 so he could also use it. He agreed. I went on to my other neighbor downstairs and asked him the same thing. Now both my neighbors are paying for my wifi.
***
Paddy phones an ambulance because his mate's been hit by a car.
Paddy phones an ambulance because his mate's been hit by a car.
Paddy: 'Get an ambulance here quick, he's bleeding from his nose and
Ears and I tink both his legs are broken.'
Operator: 'What is your location sir?'
Paddy: 'Outside number 28 Eucalyptus Street ....'
Operator: 'How do you spell that sir?'
Silence.... (heavy breathing) and after a minute.
Operator: 'Are you there sir?'
More heavy breathing and another minute later.
Operator: 'Sir, can you hear me?'
This goes on for another few minutes until....
Operator: 'Sir, please answer me. Can you still hear me?'
Paddy: 'Yes, sorry bout dat... I couldn't spell eucalyptus, so I just
dragged him round to number 3 Oak Street .'
***
Why doesn't Magneto wear his old costume anymore?
Because days of fuchsia passed
***
Europe be like...
eu: uk bro?

uk: it's not eu, it's me.
***
Osama Bin Laden, Josef Stalin and Hitler are robbing a bank, who do the cops shoot first?
A black guy
***
A masked burglar goes in to a bank
He goes to the teller, points a gun to her face and says "This is a robbery! If anybody moves or tries any funny business, they get shot!"
The teller then reaches over the counter and grabs the mask, revealing the face of the burglar.
The burglar says "you've seen my face!" and shoots her dead. He then says "has anyone else seen my face?!?"
A man with his head down yells out "I haven't seen your face, but I think my wife, beside me here, may have gotten a glimpse".
***
Got a job working with a bunch of Emo kids. It's depressing, they're always going on about dying, they look terrible with their white skin, and complain about how shit their life is.
Sorry not Emo kids......Chemo kids..
***
For a moment, i had a different opinion on 'Chinese girls'
This Valentines day, I asked a Chinese girl for her number. 
She said, "Sex! Sex! Sex! Free Sex tonight!" 
I said, "Wow!" 
Then her friend said, "She means 666-3629."
***
Sieg Heil by Covergirl
Girls use chemicals to remove polish and no one panics.
Hitler does the same thing and everyone loses their minds.
***
A man joins an order of Monks.
A man goes to join an order of monks.

The head Monk says to the man "This is a silent order.  You will only be allowed to speak once, every 15 years."

The man says "Ok" and so begins his time with the silent order.

15 years pass and the man is sitting in the refectory when the head monk approaches and says to the man "It has been fifteen years.  What would you like to say brother?".

The man responds, "The porridge could do with a little more sugar."  The head monk nods in acknowledgement and walks away.

Another 15 years pass and the head monk finds the man in the dormitory and says "Brother, it has been another 15 years.  What is it that you wish to say?".

"The bed sheets are a bit thin."  Replies the man.  Again the head monk nods in acknowledgement.

Yet another 15 years pass and the head monk sees the man and asks "15 years have passed.  Have you anything to say?".

"Well actually I've been thinking about it and I'm leaving the order.  It's not really for me." says the man.

"Yes, yes" sighs the head monk "I think that's for the best.  You've done nothing but fucking complain since you got here."
***
Have you heard like 50% of Chinese people have cataracts?
Yeah, I guess the other 50% drive "rincoln towncah". 
***
Solution to erection problems
I’m about three years into my relationship now and I've started to have erection difficulties. My girlfriend and I have different ideas as to what the problem is: she bought me some Viagra and I bought her a treadmill.
***
A man's walking home late at night when he sees a woman in the shadows.
"Twenty bucks," she says. 

He's never been with a hooker before, but he decides what the hell. They're going at it for a minute when all of a sudden a light flashes on them—it’s a police officer.

"What's going on here, people?" asks the officer. 

"I'm making love to my wife," the man answers indignantly. 

"Oh, I'm sorry," says the cop, "I didn't know." 

"Well," said the man, "neither did I until you shined that light in her face.
***
Why did Barbie never get pregnant?
Because Ken came in a different box.

Badum tiss.
***
A Three legged dog walks into the old wild west saloon
He says to the bartender, "I'm lookin' fer the guy who shot my paw."
***
Why did vatican invite Bernie not Hillary?
They couldn't afford it.

***
A man was walking on a beach when he saw a woman with no arms or legs crying.
A man was walking on a beach when he saw a woman with no arms or legs crying. He asked what was wrong. She said:
"I have no arms and no legs, and I've never been hugged."
He hugged her and kept walking. A few minuted later, he sees her crying again. He asked what was wrong now; She said:
"I have no arms and no legs, and I've never been kissed."
He kissed her and kept walking. A few minutes later, he saw her crying yet again, and again, he asked what was wrong. She said:
"I have no arms and no legs, and I've never been fucked."
He picked her up, threw her in the ocean, and said
"Well you're fucked now."!
***
A pirate talks with his captain...
'Captain, how did you get your peg leg?'

'Yarrr... Me ship sank. I was rescued, but not before a great white took me leg.'

'What about your hook hand?'

'Me ship was boarded. I repelled the bastards, but not before I lost me hand.'

'And what about your eye patch?'

'Yarrr... a bird shit in me eye.'

'I don't understand.... How did that cause you to lose an eye???'

'It was me first day with the hook!'
***
Same old cow
My wife and I went to the ploughing championships and one of the first exhibits we stopped at was the breeding bulls. We went up to the first pen and there was a sign attached that said,

' **"THIS BULL MATED 50 TIMES LAST YEAR"**

My wife playfully nudged me in the ribs .....Smiled and said, *'He mated 50 times last year.'*

We walked to the second pen which had a sign attached that said,

**''THIS BULL MATED 150 TIMES LAST YEAR"**

My wife gave me a healthy jab and said, *'WOW~~That's more than twice a week! .........You could learn a lot from him.'*

We walked to the third pen and it had a sign attached that said,

in capital letters,

**"THIS BULL MATED 365 TIMES LAST YEAR"**

My wife was so excited that her elbow nearly broke my ribs, and said,

*'That's once a day ..You could REALLY learn something from this one.'*

I looked at her and said,

'Go over and ask him if it was with the same old cow.'
***
3 men are drinking at a bar when a drunk wanders in...
He staggers up to the counter, and points at the guy in the middle, shouting, "Your mom's the best fuck in town!"

Everyone expects a fight, but the guy ignores him, so the drunk wanders off and bellies up to the bar at the far end. Ten minutes later, the drunk comes back, points at the same guy, and says, "I just did your mom, and it was sweeeeeeeet!"

Again, the guy refuses to take the bait, and the drunk goes back to the far end of the bar. Ten minutes later, he comes back and announces, "Your mom liked it!"

Finally, the guy interrupts. "Go home, dad, you're drunk.”

Edit: due to a series of comments in this thread I wound up creating a new subreddit: /r/drunkjokes 
***
What does a girl want more than anything in the world?
Nothing. She's fine.


Edit: Wow guys. Thanks so much for the upvotes, the hilarious comments and I finally got my 1st gold! 
***
What does wearing crocs and getting a blowjob from a man have in common?
They both feel good until you look down and realize you're gay.

TAKE THAT CROC LOBBY #againstbigcroc 

I understand if I get downvoted. 
***
Now that Donald Trump is actually building the wall, I hear Mexicans are depressed
I'm sure they'll soon get over it
***
A man wakes up one morning to find that he's grown a thick beard and is wearing a turban....
He, being very concerned and disoriented, calls his boss in order to see if he can get the day off. 

Man: "Boss, I just woke up with a turban and a long, thick beard. I think I need a day to figure things out." 

Boss: " So what are you saying....?"

Man: "I'm calling in Sikh."
***
The Professor's Jokes

The professor loved to start each lecture with a dirty joke. After a week of this, the female students got together and decided that next time, if this happened again, they would all walk out in unison.  

The professor got wind of this plot. Next morning, after he entered the lecture hall, he said: "Good morning! Have you heard about the shortage of prostitutes in Singapore?"  

Now all the female students stood up and headed toward the exit.  

The professor continued: "Oh, ladies, please wait, the boat to Singapore doesn't leave until tomorrow!"
***
Three guys in a plane crash on a deserted island...
One day, several years later, a bottle washes up on the beach.  One of the guys opens it to reveal that it contains a genie!  The two others rush over when they see what's going on.

The genie says "Normally, I give the person who finds my bottle three wishes, but since there are three of you, I'll give you each one."

She turns to the guy who found the bottle and says, "What is it that you desire?"

The man thinks for a moment, then says "Well, I've been on this island now for several years.  I'd really just like to be home with my wife and our two children."

The genie smiles, snaps her fingers, and the man disappears.  She turns to the second man and says, "And what is it that you desire?"

He says "Well, like the first man, I too have a family that I greatly wish to return to."

The genie wastes no time and in a second there is only one man remaining on the beach.

She says "You have one wish as well, what is it that you desire?"

The man is silent for a moment, then replies "Well, unlike those other two, I never really had a family."  He thinks for a moment longer, then says "I guess I'm pretty lonely, I really wish those two guys were back."
***
What do they call Miley Cyrus in France?
Kilometrey Cyrus.
***
A Chinese man is on his death bed...
With his sight failing, he turns to the doctor and asks is his wife there?

The doctor assures him she is.

"And my sons, my beautiful sons, are they here?"

"They are."

"What about my sister?"

Consoling the poor man, the doctor tells him:"Don't worry, she's here, along with your brother in law, and all the rest of your family, you can die in peace."

With his last breath, the old Chinese man, struggling to make his voice heard says:

"If everyone is here, then who the fuck is minding the shop?".
***
Mars and NASA
Mars: Come over

NASA: You're 33.9 million miles away

Mars: I'm wet

NASA: I'm coming over
***
"Silent farts that don't stink..."
An old woman visits the doctor for a routine check-up.


"Doctor, I have constant gas, but the farts are always silent and they don't stink!"


The doctor prescribes her some pills and sends her on her way. 


Two weeks later she returns for a follow-up.


"Doctor, I still have constant silent farts, but now they stink!"


Doctor replies, "Alright, so we have cleared out those sinuses, now for your hearing..."
***
What kind of sunglasses does Ned Flanders wear?
Oakley Dokelys
***
The sound at the monastery
A man is driving down the road and breaks down near a monastery. 
He goes to the monastery, knocks on the door, and says, "My car broke down. 
Do you think I could stay the night?"The monks graciously accept him, feed him dinner, even fix his car
As the man tries to fall asleep, he hears a strange sound
The next morning, he asks the monks what the sound was, but they say,
"We can't tell you. You're not a monk."
The man is disappointed but thanks them anyway and goes about his merry way. 

Some years later, 
The same man breaks down in front of the same monastery. 
The monks again accept him, feed him, even fix his car
That night, he hears the same strange noise that he had heard years earlier.
The next morning, he asks what it is, but the monks reply, "We can't tell you. You're not a monk."

The man says, "All right, all right. I'm dying to know. If the only way I can find out what that sound was is to become a monk, how do I become a monk?"
The monks reply, "You must travel the earth and tell us how many blades of grass there are and the exact number of sand pebbles. When you find these numbers, you will become a monk."

The man sets about his task.
Some 4-5 years later, he returns and knocks on the door of the monastery.
He says, "I have traveled the earth and have found what you have asked for. There are145,236,284,232 blades of grass and 231,281,219,999,129,382 sand pebbles on the earth."
The monks reply, "Congratulations. You are now a monk. We shall now show you the way to the sound."

The monks lead the man to a wooden door where the head monk says,
"The sound is right behind that door."

The man reaches for the knob, but the door is locked.
He says, "Real funny. May I have the key?"

The monks give him the key, and he opens the door.
Behind the wooden door is another door made of stone.

The man demands the key to the stone door.
The monks give him the key, and he opens it, only to find a door made of ruby. 

He demands another key from the monks, who provide it.
Behind that door is another door, this one made of sapphire,
So it went until the man had gone through doors of emerald, silver, topaz and amethyst.

Finally, the monks say, "This is the last key to the last door."

The man is relieved to know its the end.
He unlocks the door,turns the knob, 
and behind that door he is amazed to find the source of that strange sound

But he can't tell you what it is because you're not a monk
***
Just asked Siri.
 "Surely it's not going to rain today?"

She said "it will, and don't call me Shirley"  

...Forgot to take my phone off Airplane mode. 

***
Son: "Dad, what's the difference between confident and confidential?"
Dad: "Hmm. You are my son. Of that, I am confident. Your friend Timmy is also my son. That's confidential."
***
A blonde, wanting to earn some money,
A blonde, wanting to earn some money, decided to hire herself out as a handyman and started canvassing a wealthy neighborhood. 
She went to the front door of the first house and asked the owner if he had any jobs for her to do. 
"Well, you can paint my porch. How much will you charge?" 
The blonde said, "How about 50 dollars?" The man agreed and told her the 
paint and other materials that she might need were in the garage. 
The man's wife, inside the house, heard the conversation and said to her 
husband, "Does she realize that the porch goes all the way around the 
house?" 
The man replied, "She should; she was standing on it." 
A short time later, the blonde came to the door to collect her money. 
"You're finished already?" he asked. 
"Yes," the blonde answered, "and I had paint left over, so I gave it two 
coats. " Impressed, the man reached in his pocket for the $50. "And by 
the way," the blonde added, "it's not a Porch, it's a Ferrari."
***
If someone who speaks 2 languages is Bilingual, whats someone who speaks 1 called?
American.

EDIT: My first post on Reddit and I get 1000+ up votes, thanks so much!!!
***
Olympic Results for Sailing are out:
The British  have taken the Gold medal.

The French  have taken the Silver medal.

The Somalians  have taken the boats.
***
What's the difference between a pickpocket and a peeping Tom?
A pickpocket snatches watches.
***
Arnold Schwarzenegger was asked if he wanted to upgrade to Windows 10.
He replied, "I still love Vista, baby".

***
I bought 2 Chainz' latest album, but it was the censored edition.
It's easily one of the best instrumental CDs I've heard in a long time.
***
A dark skinned lady named Betty goes to the butcher and asks for some beef.
The butcher replies: "Nooooo Black Betty, ham or lamb!"

***
What's the difference between a dirty bus stop and a lobster with breast implants?
one's a crusty bus station and the other is a busty crustacean
***
What did E.T.'s mother say when E.T. got home?
"Where on Earth have you been??!!"

**Thank you, I'll be here all night...

Edit: Thanks for da love Dr. Jones!
***
Why is the British weather like Islam?
Because it's either Sunni or Shi'ite
***
Ive been told I'm not ambitious enough....
I've been told I'm not ambitious enough.

If only there was an olympic sport for being a lazy bastard.

That bronze medal would be mine.
***
A redhead tells her blonde sister, "I slept with a Brazilian..."
The blonde replies: 
"Oh My Gosh! You slut! How many is a Brazilian?"
***
A father-to-be was waiting anxiously outside the labour ward where his wife was delivering a baby.
A nurse came up to the man and said, 'You have a girl, but there's another one on the way, so come back soon.'

'Twins,' he thought, a little shakily. He went away and came back an hour later to be told that the second baby had been born, but there was still another on the way.

'Good grief,' he thought.

He went to the pub down the street, and after a beer he phoned in and was told a fourth one was on the way. He started to drown his sorrows. A few stiff whiskies later he called the hospital again, but was so drunk he dialled the wrong number - and got the recorded cricket score. Crying in agony, he collapsed on the floor, a poor, devastated, shuddering and weeping mess.

As the barman struggled to pick him up, he heard the voice from the phone say, 'The score is 88 all out. And the last one was a duck.'
***
How can you spot the rank of a Russian?
By the stripes on his Adidas jumpsuit.
***
A cop pulls over his pastor when he notices him swerving...
As the officer approaches the window he notices a bottle in a brown bag on the seat. Officer says, "brother, I pulled you over for swerving back there. You haven't been drinking have you?"
"No sir, why would you ask that?"
"Well I noticed the bottle on the seat next to you."
"Oh, that's just holy water."
"OK brother. So why is it in a bag?"
"Well, that is to protect it from the suns rays."
"Mind if I take a sip?"
"Not at all."
As the officer puts the bottle to his lips and takes a drink, he immediately spits it out...
"Brother, this is wine."
The pastor, "PRAISE THE LORD. HE'S DONE IT AGAIN!"
***
How can you tell someone hates vegans, cross fitters, and atheists?
Don't worry, they'll repost a joke about it.
***
What do you call a German sausage fest?
Wurst orgy ever.
***
What do little miss muffet and ISIS have in common?
They both have curds in their whey.
***
When the US went to the moon....
...they planted the American Flag. After all these years the radiation from the Sun will have bleached it completely white, so now if Aliens find it they are going to think the French were there first.
***
A young man goes into a drug store to buy condoms.....
A young man goes into a drug store to buy condoms.
The pharmacist says the condoms come in packs of 3, 9 or 12 and asks which the young man wants. 
"Well," he said, "I've been seeing this girl for a while and she's really hot. I want the condoms because I think tonight's "the" night. We're having dinner with her parents, and then we're going out. And I've got a feeling I'm gonna get lucky after that." 
"Once she's had me, she'll want me all the time, so you'd better give me the 12 pack." 
The young man makes his purchase and leaves. 
Later that evening, he sits down to dinner with his girlfriend and her parents. 
He asks if he might give the blessing and they agree. 
He begins the prayer, but continues praying for several minutes. 
The girl leans over to him and says, "You never told me that you were such a religious person." 
The boy leans over to her and whispers, "You never told me that your father is a pharmacist."
***
My Asian roommate says I have schizophrenia.
Jokes on him, I don't have a roommate.
***
Why did the Stormtrooper buy an iPhone?
Because he couldn't find the Droid he was looking for.
***
What does an English pimp do, after having tea and crumpets?
Tally Hoes
***
Winning the lottery
A man gets home, screeches his car into the driveway, runs into the house, slams the door and shouts at the top of his lungs, “Honey,pack your bags. I won the damn lottery!” 
The wife says,“Ohmigod! No shit?! What should I pack,beach stuff or mountain stuff?”
The husband yells back,“It doesn’t matter… just get the fuck out!”

***
Q: If a man's signature is called a John Hancock, what do you call a woman's?
A: Historically insignificant.
***
Mother daughter action.
A man in his 20's and a few of his friend were at a bar for drinks when a lady in her mid to late 40's started to buy him drinks. Throughout the coarse of the night she kept insisting he go back to her place just around the corner. The man was reluctant but his friends were encouraging him to do it and in a final attempt to lure him back the lady offered him some mother daughter action if he joins her. Know all excited he follows the lady's lead back to her house. Once home she proceeds to light some candles and put some sensual music on and then started passionately kissing him. The man thinks he has been tricked when the lady stops and says I'm forgetting something, she walks over to the stairs and yells out to up stairs hey mum I've got one. 
***
*Offensive* A man walking along the train tracks stumbles upon a genie's lamp
The man rubs the lamp & the genie grants him 3 wishes, but a young boy nearby witnesses it all unfold. As the man is about to make his wishes, a train passes by and the curious boy is unable to hear his wishes... when the train is done passing, the genie is gone, but the man is still there, counting money while getting a massage from a gorgeous woman. 

The next day, the boy hears that the man is dead, hung from a tree by men wearing white robes, affiliated with the KKK.

The boy confused, goes back to the train track where he saw the lamp and decides to rub it to see what happens... the genie comes out and says "sorry, I'm all out of wishes". 

The boy says, OK, but tell me one thing, what did the man wish for yesterday? The genie replies: his first wish was to be rich, his second wish was to have a gorgeous wife, and his third wish was to be hung like a black man

***
Lost my watch at a party...
Saw a guy stepping on it while sexually harassing a girl. I walked up to the dude, punched him straight in the nose. No one does that to a girl. 

^not ^^on ^^^my ^^^^watch.
***
A little boy and his grandfather
A little boy and his grandfather are raking leaves in the yard. The little boy sees an earthworm trying to get back into its hole. He says, "Grandpa, I bet I can put that worm back in that hole." The grandfather replies, "I'll bet you five dollars you can't. It's too wiggly and limp to put back in that little hole."

The little boy runs into the house and comes back out with a can of hair spray. He sprays the worm until it is straight and stiff as a board. The boy then proceeds to put the worm back into the hole. The grandfather hands the little boy five dollars, grabs the hair spray and runs into the house.

Thirty minutes later the grandfather comes back out and hands the boy another five dollars. The little boy says, "Grandpa, you already gave me five dollars." The grandfather replies, "I know. That's from your Grandma."
***
Why is India surprised by the Brexit vote?
They didn't know you could get Britain to leave by voting.
***
How many Yale students does it take to change a lightbulb?
*One to hold the bulb up to the socket and wait for the world to revolve around them, three to scream at the circuit breaker and belittle it for controlling power, and eight others to console the first four while they tweet about how problematic this traumatic experience has been for everyone.*
***
I was walking through the park this morning, when I saw a man, standing on a tree branch, with a rope around his neck...
I asked him what was happening and he screamed, "After I jump, everyone will dearly miss me when they recall that I hung myself!"

I immediately assured him that that would not be the case, even if he jumped, right there, in front of my very eyes, that's not what people will say!! 

Tears welling in his eyes, he jumped.

As he was jumping, I said, "After you jump, everyone will dearly miss you when they recall that you *hanged* yourself!!"
***
So there were two larger girls at the bar...
I went to the bar and overheard two heavy girls talking with an odd accent. 

I asked them, 'Are you two ladies from Scotland?'

One turned to me and said, 'It's Wales, you idiot!'

'Oh, I'm sorry. Are you two whales from Scotland?' 


***
A deaf couple got married...
And on their wedding night, as they laid down in bed and before turning the lights out, they realized they needed a way to communicate with each other in the dark (since they used sign language to talk to each other). 

The woman looked lovingly at her husband and said (in sign language, of course), "Dear, when we lay down, after we turn the lights out, if you want to make love to me that night, touch my right breast. If you don't want to make love to me that night, touch my left breast."

The husband nodded. Then he signed back to her, "Sweetheart, when we lay down at night, after we turn the lights out, if you want to have sex with me that night, pull my cock once. If you don't want to have sex with me that night, pull my cock 250 times."

***